Jesus became a perfect human, just as Adam had been.
But unlike Adam, Jesus lived up to the standard Jehovah expected from a perfect man.
Even under the most extreme tests, Jesus never sinned nor broke any of God’s laws.
As a perfect man, Jesus could save humankind from sin and death by dying in their behalf.
He corresponded exactly to all that Adam should have been—a perfect man, absolutely loyal and obedient to God.
Jesus became the ransom sacrifice that opened the way to endless life for many—men, women, and children.
Indeed, the ransom is the key that unlocks the door to the fulfillment of God’s original purpose.
The ransom gives all faithful humans the prospect of everlasting life.
In recent times, the work of Jehovah’s people has grown in scope and complexity.
As we tackle new projects, new ways of doing things are adopted—often ways that involve the use of rapidly changing technology.
Some older ones may find it hard to keep pace with these advances.
Even when that is not the case, younger ones may have greater strength and energy than older ones have.
Thus, it is both loving and practical for older ones to prepare younger ones to take on greater responsibility.
Those in positions of authority may not find it easy to delegate to younger ones.
Some fear losing a position they cherish or are convinced that younger ones cannot do things as well.
Some may reason that they do not have time to train someone else.
On the other hand, those who are younger must guard against becoming impatient when they are not given more to do.
A humble person is generally also a modest person, able to estimate accurately his own abilities and achievements, to acknowledge his mistakes, and to accept suggestions and new ideas.
Humility greatly pleases Jehovah.
In the Bible, modesty similarly refers to having a proper estimate of ourselves and an awareness of our limitations.
In the original language of the text, the emphasis seems to be on how that awareness should affect our behavior toward others.
When might we start to think or act immodestly?
Consider a few of the warning signs.
We might be taking ourselves or our privileges too seriously.
We might be drawing attention to ourselves in inappropriate ways.
Or we might be advocating strong opinions solely on the basis of our position, connections, or personal thinking—not even being aware that we have crossed the line from modesty to presumptuousness.
When we deal with health problems or other challenges beyond our control, we should throw our anxiety on Jehovah, trusting that he cares for us.
Also, we should do what is within our power to benefit from Christian meetings and other spiritual provisions.
What about faithful parents whose children have gone astray?
Elderly Samuel could not force his adult sons to remain loyal to the righteous standards he taught them.
He had to leave the matter in Jehovah’s hands.
Even so, Samuel could maintain his own integrity and please his heavenly Father, Jehovah.
Today, a number of Christian parents find themselves in a similar situation.
They trust that Jehovah is ever on the lookout to welcome back sinners who repent.
At the same time, such parents work hard to remain loyal to Jehovah, hoping that their example will move their children to return to the fold.
Good communication, sharing your feelings with a trusted confidant, can help you cope with anxiety.
A marriage mate, a close friend, or a congregation elder may be able to help you to put your anxiety into perspective.
Frank and honest communication can do much to help you to understand and deal with your concerns.
The Bible tells us: Plans fail when there is no consultation, but there is accomplishment through many advisers.
Jehovah also helps Christians to deal with anxieties by means of weekly congregation meetings.
There you can associate with fellow believers who are concerned about you and who want to encourage one another.
Such an interchange of encouragement will help to replenish your spiritual resources and make it easier for you to deal with any anxiety.
The Bible Students were sincere.
But during the period between 1914 and 1919, they did not always have a proper view of subjection to the secular governments.
Therefore, as a group, they were not always neutral with regard to the war effort.
For example, when the president of the United States decreed that May 30, 1918, would be set aside as a day of prayer for peace, The Watch Tower urged the Bible Students to join in the observance.
Some brothers purchased bonds to provide financial assistance to the war effort, and a few even went into the trenches with guns and bayonets.
However, it would be a mistake to conclude that the Bible Students were first taken into captivity to Babylon the Great because they needed correction and discipline.
On the contrary, they understood their obligation to separate themselves from false religion, and during World War I, the break with that world empire was almost complete.
What a privilege it is to be part of Jehovah’s organization! With our knowledge of God’s requirements and standards comes the responsibility to do what is right and uphold his sovereignty.
As this world sinks deeper and deeper into debauchery, we must hate what is bad, as Jehovah does.
We refuse to join the ungodly and say: Good is bad and bad is good.
Because we want to please God, we strive to remain clean physically, morally, and spiritually.
We love Jehovah and put our trust in him; we choose to show our loyalty to him by living up to the standards clearly outlined in his own precious Book.
And we make every effort to comply with those standards at home, in the congregation, on the job, at school—everywhere.
One of the limitations on our freedom is that we must respect the right that others have to make their own decisions in life.
Why?
Since we all have the gift of free will, no two Christians will always make exactly the same decision.
This is true even in matters that involve our conduct and worship.
When we recognize that each Christian must carry his own load, we will respect the right that others have to use their own gift of free will, including when making personal decisions in matters of lesser importance.
Jehovah has given us the gift of free will and with it true freedom.
We treasure this gift because it allows us to make decisions that reveal to Jehovah how much we love him.
May we continue to show our appreciation for this precious gift by using it in a way that honors God and by respecting the way that others choose to use their gift.
When Abishai crept into Saul’s camp, he did not have his loyalties in the proper order.
Out of loyalty to David, Abishai was eager to kill King Saul, but David restrained him, realizing that it would be wrong to lift one’s hand against the anointed of Jehovah.
From that incident, we learn an important lesson: Although we can properly have several loyalties in our heart, the correct order of their importance should be determined by our application of Bible principles.
Loyalty springs from the heart, but the human heart is treacherous.
Thus, one who is loyal to God could easily feel strong ties of loyalty to a close friend or relative even if that person is practicing what is bad.
Especially when someone close to us abandons the truth must we remember that Jehovah always merits our primary loyalty.
Why did Christians in Rome need to prove to themselves something that they had already accepted?
Consider a Bible example.
Timothy knew the Scriptures well.
He had been taught from infancy by his mother and grandmother.
Nevertheless, Paul urged Timothy: Continue in the things that you learned and were persuaded to believe.
According to one reference work, the original-language word for persuaded has the sense to be convinced and certain of the truth of something.
Timothy had made the truth his own.
He accepted it, not because his mother and grandmother told him to do so, but because he had reasoned on it for himself and had been persuaded.
Likewise, diligent personal study can help you answer questions, resolve any doubts, and strengthen your convictions.
When the last days began in 1914, there were only a few thousand servants of Jehovah worldwide.
Motivated by love for neighbor, and with the backing of God’s spirit, a small remnant of anointed Christians persevered in the Kingdom-preaching work.
As a result, today a great crowd with an earthly hope is being gathered.
Our ranks have grown to about 8,000,000 Witnesses associated with more than 115,400 congregations throughout the earth, and we continue to grow in number.
For example, over 275,500 new Witnesses were baptized during the 2014 service year—an average of some 5,300 each week.
The remarkable growth that we see today is the result of our faith in God and full acceptance of the Bible—Jehovah’s miraculously inspired Word.
Especially outstanding is the spiritual prosperity of Jehovah’s people—despite the hatred and opposition of Satan, the god of this system of things.
Thousands of fragments, manuscripts, and ancient translations have been compared and painstakingly studied by Bible scholars.
This study validated the contents of the vast majority of Bible passages.
The few verses about which there is a degree of uncertainty do not change the overall message.
A study of ancient manuscripts convinces sincere Bible students that they have what Jehovah originally inspired Bible writers to record.
Despite fierce opposition from enemies, Jehovah has seen to it that his Word is the most widely translated book in the history of mankind.
Even at a time when many have little or no faith in God, the Bible remains a best seller and is now available, in whole or in part, in over 2,800 languages.
Though some Bible translations are not as clear or as reliable as others, it is still possible to learn the Bible’s basic message of hope and salvation from nearly all translations.
Words have the power to hurt as well as to heal.
Using words to inflict pain is common in Satan’s world.
The field of entertainment incites many to sharpen their tongue just like a sword and to aim their cruel words like arrows.
A Christian needs to avoid this harmful practice.
One example of cruel words is sarcasm, stinging remarks intended to belittle or rebuke others.
Sarcasm is often meant to be humorous, but it can quickly deteriorate into disrespectful, insulting speech.
Cruel sarcasm is one form of abusive speech that Christians should put away.
Humor can add spice to our speech, but we need to avoid the trap of trying to evoke a laugh by resorting to cutting, sarcastic quips that hurt or humiliate others.
The Bible admonishes us: Let a rotten word not come out of your mouth, but only what is good for building up as the need may be, to impart what is beneficial to the hearers.
These final words of the letter that the first-century governing body sent to the congregations can also be rendered be strong.
We definitely want to prosper in good health and be strong as we serve our great God.
As long as the present system of things remains and we are imperfect, sickness is a fact that we must face.
We cannot expect now to be cured miraculously.
However, points to the time when we will be healed completely.
The apostle John saw in vision a river of water of life and trees of life with leaves for the healing of the nations.
This does not refer to any herbal remedy now or in the future.
Rather, it points to Jehovah’s provision through Jesus for giving everlasting life to obedient mankind—truly something we can look forward to.
Speaking of the time in which we are living, Jehovah foretold: In those days ten men out of all the languages of the nations will take hold, yes, they will take firm hold of the robe of a Jew, saying: We want to go with you, for we have heard that God is with you people.
Like the figurative ten men, those who have an earthly hope have taken firm hold of the robe of a Jew.
They are proud to associate with the spirit-anointed Israel of God, knowing that Jehovah is blessing his anointed ones.
As did the prophet Zechariah, Jesus highlighted the refreshing unity that is experienced by God’s people.
He spoke of his followers as two groups, a little flock and other sheep, but he said that they would be one flock with one shepherd.
We need to safeguard our spirituality.
Because we live in a world that is dominated by Satan the Devil and because we are imperfect, it is easy for us to adopt the wrong thinking and conduct of the world.
The world’s spirit might be compared to a river current that is pulling us in a direction we do not want to go.
To avoid being swept downstream, we must vigorously swim in the other direction.
Similarly, effort is required to keep from being swept away by the spirit of Satan’s world.
When we are preaching to others, we focus on important and beneficial spiritual matters, not on thoughts that will erode our faith.
Preaching strengthens our convictions, reminding us of God’s promises and loving standards.
It also helps keep our spiritual armor intact.
If we keep busy in our spiritual activities, we simply do not have time to become overly concerned with our own problems, and that helps to protect us.
Note Ruth’s love for Jehovah.
The landowner Boaz later praised Ruth for seeking refuge under Jehovah’s wings.
That may remind us of a baby bird taking refuge under the wings of a powerful, protective parent.
Jehovah became such a parent to Ruth.
He rewarded her for her faith, and she never had any reason to regret her decision.
Today, many learn about Jehovah but hesitate to take refuge in him.
They hold back from becoming his dedicated, baptized servants.
If you hesitate to make a dedication to Jehovah, have you stopped to ask yourself why?
Everyone alive serves some god or other.
Why not take refuge in the only God worth serving?
Making a dedication to Jehovah is an excellent way to demonstrate faith in him.
He will help you live up to that decision and face whatever challenges may arise.
That is what God did for Ruth.
Thirsting for Bible truth, Charles Taze Russell and a few associates began their systematic study of the Bible in the late 1800’s.
Initially, Brother Russell’s goal was to ascertain which of the prevailing religions was teaching the truth.
He had carefully compared the teachings of many different religions, even non-Christian religions, with what the Bible says.
He soon realized that not one of those religions completely adhered to God’s Word.
At one point, he met with a number of local clergymen in hopes that these men would accept the truths that Russell and his associates had discovered from the Bible and teach them to members of their congregations.
The clergymen were not interested.
The Bible Students would have to face the facts: There could be no partnership with those determined to hold on to false religion.
Our appreciation for God’s undeserved kindness involves more than avoiding adultery, drunkenness, or other sins that some in Corinth had been guilty of.
Accepting God’s undeserved kindness means not only avoiding sexual immorality but also fighting any tendency to enjoy lewd entertainment.
Presenting our members as slaves to righteousness will not only keep us from drunkenness but also move us to shun drinking to the point of almost being drunk.
It may require considerable effort for us to fight against such wrong practices; still, it is a fight that we can win.
Our goal should be to avoid gross sins as well as wrongs that are not as flagrant.
We will not be able to do that perfectly.
Nevertheless, we should strive to do so, even as Paul did.
He urged his brothers: Do not let sin continue to rule as king in your mortal bodies so that you should obey their desires.
The June 1, 1973, issue of The Watchtower asked the question: Do persons who have not broken their addiction to tobacco qualify for baptism?
The answer was: The Scriptural evidence points to the conclusion that they do not.
After citing several relevant scriptures, The Watchtower explained why an unrepentant smoker should be disfellowshipped.
It said: This represents no effort to act in an arbitrary, dictatorial manner.
The strictness really proceeds from God, who expresses himself through his written Word.
A recent book on religion in the United States notes: Christian leaders have regularly revised their teachings to match the beliefs and opinions gaining support among their members and in the larger society.
Jesus knew that his earthly ministry would come to an end and that others would carry on his work.
Though his disciples were imperfect, he had confidence in them and told them that they would do works greater than he did.
He trained them thoroughly, and they spread the good news throughout the then-known world.
After his sacrificial death, Jesus was resurrected to heaven where he was given more work to do with authority far above every government and authority and power and lordship.
If we die faithful before Armageddon, we will be resurrected into a righteous new world, where there will be plenty of satisfying work for us to do.
Now, though, there is vitally important work that all of us can participate in—preaching the good news and making disciples.
May all of us, young or old, keep on having plenty to do in the work of the Lord.
When we face a new assignment, a prayerful and realistic analysis will help us to avoid overreaching our current abilities and limitations.
Modesty may lead us to say no.
However, when we do accept a new assignment, Gideon’s example reminds us that we cannot succeed without Jehovah’s direction and blessing.
After all, we have been invited to walk in modesty with our God.
So any time we take on new responsibilities, we need to reflect prayerfully on whatever Jehovah tells us through his Word and his organization.
We have to learn to adjust our unsteady steps to match Jehovah’s steady lead.
Let us remember that it is Jehovah’s humility and not our own ability that makes us great.
Choosing to walk modestly with God will therefore help us to think neither too much nor too little of ourselves.
Even in these dark last days of Satan’s wicked system of things, Jehovah is blessing his people.
He makes sure that true worshippers flourish in their spiritual estate, which is unprecedented in its spiritual abundance.
As Jesus promised, Jehovah rewards us now by letting us be part of a loving family of spiritual brothers and sisters, a family that is international in scope.
Furthermore, those who earnestly seek God are rewarded with the incomparable blessings of peace of mind, contentment, and happiness.
You can be certain that after you have done the will of God, you will receive the fulfillment of the promise.
So let us now continue to strengthen our faith and to work whole-souled as to Jehovah.
We can do this, knowing that it is from Jehovah that we will receive the due reward.
At Pentecost 33 C.
, thousands of Jews and proselytes were anointed with holy spirit.
These new Christians became a chosen race, a royal priesthood, a holy nation, a people for special possession.
The apostles kept careful watch over the congregations of God’s people as long as they lived.
However, especially after the death of the apostles, men arose who spoke twisted things in order to draw away the disciples after themselves.
Many of these men had responsible positions in the congregations, serving as overseers and later as bishops.
A clergy class was taking shape, although Jesus had said to his followers: All of you are brothers.
Prominent men who were enamored of the philosophies of Aristotle and Plato introduced false religious ideas, gradually replacing the pure teachings of God’s Word.
Many people form impressions and opinions of us by what appears to the eyes.
As God’s ministers, therefore, we understand that our getting dressed is not just a matter of putting on something comfortable that we like.
The principles that we glean from God’s Word should move us to avoid wearing clothing that is tight-fitting, revealing, or sexually provocative.
That would rule out wearing clothing that exposes or accentuates private parts of our anatomy.
Nobody should feel uncomfortable or forced to look the other way when seeing how we are dressed.
When we are neat, clean, modestly dressed, and well-groomed, people are more likely to respect us and to be attracted to the God we worship.
Furthermore, our appropriate attire will reflect well on the organization we represent.
As a result, others may be more likely to pay attention to our lifesaving message.
Do not be quick to assume you know what others believe.
Some people say that they believe in evolution, but they also feel that God exists.
They think that God used evolution to create different forms of life.
Others say that they believe in evolution because they feel that it would not be taught at school were it not a fact.
And some stop believing in God because they are disappointed with religion.
So when you discuss the origin of life with someone, it is usually wise to ask questions first.
Find out what that person believes.
If you are reasonable and willing to listen, he may be inclined to listen to you.
If someone seems to be attacking your belief in creation, you might ask him to explain how life could have begun without a Creator.
For the first life-form to continue, it had to be able to reproduce, to make copies of itself.
One professor of chemistry said: One is struck by the complexity of even the simplest form of life.
We can show kindness to newcomers from a foreign background by warmly greeting them at the Kingdom Hall.
We may have noticed that new immigrants are sometimes shy and stay by themselves.
Because of their upbringing or social status, they may feel inferior to those of another race or nationality.
So we should take the initiative to show a warm and sincere interest in them.
If available in your language, the JW Language app can help you learn how to greet newcomers in their mother tongue.
You may feel awkward about approaching those from another culture.
To overcome such feelings, you might tell them something about yourself.
You may soon realize that you have more things in common than you have differences—real or imagined—and that each culture has its own strengths and weaknesses.
Jehovah always supports his faithful servants, even though he may allow them to wait for privileges or a favorable change of circumstances.
He promised Abraham a son, but the patriarch had to exercise faith and patience.
Although he waited years for Isaac’s birth, Abraham did not lose heart, and Jehovah did not disappoint him.
Waiting is not easy.
If we were to brood over disappointments, we could become very discouraged.
Instead, it is wise to use our time to improve our spiritual qualifications.
By reading God’s Word and meditating on it, we can develop wisdom, insight, good judgment, knowledge, thinking ability, and soundness of mind.
Daily, we face issues involving entertainment, dress and grooming, managing money, and getting along with others.
By applying what we learn from the Bible, we can make decisions that please Jehovah.
Humans were created in God’s image.
Thus, most of them exhibit some godly qualities, though to differing degrees.
Humans are capable of showing one another love, kindness, and compassion.
Having been created with a conscience, people normally have an inborn sense—albeit at times inaccurate or distorted—that alerts them to what is right or wrong, honest or dishonest, appropriate or inappropriate.
Most people are drawn to things that are clean and beautiful.
Generally, they want to live with others in peace.
Whether they realize it or not, they reflect to some extent Jehovah’s glory, and for this reason, they deserve a measure of honor and respect.
However, balance is needed in determining what kind of honor should be rendered to other humans and to what extent.
What effect did God’s Word have on the men who took the lead?
Consider the example of King Josiah.
After a document containing the Mosaic Law was found, Josiah’s secretary began to read it to him.
Guided by God’s Word, Josiah began a vigorous campaign against idolatry and arranged an unprecedented celebration of the Passover.
Because Josiah and other faithful leaders were guided by God’s Word, they were willing to adjust and clarify the direction they gave to God’s people.
Those changes brought God’s ancient people into harmony with his will.
However, not all the kings who ruled God’s ancient people followed God’s instructions.
In some cases, Jehovah disciplined or replaced those leaders.
In his own due time, he appointed someone who would be superior to any of the men he had used thus far.
Jehovah’s original purpose was for mankind to live forever here on earth.
He generously gave Adam and Eve a variety of precious gifts that enabled them to enjoy life.
Jehovah gave them free will, the ability to reason, and the capacity to love and to enjoy friendship.
The Creator spoke to Adam and instructed him on how to show his obedience.
Adam also learned how to take care of his needs and how to care for the animals and the land.
Jehovah also created Adam and Eve with the senses of taste, touch, sight, sound, and smell.
Thus they could enjoy to the full the beauty and bounty of their Paradise home.
For the first human pair, the possibilities for satisfying work, accomplishment, and discovery were endless.
Jehovah created Adam and Eve with the ability to have perfect children.
Earth, with all its resources, was to become their permanent home.
Nehemiah’s example demonstrates how modesty can help us to keep from becoming self-reliant when we receive a change of assignment or additional responsibility.
Relying just on his own experience, an elder could begin to care for congregation matters without first approaching Jehovah in prayer.
Others might make a decision first and then pray for Jehovah to bless their decision.
Is that being modest, however?
A modest person will always remember his place before God and his role in God’s arrangement.
Our abilities are not the important thing.
Especially when we are faced with a familiar situation or problem, we have to be careful not to rely on ourselves.
As members of God’s household, we learn to think in terms of fulfilling roles in a family or as part of a congregation rather than achieving a rank or climbing a corporate ladder.
Noah lived in a world that was filled with violence and immorality.
Although Noah faithfully preached Jehovah’s warning message, he could not force wicked people around him to accept that message, nor could he make the Flood come any sooner.
Noah had to trust that Jehovah would keep His promise to end wickedness, believing that God would do so at just the right time.
We too live in a world filled with wickedness, which we know Jehovah has promised to destroy.
In the meantime, we cannot force people to accept the good news of the Kingdom.
And we cannot do anything to speed up the start of the great tribulation.
Like Noah, we need strong faith, trusting that God will soon intervene.
We are convinced that Jehovah will not allow this wicked world to continue for even one day longer than his purpose requires.
Honesty is basic to Christianity.
Satan is the father of the lie.
And Ananias and his wife lost their lives because of lying.
We do not want to imitate such ones—we avoid lying.
Is that, though, as far as our honesty goes?
Actually, our honesty should reflect our deep appreciation for God’s undeserved kindness.
To lie is to say something untruthful.
However, Jehovah wants his people to go beyond not telling outright lies.
He urged the ancient Israelites: You should be holy, because I, Jehovah your God, am holy.
Then he gave examples of being holy.
In part, God said: You must not steal, you must not deceive, and you must not deal falsely with one another.
Sadly, a person who makes it a point never to tell outright lies might still resort to deceiving others, dealing falsely with them.
As a preacher of righteousness, Noah faithfully proclaimed the warning message he had been given.
No doubt, doing so helped Noah keep his faith strong.
In addition to preaching, he also used his physical and mental abilities to accomplish the God-assigned work of building an ark.
Like Noah, we strive to have plenty to do in the work of the Lord.
Such work may include the construction and maintenance of facilities for worship, volunteering to assist at assemblies and conventions, or caring for assignments at a branch office or a remote translation office.
Above all, we stay busy in the preaching work, knowing that this work strengthens our hope for the future.
Indeed, sharing in the preaching work fortifies our resolve not to give up in the race for life.
Like his father, Asa, Jehoshaphat maintained his devotion to God even when threatened by an overwhelming enemy force.
Jehoshaphat did become afraid! Yet, he resolved to search for Jehovah.
In prayer, he humbly admitted that his people were powerless before this large crowd and that he and his people did not know what to do.
He fully relied on Jehovah, saying the words of today’s text.
Sometimes we, like Jehoshaphat, may not know what to do, even being afraid.
But remember that Jehoshaphat acknowledged in a public prayer how weak he and his people felt.
Those who take the spiritual lead in the family can imitate Jehoshaphat by turning to Jehovah for guidance and strength to cope with the problem they face.
Do not feel ashamed to let your family hear such supplications.
They will sense your trust in Jehovah.
God helped Jehoshaphat, and he will also help you.
If we met all of Jehovah’s requirements perfectly, his kindness toward us would be deserved.
As it is, we fail to do so.
Thus, wise King Solomon wrote: There is no righteous man on earth who always does good and never sins.
The apostle Paul likewise stated: All have sinned and fall short of the glory of God, and the wages sin pays is death.
That is what we deserve.
Jehovah, however, expressed his love toward fallen mankind in an incomparable act of undeserved kindness.
He sent his greatest gift of all, his only-begotten Son, to earth to die in our behalf.
So Paul wrote concerning Jesus that he is now crowned with glory and honor for having suffered death, so that by God’s undeserved kindness he might taste death for everyone.
Yes, the gift God gives is everlasting life by Christ Jesus our Lord.
Jehovah’s Witnesses willingly render honor to public servants, even as it may be expected and as may be customary in the land.
We cooperate with them as they perform their duties.
Of course, our honor and support have reasonable, Scriptural limits.
We cannot go to the point of disobeying God or violating our Christian neutrality.
Jehovah’s servants in the past set the pattern in their relationship with governments and officials.
When the Roman Empire called on people to participate in a census, Joseph and Mary complied.
They traveled to Bethlehem despite the fact that Mary was soon to give birth to her first child.
Later, when Paul was accused of wrongdoing, he respectfully defended himself and showed proper honor to King Herod Agrippa and to Festus, governor of the Roman province of Judea.
From the beginning of his ministry, Jesus allowed the Scriptures to direct him.
Even his final words before he died included quotations of Messianic prophecies.
In contrast, the religious leaders of that time disregarded God’s Word whenever it contradicted their own traditions.
Quoting Jehovah’s words through the prophet Isaiah, Jesus said about them: This people honor me with their lips, but their hearts are far removed from me.
It is in vain that they keep worshipping me, for they teach commands of men as doctrines.
Jesus allowed God’s Word to guide not only his actions but also his teaching.
When confronted with religious controversies, he appealed neither to his vast wisdom nor to his unparalleled experience.
Instead, he held up the Scriptures as the final authority.
In the decades leading up to World War I, Charles Taze Russell and his associates realized that the organizations of Christendom were not teaching Bible truth.
Accordingly, they resolved to have nothing to do with false religion as they understood it.
As early as November of 1879, Zion’s Watch Tower straightforwardly set out their Scriptural position by stating: Every church claiming to be a chaste virgin espoused to Christ, but in reality united to and supported by the world beast we must condemn as being in scripture language a harlot church, a reference to Babylon the Great.
God-fearing men and women knew what they must do.
They could not expect to receive God’s blessing if they continued to support false religious organizations.
Consequently, many Bible Students prepared letters of withdrawal from their churches.
What did Jesus mean when he said: Never be anxious?
Obviously, he could not have meant that a servant of God would not at some point in life experience anxiety.
Instead, Jesus was helping his disciples to realize that undue, or extreme, anxiety does not solve problems.
Each day has its own challenges, so Christians do not need to add anxious thoughts about the past or the future to the concerns of the present.
Unwarranted anxiety often results if a Christian agonizes over possible future problems.
However, you need not be consumed by anxiety, or worry, over events that you do not know anything about.
Why not?
Because things often do not turn out to be as bad as we feared they might be.
Moreover, there is no situation beyond the control of the God on whom you can throw all your anxiety.
You can be certain that God can reward his faithful ones and help them deal with anxiety about the past, the present, and the future.
In connection with the annual commemoration of Jesus death, have you read ?
Probably so.
That key passage explains how Christians know that they are anointed—holy spirit bears witness with their spirit.
Anointed Christians are those principally addressed in that chapter.
They receive the spirit as ones waiting for adoption as sons, the release from their fleshly bodies.
Yes, their future is to be sons of God in heaven.
That is possible because they became baptized Christians, and God applied the ransom in their behalf, forgave their sins, and declared them righteous as spiritual sons.
However, is also of interest to those who have the earthly hope because God in a sense views them as righteous.
They too can benefit from the counsel found there that is given to righteous ones.
King Saul of ancient Israel began his reign as a modest and respected man.
But soon after he became king, he carried out a series of presumptuous acts.
When God’s prophet Samuel did not show up in Gilgal at the appointed time, Saul became impatient.
The Philistines were preparing for battle, and the Israelites were deserting Saul.
He must have thought, I have to do something—and quickly.
So he offered up a sacrifice to God, which he was not authorized to do.
Jehovah was not pleased.
When Samuel arrived in Gilgal, he rebuked Saul.
Instead of accepting the correction, Saul made excuses, tried to shift the blame, and minimized what he had done.
That started a terrible chain of events that eventually cost Saul his kingship and, more important, Jehovah’s approval.
Despite a promising beginning, Saul’s life ended in complete disaster.
Adam and Eve had to decide what to do.
Would they obey Jehovah, or would they listen to the serpent?
They decided to disobey God.
By rebelling against Jehovah, Adam and Eve lost their perfection.
Moreover, their rebellion resulted in alienation from Jehovah because his eyes are too pure to look on what is evil.
Therefore, he cannot tolerate wickedness.
If he had tolerated it, the well-being of all living creatures—in heaven and on earth—would be threatened.
Above all, had God done nothing about the sin committed in Eden, his own trustworthiness would have been called into question.
But Jehovah is faithful to his own standards; he never violates them.
Thus, having free will did not entitle Adam and Eve to disregard God’s law.
As a consequence of rebelling against Jehovah, they died and returned to the dust from which they had been created.
Modesty can help us to make good decisions even when we cannot fully know or control how things will turn out.
As an example, if we enter some feature of the full-time service, what will happen to us if we get sick?
What if our aging parents need our help?
How will we look after ourselves in our old age?
No amount of prayer or research will reveal a complete answer to questions like these.
Our confidence in Jehovah will help us not only to acknowledge but also to accept our limitations.
After doing research, consulting others, and praying for guidance, we need to take steps in the direction that God’s spirit is leading us.
That gives Jehovah something to bless, or he can gently redirect our goals.
Showing honor to those to whom it is due keeps us from becoming self-centered.
It helps us to avoid having an inflated opinion of ourselves if some honor comes our way.
It also keeps us in line with Jehovah’s organization, which refrains from giving humans—whether believers or unbelievers—excessive or undue honor.
Moreover, it is the course of wisdom, helping us to avoid being stumbled if some human to whom we showed honor disappoints us.
The most important benefit of giving proper honor to those to whom it is due is that we thereby please God.
We act as he wants us to and thus maintain integrity to him.
That contributes to making a reply to any who would try to taunt him.
The world is full of people whose sense of how to bestow honor is distorted.
We are truly grateful to know how to give honor Jehovah’s way.
Like his father, Asa, Jehoshaphat encouraged the people to search for Jehovah.
He did so by organizing a teaching campaign that used the book of Jehovah’s Law.
He even went to the territory of the northern kingdom of Israel, to the mountainous region of Ephraim, to bring them back to Jehovah.
We can all have a share in the great teaching campaign that Jehovah is having done today.
Is it your goal each month to teach the Word of God to others, trying to move their heart to serve God?
By your extending yourself and with God’s blessing, you may be able to start a Bible study.
Is that a goal that you pray about?
Are you willing to accept this challenge, even giving up some of what is commonly viewed as free time?
And just as Jehoshaphat went to the territory of Ephraim to help people return to true worship, we can reach out to those who have become inactive.
We owe it to our holy God, to our spiritual brothers and sisters, as well as to the people in our territory to wear clothing that dignifies the message we bear and that brings glory to Jehovah.
This is especially so when we are engaging in Christian activities, such as when we attend meetings or when we share in the preaching work.
We should dress in the way that is proper for people professing devotion to God.
Of course, some clothing that is appropriate in one place may not be appropriate in another.
Hence, Jehovah’s people throughout the world take local customs into account so as not to cause offense.
When we attend assemblies and conventions, our dress needs to be appropriate and modest rather than reflect the extreme styles that may be common in the world.
Thus we will be proud to identify ourselves as Jehovah’s Witnesses.
Yes, and we will feel free to give a witness as we have an opportunity.
When a lovely bride appears before her handsome bridegroom on their wedding day, words can hardly describe their joy.
God’s Word provides wise advice for all who choose to get married, for the loving Originator of marriage wants each couple to have a good measure of success and happiness in their married life.
Yet, the Scriptures clearly tell us that imperfect humans who get married will have tribulation in their flesh.
How can such tribulation be kept to a minimum?
And what will make Christian marriage a success?
The Bible emphasizes the importance of love.
Tender affection Greek, phi·liʹa is needed in a marriage.
Romantic love eʹros brings delight, and love for family stor·geʹ is vital when children enter the picture.
However, it is love based on principle a·gaʹpe that ensures the success of a marriage.
Shortly before his death, Jesus three times warned his disciples about the ruler of this world.
Jesus knew that the Devil would keep people in darkness mentally in order to undermine the sense of urgency that permeates God’s prophecies about the future.
Satan blinds people’s minds through the world empire of false religion.
What have you detected in your conversations with others?
Has the Devil not already blinded the minds of the unbelievers about the coming end of this system of things and the fact that Christ is now ruling God’s Kingdom?
For the most part, people are apathetic when we try to tell them where this world is headed.
Do not let the apathy of others discourage or dissuade you from keeping on the watch.
You know better.
Jehovah gives us a worldwide brotherhood of caring worshippers who can offer us encouragement.
Many in the first century received that sort of spiritual strengthening.
It is similar today.
What can we do?
Think of how Aaron and Hur literally supported Moses hands during a battle.
We can look for ways to support and to give practical aid to others.
To whom?
To those battling the effects of old age, health limitations, opposition from their family, loneliness, or the loss of a loved one.
We can also strengthen young ones who are facing pressure to share in wrongdoing or to seek success in this system of things, whether academically, financially, or professionally.
Look for ways to show genuine interest in others at the Kingdom Hall, in the ministry, while enjoying a meal together, or as you converse on the telephone.
Timothy was already an experienced Kingdom proclaimer.
Yet, his ministry would be effective only if he would pay constant attention to his teaching.
He could not take for granted that people would respond to his usual approach.
To continue reaching their hearts, he had to adapt his teaching methods to their needs.
As Kingdom proclaimers, we need to do the same.
We often find that people are not at home when we preach from door to door.
In some areas, we cannot enter certain apartment buildings and gated communities.
If that is true in your territory, why not consider different ways to preach the good news?
Public witnessing is one excellent method of spreading the good news.
Many Witnesses are having a very effective and rewarding share in such work.
They set aside time to approach people at train and bus stations, in marketplaces and parks, and in other public areas.
The Bible’s description of faith is found at .
Faith focuses on two kinds of things that are not visible to us: 1 What is hoped for—this may include future events that have been promised to happen but that have not yet occurred, such as the end of all wickedness and the coming new world.
2 Realities that are not seen.
In this context, the Greek word translated evident demonstration refers to convincing evidence of an invisible reality, such as the existence of Jehovah God, Jesus Christ, the angels, and the activities of the heavenly Kingdom.
How do we prove that our hope is alive and that we believe in the unseen things spoken of in God’s Word?
By our words and deeds—without which our faith would be incomplete.
Our modesty includes making a humble evaluation of ourselves when compared with Jehovah’s purity and holiness, for we are completely dependent on him for the best guidance.
Also, modesty includes showing respect for the feelings and opinions of others.
Therefore, we walk in modesty with God by conforming our lives to his elevated standards and showing respect for other people’s sensitivities.
Our choice of clothing should not make people conclude anything other than that we are worshippers of Jehovah.
Our brothers and sisters as well as people in general should be able to see that we fittingly represent our righteous God.
He has high standards, and we happily strive to reflect those standards.
Commendation is in order for brothers and sisters whose appearance and fine conduct attract honesthearted people to the Bible’s lifesaving message and bring glory and joy to Jehovah.
Jacob was a very determined contender, and he proved that he would not turn aside from the challenge! And he was, indeed, rewarded for his perseverance.
He received the fitting name Israel, meaning Contender Perseverer With God or God Contends.
Jacob gained the rich reward that we too are seeking—Jehovah’s approval and blessing.
Jacob’s beloved wife, Rachel, was eager to see how Jehovah would fulfill his promise to bless her husband’s offspring.
But she had no children.
In her day, that situation was viewed as a great affliction.
How did Rachel find the emotional and physical strength to continue battling against circumstances that were discouraging but completely beyond her control?
She never gave up hope.
Rather, she kept contending by praying with more intensity.
Jehovah heard Rachel’s heartfelt supplications, and she was eventually blessed with children.
Unrealistic expectations may be at the root of a marital problem.
When dreams about a happy marriage do not come true, a person may feel dissatisfied, cheated, even bitter.
Differences in emotional nature and upbringing may become issues, or disagreements may arise regarding money, in-laws, and child-rearing.
However, it is commendable that the vast majority of Christian married couples find mutually acceptable solutions for all such problems because they let God guide them.
Christian marriage mates who have serious problems should seek help from the elders.
These experienced brothers can assist married couples to apply the counsel of God’s Word.
In resolving marital problems, we should also pray for Jehovah’s spirit and his help in applying Bible principles and displaying the fruitage of his spirit.
How did humans inherit the sinful, dying condition that plagues us all?
The Bible explains: By the trespass of the one man Adam death ruled as king over Adam’s descendants.
Happily, though, we can choose no longer to be ruled, or dominated, by sin.
By exercising faith in Christ’s ransom sacrifice, we place ourselves under the rule of Jehovah’s undeserved kindness.
Even though we remain sinners, we need not resign ourselves to having sin dominate our lives.
When we do give in to sin, we will ask Jehovah for his forgiveness.
Therefore, we come under the rule of undeserved kindness.
With what result?
Paul explained: The undeserved kindness of God trains us to reject ungodliness and worldly desires and to live with soundness of mind and righteousness and godly devotion amid this present system of things.
We need to develop our brotherly love now, for it will help us during whatever tests and trials we may face in the future.
Even now, before the outbreak of the great tribulation, we have a strong need for brotherly love.
Many of our brothers have been adversely affected by earthquakes, floods, hurricanes, tsunamis, or other natural disasters.
Some brothers are suffering because of opposition and persecution.
Added to all of this are the economic woes we experience daily as a result of living in this corrupt system of things.
As such problems increase, so do our opportunities to demonstrate the depth of our brotherly affection.
Even though the love of the greater number of people will grow cold, we need to prove that our brotherly love continues.
Do you at times take notes during public talks, assemblies, and conventions?
Reviewing these notes provides excellent opportunities for meditation as you think about what you have learned from God’s Word and from his organization.
Also, each month’s issues of the Watchtower and Awake! magazines and the latest convention releases give us fresh information that we can read and digest.
When you read the Yearbook, you may find it helpful to pause and reflect on what you read and let the experiences touch your heart.
You may want to underline key thoughts or to make notes in the margin, which you might find helpful when preparing for a return visit, a shepherding call, or a future talk.
Most important, pausing and meditating every now and then while reading Bible-based publications will give you the opportunity to absorb the material and to say a prayer of thanks to Jehovah for the good things you are learning.
When we share in the field ministry, not only do we build faith in others but our own faith grows.
Like the early Christians, we learn to put full faith in Jehovah and speak boldly in any situation.
As we sense how Jehovah helps us in life and how he answers our prayers, our faith grows.
This was true of Caleb and Joshua.
They showed faith in Jehovah when they spied out the Promised Land.
However, as they saw Jehovah’s direction at each turn in their life thereafter, their faith grew even more.
No wonder Joshua spoke so strongly to the Israelites, saying: Not one word out of all the good promises that Jehovah your God has spoken to you has failed.
He later added: Therefore, fear Jehovah and serve him with integrity and faithfulness.
As we taste Jehovah’s goodness, we too can develop such conviction.
In many lands, Bibles are expensive and not readily available, so just receiving a Bible is a great blessing.
A report from Rwanda stated: For a long time, many people with whom the brothers were studying had not progressed because they had no Bibles.
They could not afford to purchase the local church edition.
And they often could not clearly understand the meaning of certain verses, which hindered their progress.
Things changed when the New World Translation in their language became available.
A Rwandan family with four teenagers said: We really thank Jehovah and the faithful and discreet slave for giving us this Bible.
We are very poor and had no money to purchase Bibles for every member of the family.
But now each of us has his own Bible.
To show our gratitude to Jehovah, we read the Bible as a family every day.
Christian parents have few joys like that of watching their child get baptized.
It was a highly emotional experience for us.
We were, of course, grateful that our children wanted to serve Jehovah, says Berenice, whose four children were baptized before they turned 14.
But, she adds, we also knew that as teenagers our children would face many challenges.
One expert on child development states: Adolescence is not a period of being crazy or immature.
It is an essential time of emotional intensity, social engagement, and creativity.
While they are teenagers, your children can develop a more meaningful friendship with Jehovah, set and pursue goals in the ministry, and use more initiative as they make their dedication and live up to it.
They may find adolescence to be a rewarding time of spiritual growth, even as Jesus did when he was young.
David may have written that regarding the time when Absalom tried to usurp the throne while David was ill and unable to handle the situation.
Despite having received God’s forgiveness, David did not forget his own sin with Bath-sheba and its consequences.
Still, the king was sure that God would sustain him on his sickbed.
David did not pray for God to heal him miraculously.
The context suggests that David asked Jehovah to help him in the same way that He would help an individual who showed consideration to a lowly one.
That included being sustained on his sickbed.
Because David’s sin had been forgiven, he could ask that God would comfort and support him and that the physical resources of his body might enable him to recover.
We can do likewise.
We can be sure that Jehovah appreciates every effort that we make to serve him.
He understands any insecurities or self-doubts that we may have.
He shows us compassion if financial burdens weigh us down or our health or emotions tend to limit our sacred service.
And we can have full confidence in Jehovah’s tender regard for what his servants do to stay faithful to him.
Bear in mind, too, that we can approach the Hearer of prayer with the confidence that he will give attention to our concerns.
The Father of tender mercies and the God of all comfort will unstintingly give us the emotional and spiritual support that we need, perhaps doing so by means of our fellow worshippers.
It touches Jehovah’s heart when we show compassion toward others.
And he promises to reward that kindness.
Those Christians were still alive on earth, so how could that be said of them?
God applied the ransom to Paul and others of his day.
Thus Jehovah forgave their sins, anointed them with holy spirit, and called them to be his spiritual sons.
Then they had the heavenly hope.
If they proved faithful, they would live and rule with Christ in heaven.
But Paul could speak of them while they were still alive and serving God on earth as having died with reference to sin.
He used the example of Jesus, who died as a human and then was raised up as an immortal spirit in heaven.
Death was no longer master over Jesus.
It was similar with anointed Christians, who could consider themselves dead with reference to sin but living with reference to God by Christ Jesus.
Their way of life was not as it once was.
They were no longer obeying the dictates or impulses of their sinful desires.
They had died to that previous way of life.
Gideon readily acknowledged his modest background and credentials.
After he accepted Jehovah’s assignment, Gideon made sure that he thoroughly understood what was required, and he looked to Jehovah for guidance.
Gideon was bold and courageous.
Yet, he acted with caution and shrewdness.
He did not seize upon his assignment to gain prominence.
Rather, as soon as he could, he gladly returned to his former place.
Being modest does not mean that we should never reach out for or accept additional privileges of service.
The Scriptures encourage all of us to make advancement.
Does this always require a change of assignment though?
Not necessarily.
With Jehovah’s blessing, we can make spiritual progress in whatever role we are currently serving.
We can continue to cultivate our God-given abilities and expand in doing good works.
An important way in which we show gratitude for the ransom is by dedicating ourselves to Jehovah on the basis of our faith in the ransom and getting baptized.
Our baptism shows that we belong to Jehovah.
Since everything Jehovah does is influenced by love, it is his will that all his worshippers display love as their dominant quality.
We prove that we desire to be sons of our Father who is in the heavens by loving our neighbor.
The command to love our neighbor is second only to the command to love Jehovah.
We can show such love for neighbor by obeying the command to preach the good news of God’s Kingdom.
As we show love for fellow humans, we reflect God’s glory.
In fact, love for God is made perfect in us when we obey the command to love others, especially our brothers.
The July 15, 2013, issue of The Watchtower explained that the faithful and discreet slave is a small group of anointed brothers who make up the Governing Body.
The Governing Body makes important decisions collectively.
How so?
The members meet weekly, which fosters close communication and unity.
Each year, they rotate chairmanship at those meetings, since no member of the Governing Body is considered to be more important than the other members.
Each of the six committees of the Governing Body rotate chairmanship in the same way.
And each member of that body views himself, not as the leader of his fellow brothers, but as one of the domestics, fed by the faithful slave and subject to its oversight.
The Governing Body is neither inspired nor infallible.
Therefore, it can err in doctrinal matters or in organizational direction.
Before receiving this personal witness from God’s spirit, anointed Christians cherished an earthly hope.
They longed for the time when Jehovah would cleanse this earth, and they wanted to be part of that blessed future.
Perhaps they even pictured themselves welcoming back their loved ones from the grave.
They looked forward to living in the homes that they built and eating the fruitage of trees that they planted.
Why did their thinking change?
They did not become dissatisfied with that hope.
They did not change their mind because of emotional stress or turmoil.
They did not give up on this earth, as if they suddenly felt that they would find living forever on earth to be tiresome or boring; nor did they merely want to explore some new frontier in heaven.
Rather, they changed because of the operation of God’s spirit that not only called, or invited, them but also changed their thinking and hope.
Jehovah is the Supreme One, the Creator of all things, the One possessing infinite wisdom and power.
Job came to understand that.
After Jehovah questioned Job about His works of creation, Job replied: I know that you are able to do all things and that nothing you have in mind to do is impossible for you.
Though Jehovah can accomplish whatever he sets out to do—without assistance—he has from the very beginning lovingly invited others to work along with him to achieve his purpose.
God’s first creation was his only-begotten spirit Son.
Jehovah allowed his Son to share in all further works of creation, both spirit and material.
Thus, Jehovah honored his Son both by including him in the works of creation and by telling others about his Son’s important role.
Jesus loved to talk about God’s Kingdom.
According to the Bible record, he spoke more about the Kingdom than about any other subject—referring to it more than 100 times during his ministry.
The Kingdom was truly dear to his heart.
Shortly after his resurrection, Jesus met with more than 500 prospective Kingdom proclaimers.
Perhaps it was on that occasion that he gave the command to take the Kingdom message to people of all the nations—a daunting task back then! This great work, Jesus foretold, would be carried on right up to the conclusion of the system of things, and that has proved to be the case.
Quite likely you are having a share in the fulfillment of that commission and prophecy.
And our God has equipped us with every good thing to help us fulfill that commission.
Jesus was convinced that the Bible is God’s Word, which provides the best guidance in life.
Following Jesus example, we must read the Bible daily, study it, and meditate on what we learn.
Along with general Bible study, dig into topics about which you may have questions.
To illustrate, you might increase your conviction that the end of this system of things really is near by studying in detail the Scriptural proof that we live in the last days.
Strengthen your trust in the Bible’s promises for the future by investigating its many prophecies that have already come true.
Develop your confidence in the practical value of the Bible by considering examples of how the Bible improves people’s lives.
You can also imitate Jesus by meditating on the wonderful promises Jehovah has made to you.
See these as God’s promises not just to mankind in general but to you personally.
For entertainment, many people view or practice things that the Bible identifies as violent, sexually immoral, spiritistic, or ungodly in other ways.
For instance, the Internet, television programs, movies, novels, and magazine articles often present violence and immorality in a favorable light.
Behavior once considered unacceptable has even been legalized in some places.
But that does not make such conduct acceptable to God.
In the first century, Jesus followers shunned unclean entertainment.
Because of this and their godly conduct in general, they were maligned and persecuted by others.
They are puzzled that you Christians do not continue running with them in the same decadent course of debauchery, wrote the apostle Peter, so they speak abusively of you.
Upon recognizing that Christ’s presence began in 1914, Jesus followers rightly prepared for a possible early arrival of the end.
They did so by intensifying their Kingdom-preaching work.
Jesus indicated that he might come later—at dawn or early in the morning.
If that happened, how were his followers to respond?
He said: Keep on the watch.
So a long wait would not justify mentally postponing the end or totally dismissing their expectations.
In the new world, we will have reason to reflect on the fact that all the foretold events associated with the conclusion of the system of things did indeed take place.
Meditating on how matters actually turned out will further strengthen our confidence in Jehovah and his promises yet to be fulfilled.
We will surely be thankful that God, who has placed times and seasons in his own jurisdiction, exhorted us to live with an awareness that the end of all things had drawn close.
’—.
Some may feel that it does not matter what we choose to do.
To make wise decisions that please Jehovah, however, we must consider the laws and principles found in his written Word and comply with them.
For instance, to have God’s approval, we must act in harmony with his law on blood.
Prayer will help us to make decisions that relate to Scriptural principles and laws.
Weighty personal decisions can have quite a bearing on our spiritual health and welfare.
Every choice we make will likely affect our relationship with Jehovah—either for good or for bad.
A good decision will strengthen our relationship with God, whereas a bad one may damage it.
Moreover, a poor decision could injure others spiritually by disturbing, or even stumbling, them or by disrupting the unity of the congregation.
Indeed, our personal decisions do matter.
Does spending our time preparing for God’s new world mean forfeiting a better or more fulfilling way of life today?
By no means! Serving Jehovah is the most satisfying way of life there is.
It is not a matter of servitude under duress just so that we can pass through the great tribulation.
It is the way we are designed to live, the way that yields the greatest joy.
Having Jehovah’s guidance and experiencing his loyal love are far better than life apart from intimacy with him.
Of course, we need not wait for the new world in order to enjoy spiritual blessings that result from wholehearted service to Jehovah—they are available to us right now! Indeed, some of us have been reaping such blessings for decades, and we know from experience that no other life course could produce greater satisfaction.
In our preaching work, we meet with varied responses—some favorable, some hostile.
Regardless of how people react, however, God’s Word shows the standard that his servants must maintain.
When we make a defense before everyone who demands of us a reason for our hope, we do so with a mild temper and deep respect because we are motivated by neighbor love.
We show love of neighbor even if our message is rejected by an angry householder who berates us.
We imitate Jesus: When he was being insulted, he did not insult in return.
When he was suffering, he did not threaten, but he entrusted himself to the One Jehovah who judges righteously.
Whether we are with fellow believers or others, we show humility and apply the counsel: Do not pay back injury for injury or insult for insult.
Instead, repay with a blessing.
Jehovah helped the Israelites to defeat the Amalekites and the Ethiopians, and he gave Nehemiah and his associates the power to complete the rebuilding work.
God will similarly give us strength to stand firm against opposition, apathy, and anxiety so that we can carry out our preaching work.
We do not expect Jehovah to perform miracles for us.
Rather, we should do our part.
That includes our reading God’s Word daily, preparing for and attending the meetings weekly, feeding our mind and heart through personal study and family worship, and always relying on Jehovah in prayer.
Let us never allow other pursuits and activities to interfere with the means that Jehovah uses to strengthen and encourage us.
If you sense that your hands have dropped down in any of these areas, ask for God’s help.
Then see how his spirit energizes you, giving you both the desire and the power to act.
Some get up early in the morning to read, meditate, and pray.
Others do so during their lunch break.
You might find that this can be done early in the evening or before you go to bed.
Some enjoy reading the Bible in the morning and again before retiring.
Thus they read it day and night, or regularly.
The important thing is to buy out time from less important things for daily meditation on God’s Word.
God’s Word repeatedly promises blessings to all who meditate on it and who strive to apply what they learn.
Happy are those hearing the word of God and keeping it, said Jesus.
Most important, meditating on spiritual things each day will help us to bring honor to the Grand Creator of our marvelous brain, and he will reward us with happiness now and everlasting life in his righteous new world.
We have ample reason to believe that Jehovah is active in people’s lives today.
Time and again, we have heard experiences of how individuals prayed for spiritual help and then received it.
While preaching from house to house on a small island in the Philippines, Allan met a woman who started to cry.
He states: Just that morning, she prayed to Jehovah that his Witnesses would find her.
God answered her prayer so quickly that she was visibly moved.
Within a year, she dedicated her life to Jehovah.
Many of God’s servants have seen evidence of his help when they broke free from such addictive habits as smoking, drug abuse, or the viewing of pornography.
Some say that they repeatedly tried to stop on their own but were not successful.
However, when they turned to Jehovah for help, he supplied the power beyond what is normal, and they finally conquered their weakness.
Genuine love and unity identify Jehovah’s servants as the ones who practice the true religion, for Jesus said: By this all will know that you are my disciples—if you have love among yourselves.
And the apostle John wrote: The children of God and the children of the Devil are evident by this fact: Whoever does not practice righteousness does not originate with God, nor does the one who does not love his brother.
For this is the message that you have heard from the beginning, that we should love one another.
Love that results in extraordinary unity marks Jehovah’s Witnesses as Christ’s true followers, the ones whom God is using to serve his purpose to have the good news of the Kingdom preached in all the inhabited earth.
The apostle Peter meant well when he urged Jesus to be kind to himself in order not to be killed.
Jesus, however, knew that Peter’s comment reflected faulty thinking.
To help him and the other disciples, Jesus gave frank counsel, stated the consequences of a self-sparing attitude, and outlined the blessings of a self-sacrificing spirit.
Peter learned the lesson.
Pray to Jehovah to give you insight so that you can understand where your teenager needs help.
For example, what might indicate that your child’s faith is wavering?
Perhaps his joy is waning, he is speaking critically of fellow believers, or he has become secretive.
Do not hastily conclude that these are signs of a double life involving serious sin.
On the other hand, do not ignore such signs or dismiss your teenager’s isolation as a mere phase.
Having soundness of mind, or being sober-minded, should certainly come into play when the explanation of a diagnostic method or therapy seems strange or mysterious.
Can the practitioner or the one promoting it explain satisfactorily how it works?
Is it in accord with known facts, and do numerous qualified people view it as credible?
Or is the main appeal to the emotions?
Perhaps the claim is that it was discovered or used in a distant or remote place, as if hidden from modern research.
Does such a claim prove anything or even seem reasonable?
Some diagnostic devices or forms of treatment are described as using a secret substance or body force.
That warrants serious caution because God warned against the use of magical power and spirit mediums.
Since cultures and religious beliefs vary greatly, we need to be discerning when it comes to choosing the right time to speak.
And there are many occasions when we may need to discern that.
For example, someone may offend us, even with well-intentioned words.
It would be prudent on our part to take time to reflect on whether the matter is serious enough to say something.
If we must speak, it would not be wise to approach the offender when we are upset and perhaps might speak a bit rashly.
Similarly, we need to be discerning when speaking about the truth to our unbelieving relatives.
We want them to come to know Jehovah, but we must be patient and perceptive.
Speaking the right words at the right time may help to open their hearts.
When we work along with those we love, we draw close to them and come to know their personality and their qualities.
We learn not only what they want to accomplish but also how they go about doing it.
Jesus worked along with Jehovah for perhaps billions of years, and they forged a strong, unbreakable bond of love and affection for each other.
They enjoyed a wonderful unity, always working together in full harmony.
In prayer, Jesus asked Jehovah to watch over his disciples.
The reason?
He prayed: So that they may be one just as we are one.
As we conform to God’s standards and share in the work of preaching, we come to understand his appealing qualities.
We learn why it is wise to trust in him and to follow his direction.
As we draw close to God, he draws close to us.
We also draw close to our spiritual brothers and sisters because we face similar challenges and joys and because we share the same goals.
Naomi is determined to press on to her homeland, Israel.
With her is Ruth, who faces what may be the most important decision of her life.
She can either go home to her people in Moab or stick with her mother-in-law, Naomi, and travel to Bethlehem.
Ruth could easily have reasoned that she had a family there in Moab—a mother and other relatives who would take a young widow in and help provide for her.
Moab was her homeland.
Its culture was her culture, its language her language, its people her people.
Naomi could promise her no such advantages in Bethlehem.
In fact, she advised Ruth to stay in Moab.
Naomi feared that she could provide neither a husband nor a home for her daughters-in-law.
What would Ruth do?
Note the contrast between her and Orpah, who returned to her people and her gods.
Did Ruth want to return to the false gods of her people?
No, she did not.
Jehovah displayed his power through Jesus Christ in extraordinary ways.
The four Gospels provide faith-strengthening details about some of the miracles that Christ performed.
Likely, he performed many other miracles.
Yes, God’s power was manifested in Jesus.
For good reason, then, the apostle Paul could say about him: Christ is the power of God.
Yet, what bearing can Jesus miracles have on our life?
The apostle Peter said that Jesus performed miracles, or wonders.
The powerful works that Jesus did on earth were foregleams of even grander blessings to come under his kingly rule.
They foreshadow the miracles that Jesus will perform in God’s new world on a global scale! His miracles also give us tremendous insight into his personality and that of his Father.
Abraham had so much evidence to demonstrate the reality of what he hoped for that it was as if he could see what he had not actually beheld! Abraham’s faith in God’s promises strengthened his resolve to do the divine will.
Acting in faith, he left the city of Ur and refused to take up permanent residence in any of the cities of Canaan.
Like Ur, they had shaky foundations because of their ungodly governments.
For the rest of his long life, Abraham was awaiting the city having real foundations, whose designer and builder is God.
Abraham saw himself living in a permanent place governed by Jehovah.
Abel, Enoch, Noah, Abraham, and others like them believed in the resurrection of the dead and looked forward to life on earth under God’s Kingdom, the city having real foundations.
Reflecting on such blessings bolstered their faith in Jehovah.
Using the example of the human body, Paul focused on unity under the head of the congregation, Jesus Christ.
The apostle spoke of cooperating through every joint that gives what is needed.
How can each of us, whether young or old, strong or frail, contribute to the unity and spirituality of the congregation?
A key is to submit ourselves to and respect those whom Jesus has designated to provide direction in the congregation, the elders.
We may not always find this easy to do.
However, we can with confidence request God’s guidance.
His active force can help us to support the congregation arrangements wholeheartedly.
So if we on occasion do not feel inclined to follow the direction given, we should reflect on how our humbly cooperating will contribute to the unity in the congregation.
Furthermore, cooperating in matters like these will likely help all of us to grow in love.
As we near the end of this system of things, Satan wants us to relax our guard, to be kind to ourselves by carving out a niche in this world, thus losing our sense of urgency.
Do not let that happen to you! Instead, keep on the watch.
Never believe Satan’s deceptive propaganda that the end is far off—or that it is not coming at all.
Satan tries to have us believe that from God’s standpoint we are unlovable and our sins are unforgivable.
That is all part of Satan’s deceptive propaganda.
After all, who is particularly and really unlovable in Jehovah’s eyes?
It is Satan.
Who is really unforgivable?
Again, it is Satan.
But the Bible assures us: God is not unrighteous so as to forget your work and the love you showed for his name.
Jehovah appreciates our efforts to please him, and our service is not in vain.
So let us not be fooled by Satan’s deceptive propaganda.
Why does Jehovah not give us an immediate response to our every request?
Recall that he likens our relationship with him to that of children with a father.
A child cannot rightly expect a parent to grant every request or to do so right away.
Some of a child’s requests may be mere passing whims.
Others must wait till the time is right.
Still others may not be in the child’s best interests or in the best interests of others involved.
Furthermore, to concede immediately to a child’s every request would change the relationship to one of master and slave, the child being the master.
Similarly, Jehovah may in our best interests allow time to pass before his response to our prayers becomes evident.
That is his prerogative as our wise Creator, loving Master, and heavenly Father.
Fulfilling all our requests right away would distort the proper relationship between us and him.
When we read that Abraham was old and satisfied, let us not conclude that he had had his fill of life, so to speak, and had no desire to live in the future.
The Bible says of Abraham: He was awaiting the city having real foundations, whose designer and builder is God.
Can you imagine how thrilled Abraham will be to live in the earthly Paradise and go on strengthening his friendship with Jehovah?
How touched he will be to learn that his example of faith helped Jehovah’s servants throughout thousands of years after his death! In Paradise he will even learn that the way Isaac was restored to him was illustrative of something far greater.
And he will learn that the pain he suffered as he prepared to sacrifice Isaac has helped millions of faithful people to imagine Jehovah’s own pain as he provided his Son, Jesus Christ, as the ransom.
Some might be confused about the difference between dedication and baptism.
For example, some young people say that they have made a dedication to Jehovah but are not ready to get baptized.
Does that make sense?
Making a dedication means telling Jehovah that you will serve him forever.
At baptism, a person shows others that he is dedicated.
Therefore, baptism is a public expression of a private dedication that you have already made in prayer to Jehovah.
Before you get baptized, you need to be sure that you understand what dedication means.
Simply stated, when you dedicate your life to Jehovah, you give up ownership of yourself.
You promise Jehovah that you will put the doing of his will ahead of everything else in your life.
Any promise should be taken seriously, but how much more so a promise made to Jehovah God!—.
Our loyalty to Jehovah may be challenged if someone in a responsible position misjudges us.
Jonathan may have faced such a challenge.
King Saul, the anointed of God, was aware of his son’s friendship with David, but he did not understand the reason for it.
Saul humiliated Jonathan in an angry outburst.
However, Jonathan did not retaliate.
He did not waver in his loyalty to God or to David, who would in time become Israel’s king.
In congregations of Jehovah’s people today, it is very unlikely that we would be treated unjustly.
However, those taking the lead among us are imperfect men and could misinterpret our actions.
If we are ever misjudged or misunderstood, let us remain loyal to Jehovah.
To avoid spoiling our useful habits, we must not have as close associates those who practice bad things.
This applies not only to associating with unbelieving wrongdoers but also to associating with those who claim to worship Jehovah but who deliberately violate his laws.
If such professing Christians engage in serious wrongdoing and do not repent, we do not continue to associate with them.
If we were to associate with those who do not obey God’s laws, we might have the tendency to do what they do in order to be accepted by them.
For example, if we were to have close association with sexually immoral people, we might be tempted to practice immorality.
That has happened to some dedicated Christians, and some of them were disfellowshipped because they were not repentant.
Unless they repent, their condition can become like that described by Peter.
Satan is at war with the anointed remnant and the other sheep.
The Devil’s goal is to devour as many of Jehovah’s servants as he can in the short time that he has left.
Can we win our fight against Satan?
Yes! The Bible says: Oppose the Devil, and he will flee from you.
Many scoff at the idea that Satan even exists.
To them, Satan and the demons are fictional characters of novels, horror movies, and video games.
Such people feel that no intelligent person believes in wicked spirits.
Now, do you think that it bothers Satan that he and his invisible cohorts have been relegated to the world of folklore?
That is not likely! After all, it is easy for Satan to blind the minds of those who doubt that he exists.
Promoting the idea that spirits do not exist is one of the many ways that Satan uses to mislead people.
Saul urged Jonathan to pursue his own interests.
But loyalty to God moved Jonathan to befriend David rather than seek the advantages of the kingship for himself.
Jonathan did not go back on his promise to David; neither should we go back on our promises.
For example, if a business agreement becomes harder to honor than expected, our loyalty to God and regard for the Bible should move us to keep our word.
And what if our marriage proves to be more challenging than anticipated?
Love for God will surely move us to be loyal to our mate.
Also, let us prove our loyalty to Jehovah by being loyal to his people, even those who may disappoint us.
When we are loyal to Jehovah God in the face of challenging situations, we make his heart rejoice.
If we remain loyal to Jehovah, we will see how he eventually works everything out for the good of those who love him.
Imagine that a friend gives you a car as a gift.
He hands you the title and says: I will keep the keys.
And I will be the one who drives the car, not you.
How would you feel?
Now think about what Jehovah rightfully expects of a person who makes a dedication to him, a person who tells him: I am giving you my life.
I belong to you.
What if that person were to start living a double life, perhaps secretly dating an unbeliever?
What if he were to accept employment that crippled his whole-souled service in the ministry or attendance at Christian meetings?
Would that not be like keeping the keys to the car?
A person who dedicates himself to Jehovah is, in effect, saying: My life belongs to you more than to me.
If there is ever a conflict between what you want and what I am inclined to want, what you want will win—every time.
That would reflect the thinking of Jesus, as stated in today’s text.
To have Jehovah as our one and only God, we should give him our exclusive devotion.
Our worship of him cannot be divided or shared with any other gods nor tinged with ideas or practices from other forms of worship.
We must bear in mind that Jehovah is not just one among many gods; nor is he even the highest and most powerful among them.
Only Jehovah is to be worshipped.
To give Jehovah exclusive devotion, we must be careful not to allow anything to take, or even to share, the place in our life that Jehovah alone should occupy.
What might such things be?
In the Ten Commandments, Jehovah made clear that his people must have no other gods besides him and that they must not practice any form of idolatry.
Today, idolatry can take many forms, some of which might be hard to recognize.
But Jehovah’s requirements have not changed—he is still one Jehovah.
In this time of the end, Jehovah’s people have been commissioned to preach this good news of the Kingdom in all the inhabited earth for a witness to all the nations.
The message we spread is also the good news of the undeserved kindness of God because all the blessings we hope to receive under Kingdom rule come to us through Jehovah’s kindness expressed by means of Christ.
Do we individually imitate Paul in showing gratitude for Jehovah’s undeserved kindness by zealously sharing in the ministry?
As sinners, we benefit from Jehovah’s undeserved kindness in many ways.
We therefore owe it to all people to do our utmost to make known to them how Jehovah is expressing his love and how they can benefit from it personally.
When Peter asked whether we should forgive up to seven times, Jesus replied: I say to you, not up to seven times, but up to 77 times.
Clearly, Jesus meant that we should always be willing to forgive; this should be our first and predominant leaning.
It is wise to remember that since we all have faults, we may be offending others.
If we discern that we have done so, the Bible’s direction is to go to the one whom we have offended and try to reconcile matters.
We appreciate it when others do not hold our faults against us, so we should act the same way toward them.
If we practice forgiving others, Jehovah will forgive us.
Yes, when it comes to handling the faults of others, the Christian course is to imitate our merciful Father’s dealings with us when we make mistakes.
The Bible informs us that scrolls will be opened to give us directions in new world living.
By studying these, all people, including resurrected ones, will be able to know God’s will for them.
These scrolls will surely give us further insight into Jehovah’s mind.
Guided by an ever-increasing understanding of God’s inspired Word along with what will be revealed in the new scrolls, inhabitants of the earthly Paradise will certainly treat their fellow man with love, respect, and dignity.
Imagine the educational program that will be carried out under the direction of the King, Jesus Christ! Everlasting life awaits those who respond favorably to the things written in the scrolls.
Those who maintain integrity to God through the final test will have their name written permanently by Jehovah in the scroll of life.
Experienced elders stress the importance of beginning to train brothers when they are young—in their early teens—by giving them assignments in the congregation that fit their age.
Such early training will help young ones to keep their eyes on spiritual goals when they reach the late teens and are bombarded with many distractions.
An elder will also stimulate a learner’s desire to serve by explaining to him not only what to do but also why to do it.
By giving reasons, elders will be imitating the Great Teacher, Jesus.
For example, before giving his apostles the commission to make disciples, Jesus gave them a reason why they should obey.
He stated: All authority has been given me in heaven and on the earth.
Then he added: Go, therefore, and make disciples of people of all the nations.
The Bible says that Jehovah’s people, including young ones, will offer themselves willingly for his service.
So a person who is contemplating baptism needs to be sure that this is his or her personal desire.
That might call for self-scrutiny on your part.
Why?
Because your circumstance as a youth may be somewhat special.
For example, you may have been raised in the truth.
Over the years, you have likely seen many people get baptized—including some of your peers and perhaps even your siblings.
If that is indeed your situation, what should you be careful about?
Be alert that you do not come to view baptism as little more than a coming-of-age custom that all young people follow sooner or later.
What can you do to make sure that you will keep the right view of Jehovah’s arrangement of baptism?
Take time often to stop and think about the reasons why getting baptized is so important.
Although God had anointed Saul to be king, Saul later became disobedient and was rejected by Jehovah.
Since God did not immediately remove Saul from the throne, his misconduct tested his subjects and all who were close to him.
They faced the challenge of being loyal to God while the king, who sat on Jehovah’s throne, followed a wayward course.
Yet, Saul’s son Jonathan proved to be loyal to Jehovah.
We too can prove ourselves loyal to Jehovah by being in relative subjection to the superior authorities, as God requires, even if some seem unworthy of respect.
For example, a government official may be corrupt, but we still respect his position because we are in relative subjection to governmental superior authorities.
In fact, all of us can prove loyal to Jehovah by respecting those to whom he gives authority.
Our ability to form mental pictures of things we have not seen is a gift from God.
It allows us to make wise plans and to look forward to good things.
Jehovah can foresee future events, and in the Scriptures he often tells us ahead of time what will happen.
We may be able to form mental pictures of what will occur.
In fact, our ability to conceive of unseen things helps us to exercise faith.
When Hannah spent time thinking about what it would be like when she took her son Samuel to serve at the tabernacle, she had a basis for her mental picture.
It was based on what she had resolved to do, and this helped her to focus on her objective.
If we visualize what God has promised to do, we are thinking about something that will definitely happen.
No doubt, many faithful people of Bible times formed mental pictures of things God had promised.
When Jesus was born, Satan knew that this newborn child would grow up to become the promised Messiah.
Would Satan reason that taking the life of a baby was going too far?
Satan has no noble code of ethics.
And with regard to the child Jesus, Satan did not hesitate to act.
How?
King Herod was greatly upset when astrologers inquired about the one born king of the Jews, and he was determined to kill him.
To make sure that the job was done, he ordered the execution of all boys two years of age and younger who were living in Bethlehem and its districts.
Jesus escaped death in that unimaginable slaughter, but what does this tell us about our enemy Satan?
It is evident that the Devil places no value on human life.
He certainly does not have a soft spot for children.
Satan truly is a roaring lion.
Some elders may find it hard to set aside time for training others.
Perhaps they think: Training is important, but it is not as urgent as other congregation matters that simply cannot wait.
If I have to postpone training for a while, the congregation will continue to function.
Though it is true that numerous matters require an elder’s immediate attention, delaying training may harm the spiritual well-being of the congregation.
Elders care for many important tasks that have to be handled promptly.
But if elders keep postponing necessary training, sooner or later the congregation will lack sufficient qualified brothers to care for all that needs to be done.
Clearly, then, we should guard against thinking that training is of low priority.
Elders who take a long-range view and invest their time in training less experienced brothers are wise stewards and a true blessing to the entire congregation.
Picture the Israelites in Bible times praising Jehovah during a festival at his temple in Jerusalem.
They would have prepared for the journey, cared for one another’s needs en route, and then been united in worship at the temple.
All of this called for cooperation.
As we continue our journey toward the new world, we too need to be harmoniously joined together and cooperating.
Think of what blessings await us! We have already left behind the disunity and confusion marking the present system of things.
We now see being fulfilled what both Isaiah and Micah foretold—God’s people are unitedly going up to the mountain of Jehovah.
Indeed, how elevated our form of worship is in the final part of the days.
Once a new Kingdom Hall is built, it needs to be kept clean and tidy to reflect the qualities and personality of the God whom we worship—a God of order.
The Bible associates holiness and spiritual cleanness with physical cleanliness.
Thus, if people desire to be acceptable to Jehovah, they must also practice good hygiene.
In harmony with these principles, we should always feel comfortable inviting interested people to our meetings, confident that the condition of the hall will complement the good news we share with them.
They will see that we worship a God who is holy and who will soon transform the earth into an uncontaminated paradise.
Whatever the local situation, our Kingdom Hall should be exemplary when it comes to being well-kept, since it bears the name of Jehovah and is a place of pure worship.
Do we regularly petition God to help us maintain our integrity when we are faced with temptation?
Our upbringing or our past conduct may have developed in us a liking for practices that Jehovah condemns.
Even then, he can help us to bring about necessary changes so that we can continue to serve him acceptably.
King David recognized this.
After he had committed adultery with Bath-sheba, David implored Jehovah: Create in me a pure heart, and put within me a new spirit, a steadfast one.
Sinful conduct may strongly appeal to our fallen flesh, but Jehovah can stir within us a willing spirit, the desire to obey him.
Even if wrong desires are deeply rooted and tend to crowd out our chaste thoughts, Jehovah can guide our steps so that we can obey his commandments and succeed in living by them.
He can prevent anything harmful from dominating us.
Jesus fully understands earth’s ecology.
He knows how to use, manage, and distribute earth’s resources fairly and properly.
When on earth, Jesus showed that he is the power of God by exercising control over the forces of nature.
Picture the scene: Christ is exhausted from his demanding ministry.
The waves are pounding the ship, hurling spray and foam into the boat.
Yet, despite the noise of the storm and the violent pitching of the boat, Jesus continues to sleep.
His body needs rest.
The frightened disciples wake Jesus up and exclaim: We are about to perish! Rousing himself, Jesus commands the wind and the sea with the words: Hush! Be quiet! and the raging wind stops.
Jesus is, in effect, commanding the wind and the sea to be quiet and to stay that way.
The result?
A great calm set in.
As children of the first man, Adam, we have all inherited sin and its penalty, death.
Not one of us can say, I do not need the ransom.
Even the most faithful servant of God is completely dependent on Jehovah’s undeserved kindness through Christ.
Each of us must recognize that we have been forgiven an enormous debt.
What should Jehovah’s love and mercy compel us to do?
If we are harboring some resentment against any of our brothers or sisters, we should imitate Jehovah, who is ready to forgive.
If we appreciate what Jehovah has done for us in canceling our own enormous debt, then we will want to forgive others from our heart.
We simply cannot receive the love and forgiveness of God unless we love and forgive others.
While it is true that forgiving will not change the past, it will certainly change our future for the good.
Jesus said the above words to help Peter and other disciples to imagine the future.
They could thus contemplate their role in the government that would rule over the earth and bring grand blessings to obedient mankind.
Jehovah’s earthly servants have always benefited from thinking about the fulfillment of divine promises.
Abel knew enough about God’s purposes to envision a better future, exercise faith, and embrace a reliable hope.
Abraham’s outstanding acts of faith were possible because he saw something about the fulfillment of God’s prophecy concerning the promised offspring.
Moses looked intently toward the payment of the reward, acting in faith and growing in love for Jehovah.
Our own faith in God and love for him can help us to envision what Jehovah has promised.
Jehovah had complete confidence in his only-begotten Son, who had been faithful to him in heaven for countless ages.
On earth, Jesus maintained his integrity and upheld Jehovah’s sovereignty under the severest of tests, dying as a faithful servant of his Father.
How grateful we should be that by his death, Jesus also paid the ransom price needed to redeem mankind and open the way to everlasting life in God’s promised new world! The apostle John wrote: By this the love of God was revealed in our case, that God sent his only-begotten Son into the world so that we might gain life through him.
The love is in this respect, not that we have loved God, but that he loved us and sent his Son as a propitiatory sacrifice for our sins.
Older ones in our midst remember when congregations had a congregation servant rather than a body of elders, when countries had a branch servant rather than a Branch Committee, and when direction was given by the president of the Watch Tower Society rather than by a clearly established Governing Body of Jehovah’s Witnesses.
Although all these devoted brothers were supported by faithful assistants, one person was basically responsible for making decisions in the congregations, at the branch offices, and at world headquarters.
During the 1970’s, adjustments were made to put the responsibility for oversight on groups of elders rather than on individuals.
These adjustments were based on increased knowledge about the pattern set in the Scriptures.
Instead of having the influence of one individual dominate, the composite good qualities of all the gifts in men whom Jehovah has provided benefit the organization.
God’s Word counsels us not to be hasty when we need to make an important decision.
When we take the time to weigh carefully all the aspects or facts related to a decision, we will likely be more successful.
Before determining a course of action, a family head ought to take the time to research the Scriptures and Christian publications, as well as to consider the opinions or views of others in his family.
Recall that God urged Abraham to listen to what his wife had to say.
Elders too should take time to do research.
And if they are reasonable, modest men, they will not fear losing respect if new, relevant information comes to their attention that indicates a need to reconsider what they had already decided.
They should be ready to adjust their thinking and decisions when appropriate, and all of us do well to follow that example.
This can promote peace and order in the congregation.
Josiah was zealous in doing what pleased God.
Like Josiah, young ones should start to seek Jehovah from an early age.
Repentant King Manasseh may have taught Josiah about God’s mercy.
Young ones, draw close to faithful older ones in your family and in the congregation and learn how good Jehovah has been to them.
Also, remember that the reading of the Scriptures touched Josiah’s heart and moved him to take action.
Your reading of the Word of God may move you to take action that will increase your happiness and strengthen your friendship with God as well as spur you on to help others to search for God.
A study of the Bible may also help you to notice ways that you can improve in your service to God.
If you do, apply yourself, just as Josiah did.
It is up to each of us to make decisions, and the wise, right choices are based on sound Scriptural knowledge.
We should not give someone else the responsibility to make decisions for us.
Rather, we should personally learn what is right in God’s eyes and choose to do it.
How might we give in to the danger of letting others choose for us?
Peer pressure could sway us to make a bad decision.
Still, no matter how others try to pressure us, it is our responsibility to follow our Bible-trained conscience.
In many respects, if we let others make our decisions, we are essentially deciding to follow them.
It is still a choice, but a potentially disastrous one.
The apostle Paul clearly alerted the Galatians to the danger of letting others make personal decisions for them.
Some in the congregation wanted to make personal choices for others in order to alienate them from the apostles.
If a problem arises, we ought to consider what Bible principles are involved and apply them in a balanced way.
For example, a sister knows that she has the responsibility to preach the good news.
However, suppose she plans to go out in the field service on a certain day, but her unbelieving husband wants her to stay home.
He says that they have not had much time together lately, and he would like them to do something as a couple.
She might consider relevant Bible texts, such as obeying God and the command to make disciples.
But she also needs to think about wifely subjection and being reasonable.
Is her husband completely opposed to her going out in service, or is he asking her to do something else just that one day?
We need balance as we seek to do God’s will and strive to have a good conscience.
The apostle John warned that if anyone loves the things in the world—the desire of the flesh and the desire of the eyes and the showy display of one’s means of life—then the love of the Father is not in him.
This means that we need to examine our heart constantly to see if it is being enticed by worldly entertainment, associations, and styles of dress and grooming.
Or the love of the world might involve efforts to attain great things, such as through the pursuit of higher education.
We stand at the threshold of the promised new world.
Thus, how important it is that we keep well in mind Moses powerful words at ! If we clearly understand and firmly believe that Jehovah our God is one Jehovah, we will do all we can to give him exclusive devotion, serving him as he approves.
How can we train our conscience?
Key ways are by regularly and prayerfully studying the Bible, meditating on what we read, and then putting into practice what we have learned.
Obviously, this involves more than accumulating facts and learning rules.
Our study of the Bible should gradually give us an ever more precise picture of Jehovah, his personality, his qualities, and what he likes or dislikes.
Our conscience becomes attuned to the ways of Jehovah God.
This should stir our heart, moving us to want to become more and more like him.
However, if we cannot understand the conscientious decision of a fellow believer on some personal matter, we should not quickly judge him or feel that we ought to pressure him to change his mind.
Perhaps his conscience is still weak and in need of more training or is too sensitive on certain issues.
Will the destruction of the religions of Babylon the Great result in the death of all the former members of those religions?
Apparently not.
Some of the clergy will abandon their religious course and deny that they were ever part of those false religions.
How will God’s people fare at that time?
Jesus explains: In fact, unless those days were cut short, no flesh would be saved; but on account of the chosen ones those days will be cut short.
In 66 C.
, the tribulation was cut short.
This allowed the chosen ones, anointed Christians, to flee the city and its environs.
Likewise, the initial part of the future great tribulation will be cut short because of the chosen ones.
The political ten horns will not be allowed to annihilate God’s people.
Rather, there will be a brief respite.
Note the case of King Jehoshaphat of Judah.
On one occasion, Jehoshaphat unwisely agreed to accompany King Ahab of Israel in a military venture.
Although 400 false prophets assured wicked Ahab of success, Jehovah’s true prophet Micaiah foretold certain defeat.
Ahab died in battle, and Jehoshaphat barely escaped with his life.
Upon returning to Jerusalem, he was reproved for allying himself with Ahab.
Even so, Jehu, the son of Hanani the visionary, told Jehoshaphat: There are good things that have been found in you.
Yes, Jehoshaphat committed a foolish act, but Jehovah was not blind to the good things he had done.
This Bible account provides a reminder that despite our human imperfection, Jehovah will have enduring love for us if we wholeheartedly seek to please him.
How might we prepare now for life in God’s new world?
Well, suppose we were planning to move to another country.
How could we prepare for that change?
We might start learning the language of the people who live there.
Learning about their customs would be beneficial.
We might sample some of their foods.
To a certain extent, we would begin to live as if we were already residents of that land.
After all, that is the way we expect to live once we arrive there.
Similarly, we can prepare for life in the new world by living now, to the extent possible, as we expect to live then.
Independence and an unreasonable insistence on personal preference may be highly regarded by some, but what has been the result?
Failure to accept God’s direction has led to suffering, misery, even tragedy.
Christians have to train their mind and conscience to respond appropriately when neutrality-related issues arise.
Take, for example, Mirjeta from a region of the former Yugoslavia.
She was raised to hate Serbians.
On learning that Jehovah is impartial and that Satan is responsible for inciting ethnic problems, she strove to rid herself of nationalistic sentiments.
Yet, when ethnic violence broke out in her area, old hatreds began to resurface in her, causing Mirjeta to find it difficult to preach to Serbs.
She realized, though, that she could not just sit back and hope that such unwholesome feelings would go away.
She begged Jehovah for help to overcome this challenge.
I have found that focusing on the ministry is the best help ever, she says.
In the ministry, I try to imitate Jehovah’s loving personality, and I have seen my negative feelings melt away.
Brothers traveling on behalf of the governing body shared the decrees that had been decided on by the apostles and the elders who were in Jerusalem.
As congregations observed those decrees, they continued to be made firm in the faith and to increase in number day by day.
What should we do when we receive direction from God’s organization today?
Jehovah’s own Book directs all of us to be obedient and submissive.
A critical or rebellious spirit has no place in God’s organization, for such an attitude could disrupt our loving, peaceful, and united congregations.
Of course, no loyal Christian would want to display a disrespectful and disloyal spirit like that of Diotrephes.
The Greek verb translated reaching out means stretching to grasp something, perhaps something beyond your normal reach.
In using that word, the apostle Paul stressed that spiritual progress requires effort.
Imagine a brother thinking about his future in the congregation.
He may not now be serving as a ministerial servant, but he realizes that he needs to cultivate spiritual qualities.
First, he strives to qualify as a ministerial servant.
In time, he hopes to be spiritually qualified to serve as an overseer.
In each case, he works hard to meet the qualifications needed to care for added responsibility in the congregation.
In like manner, brothers and sisters who desire to serve as pioneers, as Bethelites, or as Kingdom Hall construction volunteers do well to stretch forward to attain their goals.
Imagine how Nehemiah must have felt when he went to Jerusalem.
The city was almost defenseless, and his fellow Jews were very discouraged.
The threats from foreign opposers caused the Jews to slacken their hands, to cease rebuilding Jerusalem’s walls.
Did Nehemiah allow that situation to cause him to drop his hands in discouragement too?
No! Like Moses, Asa, and other faithful servants of Jehovah, Nehemiah had already developed a pattern of relying on Jehovah in prayer.
And this time was no different.
In the face of what to the Jews might have seemed overwhelming obstacles, Jehovah responded to Nehemiah’s sincere plea for help.
God used his great power and mighty hand to strengthen the Jews drooping hands.
A great blessing that comes to us through Jehovah’s undeserved kindness is comfort for a distressed heart.
To Christians in Thessalonica, who were experiencing persecution, Paul wrote the words found in today’s text.
How comforting it is to be aware of the loving care that we receive from Jehovah because of his generous kindness! As sinners, on our own we would have no hope.
But Jehovah provides us with a wonderful hope.
Jesus promised his followers: This is the will of my Father, that everyone who recognizes the Son and exercises faith in him should have everlasting life.
Yes, the hope of eternal life is a gift, a wonderful expression of God’s undeserved kindness.
Paul, who certainly appreciated that fact, said: The undeserved kindness of God has been manifested, bringing salvation to all sorts of people.
For a while, the apostle Peter harbored prejudice against non-Jews, but he gradually learned to eradicate negative views from his heart.
Likewise, if we detect any trace of prejudice or racial pride in us, we should make a conscious effort to root it out of our heart.
We might reflect on the fact that none of us deserve salvation; we are all imperfect humans, regardless of our nationality.
So why should we feel superior to anyone else?
We should have a view like that of the apostle Paul, who admonished his fellow anointed Christians that they were no longer strangers and foreigners, but members of the household of God.
Earnest effort to overcome prejudiced views regarding those who are of a different background will certainly help us to put on the new personality.
You saw a lot of casual clothing, especially when it was hot, reported a Dutch newspaper regarding a meeting of church leaders.
That is not the case at the convention of Jehovah’s Witnesses.
Indeed, Jehovah’s Witnesses are often commended for adorning themselves in respectable dress, with modesty and good judgment in the way that is proper for those professing devotion to God.
The apostle Paul was speaking about women, but the same basic standard applies to Christian men.
Appropriate standards of dress are important to us as Jehovah’s people, and they are important to the God we worship.
What the Scriptures say about dress and grooming leaves no doubt that the Sovereign of the universe has wholesome standards of attire for his true worshippers.
Therefore, our choice of dress and grooming should take into account what is pleasing to the Sovereign Lord Jehovah.
In his letters, Paul spoke highly of his fellow Christians.
He had traveled with some of them for years and undoubtedly knew their faults, but he said good things about them.
For instance, Paul described Timothy as his beloved and faithful child in the Lord, one who would genuinely care for the concerns of other Christians.
The apostle commended Titus to the Corinthian congregation as my companion and a fellow worker for your interests.
How encouraged Timothy and Titus must have been to learn what Paul thought of them! Paul and Barnabas risked their lives by going back to places where they had suffered violent attacks.
For instance, even though they had faced fanatic opposition in Lystra, they returned there in order to encourage new disciples to remain in the faith.
In Ephesus, after Paul faced an angry crowd, he encouraged the disciples there.
Jesus joyfully worked alongside his Father, rejoicing both in what he accomplished and in the knowledge that Jehovah was fond of him.
What, though, about us?
Jesus said that there is happiness both in giving and in receiving.
It brought us joy to receive the truth, and it brings us joy to share the truth with others.
As we share Bible truths with others, we see spiritually hungry ones filled with delight as they begin to understand and appreciate our God and the precious truths contained in his Word.
It touches our heart to see them make changes not just in their thinking but also in their way of life.
We realize that the work of sharing the good news is vitally important.
It opens the way to everlasting life for those who become reconciled to God.
It is vital that we resist being affected by the world’s strongly entrenched things.
These include its doctrines, philosophies, and harmful practices, such as committing immorality, using tobacco, and abusing alcohol and drugs.
And we must constantly fight against our fleshly weaknesses and discouragement.
Is it really possible to defeat such powerful opponents?
Yes, but not without a struggle.
Drawing on the example of a boxer of ancient times, Paul said of himself: The way I am aiming my blows is so as not to be striking the air.
Just as a boxer fights off his opponent, we must fend off our enemies.
Jehovah trains us and helps us in our fight.
He provides lifesaving instructions in his Word.
He also helps us through our Bible-based publications, Christian meetings, assemblies, and conventions.
Yes, Jesus put helping others ahead of personal convenience—helping them was key to his doing God’s will.
Hence, we will forgo items or styles of clothing that we like but that could close the minds of people to whom we want to witness.
Christian parents have a responsibility to teach their families to apply Bible principles.
This includes making sure that they and their children strive to make God’s heart rejoice by their modest style of dress and grooming.
Parents can instill in their children a healthy respect for the holy God whom they worship by setting the right example for their children and by giving loving and practical instruction.
How good it is when parents teach their youngsters where and how to find suitable clothes! This means not just what they like but also what will enable them to carry out their privilege of representing Jehovah God.
The inability to grasp God’s Word in a foreign language can pose a real threat to our spiritual health.
In the fifth century B.
, Nehemiah showed concern when he learned that some children among the Jews who had returned from Babylon could not speak the Hebrew language.
These children were actually losing their identity as God’s servants because they could not fully understand the meaning of God’s Word.
Some Christian parents serving in a foreign-language field have come to realize that their children’s interest in the truth has waned.
Why?
When we read in a foreign tongue, our heart may not be as involved as it would be in our own language.
Moreover, the inability to communicate well in another language can be mentally and spiritually draining.
So while keeping alive our desire to serve Jehovah in a foreign-language field, we do well to safeguard our spiritual health.
A winegrower went to the marketplace early one morning to hire men to work in his vineyard.
The men he found agreed to the wage he offered and went to work.
The owner needed more workers, however, and returned to the marketplace throughout the day to hire more and more men, offering a fair wage even to those whom he hired at the end of the afternoon.
When evening came, he gathered the workers together to give them their wages, and he gave the same amount to each of them, whether they had labored many hours or just one.
When those first hired realized this, they complained.
The winegrower replied: Did you not agree to the wage I offered?
Do I not have the right to give all my workers whatever I want?
Are you envious because I am generous?
Jesus parable reminds us of one of Jehovah’s qualities that is often mentioned in the Bible—his undeserved kindness.
With such accurate knowledge, the Colossian Christians would be able to walk worthily of Jehovah in order to please him fully.
This would enable them to continue bearing fruit in every good work, especially in the preaching of the good news.
To serve effectively, a worshipper of Jehovah must follow a routine of Bible study.
We do well to help Bible students grasp that fact.
Moreover, we ourselves must be convinced of its value.
In fact, we ourselves need to have good Bible study habits.
So you might ask yourself, When householders express opinions that are contrary to Scriptural teachings or they ask difficult questions, am I able to give answers that are based on the Bible?
If we tell others how much we have benefited from our personal study of the Bible, we may encourage them to obtain such benefits by being diligent students of the Scriptures.
Jehovah began choosing anointed ones after Jesus death and resurrection, and it seems that all in the first-century Christian congregation were anointed.
From the first century until the beginning of the last days, the vast majority of those who claimed to follow Christ were false Christians; Jesus likened them to weeds.
Even so, Jehovah continued to anoint some faithful ones throughout that time, and they proved to be like the wheat Jesus described.
During the last days, Jehovah has continued to select those who will make up the 144,000.
If he chooses to wait until late into that period to select some for that privilege, who are we to question his wisdom?
We must be careful not to react like the disgruntled workers who complained about the way their master dealt with the 11th-hour workers.
Because Saul was determined to kill David, Jonathan faced a conflict of loyalties.
Although he had made a covenant with David, Jonathan was also submissive to his father.
But Jonathan knew that God was with David and not with Saul.
Therefore, Jonathan put loyalty to David ahead of loyalty to Saul.
He warned David to hide and then spoke well of him to Saul.
If we are not careful, loyalty to a nation, a school, or a sports team can eventually choke out loyalty to God.
For example, Henry enjoys playing chess.
His school had a tradition of winning the championship, and he wanted to put forth his best effort.
But he admitted: Gradually, loyalty to the school began to take priority over my loyalty to God.
Weekend chess matches were crowding out my Kingdom service.
So I decided to give up being part of the chess team.
As a young person, there are ways in which you will be able to discern whether your decision to get baptized comes from your heart.
For example, your heartfelt desire to serve Jehovah will be reflected in your prayers.
How often you pray and how specific your prayers are may well reveal how close your relationship with Jehovah is.
An important way that Jehovah answers our prayers is by directing our attention to his Word.
Thus, our effort to study the Bible is yet another indication that we really want to draw closer to Jehovah and serve him from the heart.
So ask yourself: How specific are my prayers?
How regular is my personal study of the Bible?
And if your Christian family has a Family Worship evening, ask yourself: Do I willingly share in that arrangement?
Your answers to these questions will help you to see whether your decision to get baptized is your personal desire.
What a thrill it is to read in the Yearbook the combined results of our activity! Think, too, of how we are united at regional, special, and international conventions, as we listen to motivating Scriptural talks and give attention to dramas and demonstrations.
These parts often highlight God’s loving appeal to serve him with all our being.
The commemoration of Jesus death also unites us.
With appreciation for God’s undeserved kindness and in obedience to Jesus direction, we gather for that event yearly, after sundown on Nisan 14.
And in the weeks before the Memorial, we cover as much of our congregation’s territory as possible, inviting others to join us for that important occasion.
Our individual efforts might seem insignificant.
Brothers who are learning to serve in the congregation should be taught to think in terms of Bible principles.
For example, suppose an elder asks a brother to keep the entranceway to the Kingdom Hall clean in appearance and safe for walking.
He could consider and explain how the brother’s work to enhance the Kingdom Hall will adorn the teaching of our Savior, God.
He could also ask the learner to think of the elderly ones in the congregation and how carrying out his assignment will benefit them.
Having such conversations with the learner as part of his training will help him to focus more on people than on rules.
He will experience the joy that comes from seeing how brothers and sisters in the congregation benefit from the service he renders.
Further, the elder should commend the learner for the effort he makes to apply the suggestions.
Sincere commendation does for a learner what water does for a plant—it makes him thrive.
In his undeserved kindness, Jehovah has given each of us certain gifts, assets, abilities, or talents.
We can use them to glorify him and to benefit others.
Jehovah has entrusted us with a stewardship that comes with honor, trust, and responsibility.
Our place in God’s arrangement is not fixed, however.
It can change over time.
Consider Jesus example.
Initially, he was alone with Jehovah.
Then he helped make other spirit creatures, the material universe, and finally, humans.
Still later, Jesus took on a new role on earth, first as a helpless baby and then as an adult.
After his sacrificial death, Jesus returned to heavenly spirit life to become the King of God’s Kingdom in 1914.
And after his Thousand Year Reign, Jesus will hand over his Kingdom to Jehovah so that God may be all things to everyone.
What a wonderful hope true Christians share! All of us, whether of the anointed or of the other sheep, hope to see the fulfillment of God’s original purpose and the sanctification of Jehovah’s name.
Such expectations are the most noble any human can cherish.
We also long for the promised reward of everlasting life, either as part of God’s new heavens or as part of his new earth.
In the meantime, we hope for the continued increase of the spiritual prosperity of God’s people.
Those who are part of Satan’s world also have some sort of hope, but they may doubt whether theirs will ever be realized.
For example, millions of gamblers may hope to win a lottery, but they could hardly feel sure about that.
Real faith, on the other hand, is the assured expectation of our Christian hope.
David might have concluded that Solomon was not qualified to oversee such an important project as building a house for God.
After all, the temple was to be exceedingly magnificent, and Solomon was at the time young and inexperienced.
Yet, David knew that Jehovah would equip Solomon to handle the work given to him.
So David focused on what he could do to assist, preparing materials in great quantity.
Likewise, older brothers today should not be disheartened when it becomes necessary to hand their assignments over to younger men.
Rather, it is in the best interests of the work when younger ones are trained to handle responsibilities.
Appointed men should have great satisfaction when the younger ones whom they have trained become qualified to take on the work.
When faced with making a personal choice, one woman told a friend: Do not make me think; just tell me what to do.
That is easier.
The woman preferred being told what to do instead of using a precious gift from her Creator, the gift of free will.
What about you?
Do you like making your own decisions, or do you prefer that others decide for you?
How do you view the matter of free will?
People have debated this subject for centuries.
Some claim that there is no such thing as free will—that all our actions are predetermined by God.
Others argue that true free will is only possible if we have absolute freedom.
However, to understand this matter properly, we must turn to God’s Word, the Bible.
Why?
It reveals that Jehovah created us with free will; that is, the capacity and freedom to make our own intelligent choices.
There are many reasons why we should be thankful to Jehovah! We owe him our very life, for without him we would not even move or exist.
He has given us a very precious gift—his own book, the Bible.
We gratefully accept it as God’s message, even as the Christians in Thessalonica received God’s word and accepted it.
With the written Word of God in hand, we have drawn close to Jehovah and he has drawn close to us.
Our heavenly Father has granted us the wonderful privilege of being part of his organization.
How we appreciate such blessings! The psalmist put matters beautifully when he sang: Give thanks to Jehovah, for he is good; his loyal love endures forever.
Twenty-six times in , we find the refrain his loyal love endures forever.
Although the governing body had authority in the early congregation, they acknowledged that their Leader was Jesus.
Let us by love grow up in all things into him who is the head, Christ, wrote the apostle Paul.
Instead of naming themselves after a prominent apostle, the disciples were by divine providence called Christians.
True, Paul acknowledged the importance of holding fast the traditions, or Scripturally based practices, given by the apostles and other men who took the lead.
Nevertheless, he added: But I want you to know that the head of every man including every member of the governing body is the Christ; in turn, the head of the Christ is God.
Yes, under his Head, Jehovah God, the invisible and glorified Christ Jesus was leading the congregation.
Jehovah uses the Christian congregation and its overseers to mold us on a personal level.
For example, if the elders discern that we are having spiritual problems, they try to help us—but not on the basis of human wisdom.
Rather, they humbly look to God, asking for insight and wisdom.
With our situation in mind, they act on their prayers by doing research in God’s Word and in our Christian publications.
This can equip them to render help tailored to our needs.
Understanding how God may be molding us can help us in our relationships with fellow believers and in our attitude toward people in our territory, including our Bible students.
God does not force individuals to make changes, but he reveals his righteous standards so that they can clean up their lives or make adjustments voluntarily.
Jehovah God created humans with free will, that is, the liberty to choose between one option and another.
God provided a valuable guide for the first man and woman and their future offspring—the conscience, an inner sense of right and wrong.
Used properly, the conscience can help us to do good and to avoid wrongdoing.
Our conscience thus is an evidence of God’s love for us and of his desire that humans be united in doing good.
Today, humans still have the faculty of conscience.
Though many have strayed far from the Bible’s standards of conduct, we find that some individuals often do what is good and abhor what is bad.
The conscience holds many individuals back from committing deeds of extreme wickedness.
Jehovah appreciates our efforts to make the best use of our time by engaging in regular Bible reading and personal study.
Realistically, we may not always be able to give equal attention to all the spiritual food available to us.
However, we need to be aware of a subtle danger.
What is it?
There is a danger that we could miss out on some benefits because we assume that certain spiritual provisions do not apply to us.
For example, what if a portion of the Bible does not seem relevant to our situation?
Or what if we are not part of the primary audience for a certain publication?
Do we tend to give such information superficial consideration or even skip it altogether?
If so, we could be depriving ourselves of information that would be of great benefit to us.
Each one of us should bear in mind that God is the Source of all our spiritual provisions.
Scientific research shows that saying words aloud during study makes them easier to recall.
The Creator of our brain knows this.
That is why he instructed Joshua to read His book of the Law in an undertone.
You will likely find that reading the Bible softly, or in an undertone, makes a deeper impression on your mind.
This may also help you to concentrate better.
While reading may be done with little effort, meditation requires concentration.
That is why the imperfect human brain is inclined to switch to easier, less demanding tasks.
Thus, the best time to meditate is when you are rested and in a stress-free environment with few distractions.
The psalmist found that a good time to meditate was while he was awake in bed during the night.
Jesus, who had perfect mental powers, knew the advantage of being in quiet places to meditate and pray.
According to Satan, no one serves Jehovah out of unselfish love.
Has Satan changed since he made that claim?
Not at all! When he was ousted from heaven, Satan was still called the accuser of our brothers .
, who accuses them day and night before our God! Satan has not forgotten the issue of integrity.
He is eager to see us surrender to our trial and withdraw our support of God’s sovereignty.
When you struggle with adversity, therefore, imagine this invisible scene.
Satan and his demons are on one side, pointing to your struggles and alleging that you will buckle under the pressure and give up.
On the other side are Jehovah, his reigning Son, the resurrected anointed ones, and myriads of angels.
They are cheering you on, delighted by your endurance and support of Jehovah’s sovereignty.
You can take personally Jehovah’s inspired request, mentioned in today’s text.
The first-century Christian congregation was made up of Jews, Greeks, Romans, and people of other nationalities.
They had different religious backgrounds, customs, and sensibilities.
Because of that, some had difficulty accepting the new way of worship or fully relinquishing their former ways.
The apostle Paul found it fitting to remind them that Christians have one God, Jehovah.
What about the situation in the Christian congregation today?
The prophet Isaiah foretold that in the final part of the days, people of all nations would flock to Jehovah’s elevated place of true worship.
They would say: Jehovah will instruct us about his ways, and we will walk in his paths.
How happy we are to see this prophecy undergoing fulfillment before our eyes! The result is that many congregations have become multiracial, multicultural, and multilingual, giving praise to Jehovah.
Satan uses his world’s commercial system to seduce us into believing that having material things beyond our actual needs is necessary for the enjoyment of life.
He is adept at appealing to the desire of the eyes.
The world offers every kind of material thing, from the superb to the absurd, some of which look very enticing.
Have you ever purchased something, not because you needed it, but because it caught your eye in an advertisement or a store display?
Did you later realize that you could have lived the rest of your life without it?
Such nonessential things only complicate our life and weigh us down.
They can ensnare us and distract us from our spiritual routine of studying the Bible, preparing for and attending meetings, and sharing regularly in the ministry.
Remember, the apostle John warned: The world is passing away and so is its desire.
Some portions of the Bible were initially directed to one individual or group.
That is why, before reading God’s Word, we do well to pray for an open mind and for wisdom to discern the lessons that Jehovah wants us to learn.
As you read a Bible passage, take time to pause and ask yourself such questions as these: What does this tell me about Jehovah?
How can I apply this information in my life?
How can I use it to help others?
When we reflect on such questions, we will surely get more out of our Bible reading.
As an example, think about the Scriptural qualifications for Christian elders.
Since the majority of us do not serve as elders, we might initially think that this passage would have little application to our own life.
However, this list of qualifications can benefit all of us in a number of ways.
It has been said that man’s necessities are few, but his wants are infinite.
It seems that many cannot see the difference between material needs and wants.
What is the difference?
A need is something you must have because your life depends on it.
Food, clothing, and shelter—these are legitimate necessities.
A want is something you would like to have, but it is not essential for everyday living.
What people want may vary considerably, depending on where they live.
In developing countries, many may simply want to have enough money to buy a cell phone, a motorbike, or a small plot of land.
In wealthier lands, the urge may be to acquire a lavish wardrobe, a bigger house, or a more expensive automobile.
In any case, herein lies a real danger—becoming ensnared by materialism, wanting more and more things, whether we need them or not and whether we can afford them or not.
The apostle Peter wrote those words to encourage Christians to endure the hardships heaped on them by Satan.
The experiences of those who have endured teach us how to remain steadfast and remind us that our faithful course will be rewarded.
Perhaps you face bitter opposition, even persecution, from enemies of true worship.
Or you are a congregation elder or a circuit overseer who feels the weight of your heavy responsibilities.
Meditate on the example of Paul.
He faced numerous things of an external kind by vicious persecutors, and he felt daily pressure on account of his anxiety for the congregations.
Yet, he refused to give up, and his example strengthened others.
When you endure hardship, remember that your example is likely encouraging others to endure.
We cannot develop faith simply by our own willpower.
Faith is an aspect of the fruitage of God’s holy spirit.
Thus, we are wise to follow Jesus counsel about praying for more of that spirit because Jesus assures us that the Father will give holy spirit to those asking him.
Once our faith is established, we must continue to nourish it.
Our faith might be compared to a wood fire.
When the fire is started, it may come roaring to life in an intense blaze.
However, if nothing more is done to the fire, it will eventually die down to hot coals that, in turn, will become cold ashes if left alone.
But if you regularly feed the fire with more wood, it can be kept going indefinitely.
So, too, our faith can be kept alive if we regularly feed on God’s Word.
By progressively studying the Bible, we can develop a deep love for it and its Author, and that will become the basis for building more faith.
When the Jewish exiles entered ancient Babylon, they saw a city filled with idols and found a people enslaved to wicked spirits.
Nevertheless, faithful Jews, such as Daniel and his three companions, refused to be molded by the world of Babylon.
Daniel and his companions were determined to give exclusive devotion to Jehovah as their Potter.
And they succeeded! Daniel lived in Babylon nearly all his life; yet, God’s angel said that he was a very precious man.
In Bible times, a potter might press the clay into a mold so that it would take on the shape he desired.
True worshippers today recognize Jehovah as the Universal Sovereign, the one having authority to mold peoples and nations.
God also has the authority to mold us personally.
However, he recognizes our free will and wants us to submit to him voluntarily.
Encouragement is a power for good.
I have fought feelings of worthlessness for many years, says Rubén.
But one time, I was preaching with an elder who realized that I was having a bad day.
He listened with sympathy as I expressed my feelings.
Then he reminded me of the good I was accomplishing.
He also reminded me of Jesus words—that each of us is worth more than many sparrows.
I often recall that scripture, and it still touches my heart.
The elder’s words made a huge difference.
It should not surprise us that the Bible emphasizes the need for regular encouragement.
The apostle Paul wrote to the Hebrew Christians: Keep on encouraging one another each day, so that none of you should become hardened by the deceptive power of sin.
You know how important the counsel to encourage one another is if you recall a time when words of encouragement lifted your spirits.
About 6,000 years ago, God’s will was being done perfectly on earth.
That is why Jehovah could look upon the fine start he had given to mankind and say: It was very good.
Then Satan rebelled, and ever since, comparatively few humans have done God’s will on earth.
But today we are privileged to be alive at a time when about eight million Witnesses not only are praying for God’s will to take place on earth but also are striving to live in harmony with that prayer.
They do so by their way of life and by having a zealous share in the disciple-making work.
Until the enemies of God’s Kingdom are removed from the earth, we will continue to pray for God’s will to be done.
Then we will see God’s will taking place in an even more complete way as billions are resurrected on a paradise earth.
Jehovah also causes his creation to become whatever he chooses.
In line with the meaning of his name, God caused Noah to be an ark builder, Bezalel to be a master craftsman, Gideon to be a victorious warrior, and Paul to be an apostle to the nations.
Yes, God’s name has great meaning to his people.
And the New World Bible Translation Committee would never undermine the name’s significance by omitting it from the Bible.
Over 130 language editions of the New World Translation honor God’s name by including it where it belongs in the sacred text.
In contrast, the current trend in Bible translation is to omit the divine name, substituting a title such as Lord or the name of a local god.
This is a prime reason why the Governing Body of Jehovah’s Witnesses has given priority to making available to as many people as possible a Bible that honors God’s name.
Reflecting his Father, Christ, the power of God, frequently opened his hand and satisfied the desires of his followers.
His doing so was not merely an expression of power.
He was guided by his heartfelt concern for others.
Consider .
Jesus disciples came to him to discuss the food situation.
Not only may they themselves have been hungry but they were concerned about the plight of the famished and weary crowd that had followed Jesus on foot from the cities.
What would he do?
With five loaves and two fish, Jesus fed about 5,000 men, as well as women and children! The crowds ate and were satisfied.
This suggests that there was an abundant supply of food.
Jesus kindly provided, not a mere taste of bread, but a meal that would sustain the crowds for their long journey back home.
Are you a dedicated, baptized Witness of Jehovah?
If so, you have a precious possession—a personal relationship with God.
However, that relationship is under attack by pressures not only from Satan’s world but also from our own imperfect flesh.
This trying situation faces all Christians.
Therefore, our relationship with Jehovah must be as strong as possible.
How real to you is your personal relationship with Jehovah?
Would you like to strengthen it?
, our text for today, tells you how you can do that.
Note that this is a two-way process.
As we take steps to draw close to God, he takes reciprocating action toward us.
This interaction, frequently repeated, progressively strengthens our relationship with Jehovah.
As a result, that relationship becomes very real to us.
We develop the kind of confidence Jesus had when he said: The One who sent me is real, and I know him.
Our respect for the God who invites us to Christian meetings should be manifested in our decorum, dress, and grooming.
Respect also requires that we avoid extremes.
Jehovah wants his servants and other guests to feel comfortable at the Kingdom Hall.
At the same time, those in attendance would not want to detract from the meetings by being overly casual in their dress, by texting or talking during the meetings, by eating and drinking, and so on.
Parents should train their children to understand that the Kingdom Hall is not the place for running or playing.
Filled with indignation, Jesus threw out of God’s temple those who were introducing commercial activities.
Our Kingdom Halls too are places for pure worship and spiritual education.
So any business activities that have nothing to do with spiritual pursuits ought to be taken care of elsewhere.
Compare .
In the Bible, enduring means more than simply putting up with trials or adversity.
Endurance involves our mind and heart, or the way we react to hardships.
A person who endures manifests courage, steadfastness, and patience.
Endurance is the spirit which can bear things, not simply with resignation, but with blazing hope, says one reference work.
It is the quality which keeps a man on his feet with his face to the wind.
It is the virtue which can transmute the hardest trial into glory because beyond the pain it sees the goal.
Christian endurance is motivated by love.
Love for Jehovah motivates us to endure anything that is in harmony with his will.
Love for our brothers helps us to endure their imperfections.
Love for our marriage mate enables us to endure tribulation that even happily married couples experience and to strengthen the marital bond.
Down through history, Jehovah has provided specific instructions or directions.
For example, in the garden of Eden, Jehovah gave clear instructions that could guide the human family to everlasting life and happiness.
Had Adam and Eve obeyed his direction, they would have been spared tragic consequences—a life filled with pain and ending in their death with no hope.
But rather than obey, Eve listened to advice that seemed to come from a lowly animal.
Adam, in turn, listened to her voice, the voice of a mortal human.
Both of them turned their backs on their loving Father’s guidance.
Consequently, the human family in general was on a fatal path.
Today, Jehovah stands before his people, as it were, pointing them toward everlasting life, away from dangers.
More than that, he acts like a loving shepherd to his flock, calling out to the sheep proper direction and warnings so that they can avoid dangerous paths.
Through his written Word, Jehovah has given us a number of specific commands.
For example, he forbids sexual immorality, idolatry, stealing, and drunkenness.
Additionally, God’s Son, Jesus Christ, gave his followers this challenging, though thrilling, command: Go, and make disciples of people of all the nations, baptizing them in the name of the Father and of the Son and of the holy spirit, teaching them to observe all the things I have commanded you.
And look! I am with you all the days until the conclusion of the system of things.
What a protection divine laws and commandments have proved to be! Obeying them has increased our self-respect, contributed to good health, and enhanced family happiness.
More important, our loyal adherence to Jehovah’s commands, including the command to share in the preaching work, has brought us his approval and blessing.
Ahaz’s son Hezekiah might easily have grown up to be a bitter, angry man who turned against God.
Others who have endured far less have become enraged against Jehovah or embittered toward his organization.
And some people are convinced that their unwholesome family background dooms them to lead a bad life, perhaps to repeat their parents mistakes.
Are such notions correct?
Hezekiah’s life record gives us a resounding answer: Absolutely not! There is never a valid reason to become embittered against Jehovah, for he is not the source of the evils that befall people in this wicked world.
True, parents can exert a strong influence on their children for good or for bad.
But this does not mean that a person’s family background determines his course in life.
On the contrary, Jehovah has given all of us a precious gift—the ability to choose what we will do and who we will be.
Think about how the preaching of the good news fits in with Jehovah’s loving purpose for humankind.
He purposed that humans would inhabit the earth without ever dying; though Adam sinned, Jehovah did not change His mind.
Instead, he arranged for humans to be delivered from condemnation to sin and death.
Working along with that purpose, Jesus came to earth and sacrificed his life for obedient humans.
In order to become obedient, however, they had to understand what God required of them.
So Jesus also taught people what God’s requirements are, and he commanded his disciples to do the same.
By helping others to become reconciled to God, we share directly in his loving arrangement to rescue mankind from sin and death.
This also demonstrates our love both for our fellow man and for Jehovah, whose will is that all sorts of people should be saved and come to an accurate knowledge of truth.
If you have strong conviction, it is reasonable to expect that you will show it by your actions.
Young ones must also manifest holy acts of conduct.
To do so, you must be morally clean.
How are you doing in that regard?
For example, think about the past six months.
How have you demonstrated that your powers of discernment have been trained to distinguish right from wrong?
Can you think of specific occasions when you resisted temptation or peer pressure?
Does your conduct at school speak well of your faith?
Do you stand up for your faith rather than try to blend in with your classmates just to avoid ridicule?
Admittedly, no one is perfect.
Even longtime servants of Jehovah may at times feel timid about taking a public stand for their faith.
However, a person who is dedicated to Jehovah will rightly be proud to bear God’s name, and he shows this by his conduct.
Abner supported Saul’s efforts to kill David, even though Abner knew that God had chosen David to rule as king of Israel.
After Saul’s death, Abner could have shown humility and proved his loyalty to God by supporting David, not Saul’s son Ish-bosheth.
Later, when Abner had relations with King Saul’s concubine, he may have been seeking the throne for himself.
Similarly, lack of humility prevented David’s son Absalom from being loyal to God.
Why, Absalom acquired for himself a chariot and horses and 50 men to run before him! He also stole the people’s loyalty.
Like Abner, Absalom sought to kill David, even though he knew that Jehovah had appointed David as Israel’s king.
The examples of Abner and Absalom make it clear that inordinate ambition can easily cause a person to become disloyal to God.
Surely, no faithful servant of Jehovah would pursue such a selfish and wicked course.
We cannot properly accept God’s love without recognizing our obligation to love our brothers.
How can we demonstrate our love in practical ways?
Consider the example of Jesus.
During his earthly ministry, he gave special attention to lowly ones.
He reached out to those with physical infirmities—the lame, the blind, the deaf, and the speechless.
Jesus took pleasure in teaching spiritually hungry ones, those who were viewed by the Jewish religious leaders as accursed people.
He loved these lowly ones and worked hard to minister to them.
Can you consider the brothers and sisters in your own congregation?
No doubt you will see some who could benefit from your love.
Perhaps there are elderly ones who need help.
We must let God’s love move us to reach out and express our love for our brothers.
For your relationship with Jehovah to be real, you must be convinced that he is hearing prayers.
Consider this: From his prehuman existence, Jesus observed firsthand Jehovah’s response to the prayers of His human servants.
Then, during his earthly ministry, Jesus used prayer as his means of communicating his feelings to his Father in heaven.
Would he have done so—even spending an entire night in prayer—had he thought that Jehovah was not really listening?
Would he have taught his disciples to pray had he thought that prayer was nothing more than a psychological crutch?
Clearly, Jesus knew that prayer is real communication with Jehovah.
We too can have confidence that Jehovah is the Hearer of prayer.
When you pray humbly in the presence of your children, they will learn to rely on Jehovah.
Ana, who lives in Brazil, states: When there were problems, such as when my grandparents were ill, my parents would ask Jehovah to give them the strength to cope with the situation and the wisdom to make good decisions.
Even when under terrible pressure, they left their problems in Jehovah’s hands.
As a result, I learned to rely on Jehovah.
When you pray with your children, do not pray just for them.
Ask Jehovah to help you too—perhaps to help you speak to your employer about getting time off for a convention, to give you courage to witness to your neighbor, or to help you in other ways.
Humbly rely on God, and your children will learn to do so too.
As parents, your example of faith is very important.
Your children will observe what you do, and it certainly will affect them for the good.
So as parents, keep building your own faith.
Let your children see how real Jehovah is to you.
When a couple in Bermuda have anxious moments, they pray with their children that Jehovah guide them, and they encourage their children to pray on their own.
We also tell our older daughter, Have complete trust in Jehovah, keep busy in Kingdom service, and do not worry too much.
When she sees the outcome, she knows that Jehovah is helping us.
This has done wonders for her faith in God and in the Bible.
In the end, of course, children have to develop their own faith.
As parents, you can plant and water.
Only God can make it grow.
So pray for his spirit, and work hard to teach your precious children, for by doing so, you give Jehovah much to bless.
Even if we had a difficult childhood or if our present circumstances seem hopeless, we need to keep contending and persevering.
We can trust that if we do so, Jehovah will bless us.
Think of a situation that you are facing and that may be a trial for you.
Perhaps it is some type of injustice, prejudice, or ridicule.
Or the trial you face may be that someone falsely accuses you, perhaps out of jealousy.
Rather than drop your hands in defeat, remember what enabled Jacob, Rachel, and Joseph to continue serving Jehovah with joy.
God strengthened and blessed them because they kept on showing deep appreciation for spiritual things.
They kept on contending and acting in harmony with their earnest prayers.
In 1914, war broke out between nations of Europe—a war that spread and engulfed the whole world.
By the time it ended in 1918, terrible food shortages had been experienced and there was a flu epidemic in which more people died than were killed in the war.
Thus the sign that Jesus had given to identify his invisible presence as earth’s new King started to be fulfilled.
Ample evidence points to the year 1914 as the time when a crown was given to the Lord Jesus Christ.
He went out conquering and to complete his conquest.
He cleansed the heavens in a war against Satan and his demons, who were hurled down to the vicinity of the earth.
Ever since, mankind has experienced the truthfulness of the inspired words of today’s text.
Jesus miraculously provided a large amount of fine wine, enough for a sizable group.
It is of interest that when the Devil tempted Jesus to turn stones into loaves of bread, Christ refused to use his miraculous power to satisfy his personal desires.
But he did use his power to respond to and satisfy the needs of others.
How can we imitate Jesus unselfish concern for others?
He encouraged God’s servants to practice giving.
Can we show the noble quality of generosity by inviting others to our home to share a meal and a spiritual feast?
Can we be generous with our time after a meeting, aiding someone in need, such as by listening to a brother practice his talk?
What help might we be able to offer to those needing assistance in the ministry?
We show that we have learned from Jesus by generously providing material and spiritual things to others as we are able.
Circuit overseers around the world have noted that in many congregations, more needs to be done to train brothers—younger and older—to help care for the flock.
This presents a challenge.
Why is that the case?
If you are a Christian elder, you no doubt realize that personal training is important.
You know that more brothers are needed to keep existing congregations spiritually strong and to allow new congregations to be formed.
You also know that God’s Word urges you to teach others.
Even so, you may find it hard to do so.
After you have taken care of family needs, job requirements, congregation responsibilities, and other urgent matters, there just seems to be no time left to train others in the congregation.
Yet, training is needed in order for them to share the workload.
And as that is accomplished, everyone will benefit.
Bible accounts highlight the privilege we have of showing brotherly affection and serving one another.
The Son of God gave everything, including his life, in ministering to others.
Dorcas abounded in good deeds and gifts of mercy.
Mary, a sister in Rome, worked hard in behalf of those in the congregation.
How can we help new ones grasp the importance of helping their brothers and sisters?
Mature Witnesses can invite new ones to come along when visiting the sick and the elderly.
If appropriate, parents can take their children on such visits.
Elders can work with others in making sure that our dear older ones have good food and that their homes are maintained.
In these ways, younger ones and those newly associated learn to perform acts of kindness for others and to appreciate that all in the congregation should feel loved.
When under severe hardship, you may feel as did Paul—that you are in or at least very near the lion’s mouth.
These are times when trust in Jehovah is most challenging—and most essential.
For example, suppose you are nursing a dear family member through a chronic illness.
Perhaps you have prayed for wisdom and strength.
Having done all you can in this regard, do you not find a measure of peace in knowing that Jehovah has his eye upon you and will provide what you need to endure faithfully?
Circumstances might make it seem otherwise.
You might receive conflicting opinions from doctors.
Or relatives who you had hoped would provide comfort might instead seem to make the situation more difficult for you.
Keep looking to Jehovah for strength.
Keep drawing close to him.
When relief comes, your relationship with him will be stronger.
A newly appointed brother should not feel that as soon as he receives some responsibility in the congregation, he needs to use it to change course—to do things in a way that is completely different from the way they were done before.
The need for change is determined, not by one’s desire for change, but by the needs of the congregation and the direction we receive from Jehovah’s organization.
So if you are appointed, reassure your fellow believers and show respect for experienced elders by continuing to use their Bible-based methods.
However, as you gain experience, you will no doubt share in applying changes that will help the congregation to stay in tune with Jehovah’s progressive organization.
In fact, Jehovah may in time move all you faithful learners to do even greater works than those of your teachers.
How do you feel about fellow Christians who are from cultures very different from your own?
Their first language, style of clothing, manners, and food may not be what you are accustomed to.
Do you tend to shy away from them and associate mainly with those who have a background similar to yours?
Or what if those appointed as overseers in your congregation—or in your circuit or branch—are younger or are culturally or racially different from you?
Do you allow such matters to undermine the unity and oneness of purpose that should exist among Jehovah’s people?
What can help us to avoid such pitfalls?
To the Christians in Ephesus, a prosperous and diversified city, Paul offered some practical counsel.
Paul first mentioned such qualities as humility, mildness, patience, and love.
These might be likened to the pillars of a house that keep it standing.
Even when someone says something offensive, responding with gracious words can have positive results.
For example, the teenage son of a single mother was leading a double life.
A well-meaning Christian sister said to the mother: It’s too bad you have failed at child training.
The mother thought for a moment and responded: It’s true that things are not going well right now, but his training is a work in progress.
Talk to me after Armageddon; then we will know for sure.
This mild response helped to maintain peace between the sisters, and it encouraged the son, who overheard the conversation.
He realized that his mother had not given up on him.
This moved him to stop his bad associations.
In time, he got baptized, and he later served at Bethel.
Whether in the company of our brothers, our family, or strangers, we should always let our words be gracious, seasoned with salt.
The Mosaic Law was given to one nation—fleshly Israel.
In contrast, spiritual Israel would be made up of people from many nations and backgrounds.
The Mosaic Law governed fleshly Israel in the Promised Land with laws carved on stone.
For spiritual Israel, the law of the Christ was mainly based on principles inscribed on hearts.
The law of the Christ would apply to and benefit Christians wherever they lived.
Spiritual Israel would benefit greatly from guidance from God through his Son.
Just prior to the establishment of the new covenant, Jesus gave two significant commands.
One dealt with the preaching work.
The other focused on the conduct of Jesus followers and how they were to treat fellow believers.
These directives were for all Christians; thus they apply to all true worshippers today, whether their hope is heavenly or earthly.
More than once, Jehovah stepped in and protected Abraham and Sarah, even doing so miraculously.
Those experiences strengthened Abraham’s faith.
Can we build a friendship with Jehovah?
We can indeed! The needed knowledge and experience are readily available.
Abraham had only a fraction of the abundant riches of wisdom now contained in the Bible.
God’s Word is full of treasures that can deepen our knowledge about the Maker of heaven and earth and help us to build respect and love for him.
As such feelings move us to obey God, we gain experience because we see how obeying him works out.
We find that his counsel protects us and that he blesses and strengthens us.
We learn that wholehearted service to God brings fulfillment, peace, and joy.
As we grow in such knowledge and experience, our faith in Jehovah and our friendship with him grow as well.
Those words reveal that Mary knew the inspired Scriptures well.
Her words seem to echo some that were spoken in prayer by Hannah, the mother of the prophet Samuel.
By one estimate, Mary made some 20 references to the Scriptures in her speech.
Clearly, she was a woman who spoke freely about spiritual things.
Mary drew liberally from the treasure trove in her heart, a storehouse of precious truths that she had learned from her greatest Friend, Jehovah God.
Like Mary, we may at times find that we receive assignments from Jehovah that seem challenging.
Like her, let us humbly put ourselves in Jehovah’s hands, trusting in him to act in our best interests.
We can imitate Mary’s faith by listening carefully to what we are learning about Jehovah and his purposes, by meditating on spiritual truths, and by joyously telling others about what we have learned.
We show caution by recognizing dangers early, and we remain innocent by not letting them lead us into compromise.
We must exercise caution when political issues are brought up.
For example, when presenting the Kingdom message, avoid either praising or criticizing the policies of a political party or leader.
Try to establish common ground with the householder by focusing on the underlying problem rather than on any proposed political solution.
Then, show from the Bible how God’s government will solve the problem completely and permanently.
If such volatile issues as same-sex marriage or abortion come up, defend God’s standards and explain how we follow these in our own lives.
During the discussion, remain strictly neutral on the political aspects of these topics.
We take no position regarding what laws should be enacted, repealed, or changed, and we do not pressure others to agree with our view.
An elder should start his training of another brother by taking time to develop a relaxed atmosphere and a bond of friendship with him.
The specific steps an elder takes will differ somewhat from land to land, depending on local circumstances and customs.
Yet, no matter where you live, if you as a busy elder set aside time to spend with a learner, you are telling him, in effect, You are important to me.
That unspoken message will be clearly understood and deeply valued by willing learners everywhere.
A successful teacher is someone who not only loves to train another person but also loves the person he is training.
Compare .
That crucial aspect of a teacher’s disposition is quickly discerned by a learner and greatly affects the way he responds to the training he receives.
Therefore, dear elders, as you give training, be more than a teacher—be a friend.
Reflecting on that verse may help you to appreciate in a very personal way that Jehovah loves and cares for you.
Be assured that you do matter to Jehovah.
We should value the Bible highly because God communicates with us primarily by means of it.
Meaningful and compassionate communication between parents and their children is essential to building mutual trust and developing a feeling of being loved.
What can we expect of Jehovah?
Although we have never seen him or heard his voice, he speaks to us through his inspired Word, and we need to listen.
Jehovah desires to guide us, his dedicated people, and to protect us from harm.
He also wants us to know him and to put our trust in him.
How will the great tribulation begin?
The book of Revelation answers by describing the destruction of Babylon the Great.
How appropriate that all false religion is likened to a prostitute! The clergy have prostituted themselves with the leaders of this wicked world.
Instead of loyally supporting Jesus and his Kingdom, they have given their support to human rulers and have compromised godly principles just to gain political influence.
They stand in stark contrast with the clean, virginlike anointed ones of God.
But who will destroy the harlotlike organization?
Jehovah God will put his thought into the hearts of the ten horns of the scarlet-colored wild beast.
These horns represent all the present political powers that give support to the United Nations, an organization pictured by the scarlet-colored wild beast.
Our being able to conceive of events that we have not lived through can help us to imitate Jehovah’s wisdom and foresee the probable results of our actions.
If Jehovah chooses to do so, he can foresee in detail the results of certain actions.
We do not have that degree of foresight, but we do well to think about what could happen as a result of what we are about to do.
To imitate God’s wisdom, we would do well to think about or even visualize the likely consequences of our actions.
If we are courting, for example, we need to recognize the power of sexual attraction.
Never would we make plans or do anything that could endanger our precious relationship with Jehovah! Instead, let us act in harmony with these inspired words: The shrewd one sees the danger and conceals himself, but the inexperienced keep right on going and suffer the consequences.
If you struggle with temptation to engage in sexual immorality, what can you do?
Acknowledge your weakness.
Pray to God for strength.
Avoid situations that could lead to immorality.
And when a temptation arises, reject it without delay.
Jesus set a powerful example for us in resisting temptations.
He was not fooled by Satan’s promises, nor did he have to take time to weigh the pros and cons.
Rather, he immediately responded with the words: It is written.
Jesus knew God’s Word, and that made it possible for him to act quickly and quote scriptures in the face of temptation.
To fight Satan and win, we must not allow ourselves to be tempted to engage in sexual immorality.
This does not mean that the Devil kills all people directly.
However, his murderous spirit has permeated this world.
Moreover, because Eve believed Satan’s lie and Adam disobeyed God, sin and death spread to all mankind.
In that sense, the Devil has had the means to cause death.
He is what Jesus called him—a murderer.
What a powerful enemy we have in Satan! When we oppose Satan, we align ourselves against not only him but all those who side with him in the issue of universal sovereignty.
That number includes a sizable group of other spirit rebels, or demons.
Time and again, the demons have demonstrated their superhuman strength, causing great misery to those whom they have tormented.
Never underestimate the power of such wicked angels or that of the ruler of the demons.
Without help from Jehovah, we could never win our fight against Satan.
We can imitate Jesus gracious speech by being kind, courteous, and considerate of others feelings.
Seeing the effort a crowd made to hear him speak, Jesus was moved with pity and started to teach them many things.
Even when he was being insulted, Jesus did not resort to harsh speech.
Speaking with mildness and tact can be a challenge when our listener is someone whom we know very well.
We might feel at liberty to be very frank.
That can be true whether we speak with a family member or a close friend in the congregation.
Did Jesus feel that his close relationship with his disciples granted him liberty to speak harshly to them?
Not at all! When his closest followers continued to argue over who was greater, Jesus corrected them with kind words and an illustration of a young child.
Elders can imitate Jesus example by giving counsel in a spirit of mildness.
Because he made it a practice to obey Jehovah even in seemingly minor matters, Abraham kept his friendship with God healthy and flourishing.
He felt free to open his heart to Jehovah, asking for help as he struggled with hard questions.
For example, when he learned that God was going to destroy the cities of Sodom and Gomorrah, Abraham was concerned that righteous people might be swept away along with the wicked.
Perhaps Abraham was worried about his nephew Lot and his family, who were then living in Sodom.
Abraham asked his questions with great humility and trust in God, the Judge of all the earth.
Jehovah patiently taught Abraham how merciful He is, reading every heart and looking for righteous ones to preserve, even in times of judgment.
No doubt, every bit of knowledge and experience helped Abraham maintain his close friendship with Jehovah.
Much of what is produced by this world’s media can be spiritually dangerous to Christians.
Such material is not designed to build faith in Jehovah and his promises.
Instead, it reflects Satan’s evil world and its goals.
Therefore, we need to exercise great caution so that we do not choose material that could arouse worldly desires.
In contrast with what the world produces, the material produced by Jehovah’s organization in these last days encourages conduct that leads to eternal life.
How blessed we are to have magazines, brochures, books, videos, and Web pages that promote true worship! God’s organization also provides regular meetings in more than 110,000 congregations worldwide.
At those meetings and at assemblies and conventions, we consider Bible-based material that builds faith in God and his promises.
Having regular communication with Jehovah is a vital part of drawing close to him.
How can you communicate with God?
You talk to Jehovah by means of your frequent prayers to him.
And you allow Jehovah to talk to you, as it were, when you regularly read his written Word and meditate on it.
When you are specific in your prayers, you become more keenly aware of Jehovah’s answers, even though they may be subtle.
Answered prayers will make Jehovah more real to you.
In addition, the more you express your innermost concerns to Jehovah, the closer he will draw to you.
Developing a closer relationship with Jehovah is a lifetime pursuit.
We must take steps to draw close to God if we want him to take corresponding action toward us.
By all means, then, let us remain in regular communication with our God by means of Bible study and prayer.
As a result, our ever-growing relationship with Jehovah will enable us to meet our trials successfully.
Jehovah’s organization goes to tremendous lengths to provide and help finance modest Kingdom Halls.
The work of designing, building, and remodeling them is handled by unpaid volunteers.
Since November 1, 1999, more than 28,000 beautiful new centers of pure worship have been provided for congregations worldwide.
That means that for 15 years, on average, five new Kingdom Halls have been provided every day of the year.
Efforts are being made to support the construction of Kingdom Halls wherever they are needed.
This loving provision is based on the Scriptural principle that the surplus of some might offset the deficiency of others, in order that there may be an equalizing.
As a result, beautiful new centers of pure worship have been provided for congregations that would otherwise never have had the financial resources to build a Kingdom Hall for themselves.
How might we see Jehovah’s hand in our lives?
Consider: Perhaps you feel that the way you received the truth was clearly at God’s direction.
Have you ever attended Christian meetings, heard a part, and said: That was just what I needed?
Or you may have experienced an answer to a prayer.
Maybe you decided to expand your ministry and were amazed at how Jehovah helped to work things out for you.
Or have you ever experienced leaving a job for spiritual reasons and then seen the truth of God’s promise: I will never abandon you?
By being spiritually alert and pure in heart, we can discern how Jehovah has helped us in many ways.
How can we be pure in heart?
We must be clean on the inside and stop any wrong conduct.
As we cultivate stronger spirituality and manifest upright conduct, we put ourselves among those who can see God.
God’s servants have long understood that training contributes to success.
The patriarch Abram mobilized his trained men to rescue Lot—and the men succeeded.
In King David’s day, the singers for God’s house were trained in song to Jehovah and brought praise to God.
Today, we are fighting a spiritual war against Satan and his followers.
Also, we are exerting ourselves in our effort to bring praise to Jehovah.
Hence, like God’s servants in the past, to be successful we need to be trained.
In the congregation, Jehovah entrusts the elders with the responsibility of training others.
Before teaching a less experienced brother a set of skills, an elder may discern the need to share some nourishing Scriptural thoughts with him so as to make his heart more responsive to the training he will receive.
The wind and waves surrounding Peter as he walked on the water might be compared to the trials and temptations we face in our life of dedication to God.
Even when these are severe, we can stand firm with Jehovah’s support.
Recall that Peter did not sink because of a gust of wind or a big wave.
Think back on the sequence of events: Looking at the windstorm, he became afraid.
Peter lost his focus on Jesus, and then his faith wavered.
We could begin to sink if we were to begin looking at the windstorm, focusing on its power and doubting that Jehovah will support us.
We should take seriously the possibility that our faith could diminish, for the Bible refers to a weakening of faith or loss of faith as the sin that easily entangles us.
As Peter’s experience shows, our faith can quickly weaken if we focus on the wrong things.
Although Jesus disciples repeatedly argued about who was the greatest among them, Jesus did not give up on them.
He also did not ignore it when they failed to respond to his counsel.
Lovingly and mildly, Jesus reproved them at a suitable time and place.
Show your love for your children by disciplining them.
It is sometimes enough to explain why a certain course is right or wrong.
At other times, a child may fail to apply what you say.
When that happens, imitate Jesus.
At a fitting time and place, discipline your child lovingly and mildly through patient guidance, training, and correction.
My parents never disciplined me in anger or without explaining why I was being disciplined, says Elaine, a sister in South Africa.
As a result, I felt secure.
I knew my boundaries, and I understood what was required of me.
Consider the preaching of the good news that Jesus would have his followers do.
The method and the scope of the preaching work were new.
In earlier centuries, people of the nations were welcomed when they came to Israel to serve Jehovah.
That was before Jesus gave the command found in today’s text.
Jesus disciples were told to go to all people.
On the day of Pentecost 33 C.
, there was an early evidence of Jehovah’s changed strategy—that of a global evangelizing work.
His holy spirit empowered about 120 members of the new congregation to speak miraculously in different tongues to Jews and proselytes.
Next, the territory expanded to the Samaritans.
Then, in the year 36 C.
, it was further expanded to include the world of uncircumcised Gentiles.
You might say that the field of preaching enlarged from a pond of Jews to an ocean of mankind.
Whether people agree with us or bitterly oppose us, few would deny that as a group Jehovah’s Witnesses are well-known for their preaching activities.
It may even be that you have met people in your ministry who have stated that while they disagree with our beliefs, they respect us for the work we do.
As we know, Jesus foretold that the good news of the Kingdom would be preached in all the inhabited earth.
Many religious groups feel that they are preaching the Gospel, or good news.
However, their efforts are often limited to personal testimonies, church services, or programs broadcast through the media—whether by means of television or on the Internet.
Others point to their charitable activities or their endeavors in the fields of medicine and education.
What work must endurance complete?
It helps us to be complete and sound in all respects, not lacking in anything.
Trials often reveal our weaknesses, aspects of our personality that we need to refine.
If we endure those trials, however, our Christian personality becomes more complete, or sound.
For example, we may become more patient, appreciative, and compassionate.
Because endurance completes the vital work of molding us as Christians, do not compromise Scriptural principles to bring an end to tests that come your way.
For instance, what if you struggle with unclean thoughts?
Rather than give in to temptation, prayerfully reject such desires.
You will thus fortify your self-control.
Are you facing opposition from an unbelieving family member?
Instead of yielding under pressure, be determined to maintain your pattern of wholehearted worship.
Remember: To have God’s approval, we must endure.
Jesus preached the good news of the Kingdom, and he expects his disciples to do the same.
What group of people are preaching that message in all the nations?
The answer is obvious—only Jehovah’s Witnesses.
A missionary priest once told a Witness that he had lived in many different countries and that he had asked the Witnesses in each country what message they were preaching.
What answer was he given?
The priest said: They were all so stupid that they gave the same answer: The good news of the Kingdom.
Far from being stupid, however, those Witnesses were speaking in unity, as true Christians should.
And they were echoing the message contained in The Watchtower Announcing Jehovah’s Kingdom.
This magazine is available in 254 languages, and an average of nearly 59 million copies of each issue are produced, making it the most widely circulated magazine in the world.
We know that taking undue pride in tribe, culture, or nation puts us at odds with Jehovah’s view of human rule and the human family.
Of course, God does not expect us to renounce our culture.
In fact, cultural differences illustrate the marvelous diversity of the human family.
Still, we must remember that in God’s sight, all people are equal.
Taking undue pride in our place of origin is at the heart of nationalism and could be the first step on a path to compromise.
Christians are not immune to such pride, for even some in the first-century congregation discriminated against their brothers because of their nationality.
How can we tell if undue pride is taking root in us?
Suppose a brother or sister from another land offered you a suggestion.
Would you reject it, immediately thinking, We do things better around here’?
Instead, we should all apply the inspired counsel of today’s text.
Many of the problems addressed in our publications for young people are not unique to them.
All of us need to defend our faith, control our emotions, reject harmful peer pressure, and avoid unwholesome associations and entertainment.
These topics and many others have been addressed in material designed for teenagers.
Should adult Christians feel that it is demeaning for them to read publications directed to young people?
Not at all! Although the material is presented in a way that appeals to youths, the information is based on timeless Scriptural principles, and all of us can benefit from these spiritual provisions.
Besides helping young people to deal with problems, our publications help them to grow spiritually and draw close to Jehovah.
Here, too, adult Christians can benefit.
As Kingdom publishers, we may desire to enter the full-time ministry as regular pioneers.
In order to make this possible, we begin taking steps to simplify our life.
At the same time, we may find ourselves worrying about whether we could be genuinely happy with less in a material way.
Of course, there is no Bible command that we pioneer; we could continue serving Jehovah as faithful publishers.
However, Jesus assures us that those who make sacrifices for the Kingdom will receive abundant blessings.
Moreover, the Scriptures show that it pleases Jehovah when we make voluntary offerings of praise to him and cheerfully do what we can to advance true worship.
From these Scriptural points, along with prayers for guidance, can we not perceive Jehovah’s thinking?
Reflecting on these thoughts may help us come to a decision that will be practical for us and will have our heavenly Father’s blessing.
Pride can cause us to justify our actions, making us quite the opposite of malleable.
Have you ever been hurt by a fellow Christian or by the loss of certain privileges?
If so, how did you respond?
Did pride come into play?
Or was your main concern that of making peace with your brother and remaining loyal to Jehovah?
Making a practice of sin, perhaps even committing secret sins, can also make one unresponsive to divine counsel.
Sinning can then become easier.
One brother, who got into the habit of viewing pornography, later admitted, I found myself developing a critical attitude toward the elders.
His habit was hurting him spiritually.
Eventually, his conduct came to light, and he received much-needed help.
Of course, we are all imperfect.
If, however, we begin to develop a critical attitude or to excuse a wrong course rather than seek God’s forgiveness and help, our heart may already be hardening.
Jehovah our God is one Jehovah.
What a powerful statement! That reminder fortified the Israelites to confront the challenges facing them as they entered and took possession of the Promised Land.
Our taking those words to heart will empower us to face the great tribulation just ahead and contribute to the Paradise to follow.
Let us go on rendering exclusive devotion to Jehovah by loving and serving him whole-souled and putting forth earnest effort to maintain oneness in the Christian brotherhood.
If we continue to do so, we can look forward with confidence to seeing fulfilled what Jesus said about those whom he will judge as sheep: Come, you who have been blessed by my Father, inherit the Kingdom prepared for you from the founding of the world.
Jesus listeners were anxious about things they ought not be anxious about.
Jesus said to stop that—and for good reason.
Needless anxiety or worry, even about legitimate concerns, can divide a person’s mind and distract him, shutting out the more important spiritual matters of life.
Jesus was so concerned for his disciples that he warned them about this dangerous tendency four more times in his Sermon on the Mount.
Jesus was well-aware of people’s day-to-day needs.
More than that, he knew of the difficult conditions facing his disciples who centuries later would live during the last days, characterized by critical times hard to deal with.
Such conditions include unemployment, inflation, food shortages, and abject poverty that many experience.
Yet, Jesus also realized that life means more than food and the body than clothing.
Jesus often spoke to individuals about the Kingdom.
For instance, he carried on a lively and fruitful conversation with a woman at Jacob’s well near the city of Sychar.
He also spoke with Matthew Levi, a tax collector.
Matthew accepted Jesus invitation to be his follower.
Matthew and others heard Jesus speak at some length during a feast held in Matthew’s home.
On another occasion, Jesus spoke in a friendly way to Nathanael, who had a negative view of people from Nazareth.
However, Nathanael was moved to change his thinking.
He decided to learn more about what Jesus, a man from Nazareth, was teaching.
So we have good reason to train new publishers to converse with people in a friendly, relaxed manner.
Those whom we help in this way will likely be delighted to see how honesthearted people respond favorably to personal interest and kind words.
Marriage is very much a part of life.
A review of its origin and purpose can help us to have a proper view of this relationship and enjoy its intended blessings more fully.
After God created the first man, Adam, the animals were brought to him so that he could name them.
But for man there was no helper as a complement of him.
God therefore caused Adam to fall into a deep sleep, took a rib from him, built it into a woman, and brought her to the man.
Thus, marriage is of divine origin.
Jesus confirmed that it was Jehovah who stated: A man will leave his father and his mother and will stick to his wife, and the two will be one flesh.
God’s use of a rib from Adam in creating the first woman could have impressed on the first human couple the closeness of their union.
There was no arrangement for divorce or for having more than one mate at the same time.
Serious problems that persist in marriage may lead one mate or both mates to consider separation or divorce.
Separating from one’s marriage partner should not be viewed lightly.
Though separation may seem to be the answer when serious difficulties arise, it often causes more problems.
After repeating what God had stated about a man leaving his father and his mother and sticking to his wife, Jesus said: What God has yoked together, let no man put apart.
This also means that neither a husband nor a wife should put apart what God has yoked together.
Jehovah views marriage as a lifelong bond.
Bearing in mind that all of us will render an account to God should move marriage mates to make earnest efforts to resolve problems quickly so that these do not become more serious.
God’s Word provides practical guidance that can help us to make wise choices that will bring glory to God.
Still, what we wear involves some personal preference.
Our individual tastes vary, as do our financial resources.
But our clothes should always be neat, clean, modest, appropriate to the occasion, and acceptable locally.
We must admit that it is not always easy to make a decision that shows good judgment, that is sensible, and that takes all factors into account.
Many stores cater to popular fashions, so it may take more time and effort to find modest skirts, dresses, and blouses or suits and slacks that are not too tight.
Yet, fellow believers will likely note and appreciate the results of our sincere efforts to find attractive and appropriate clothing.
And the satisfaction we have of bringing glory to our loving heavenly Father more than makes up for any inconveniences that we may face to dress so as to glorify him.
When Daniel and his companions were exiled, the Babylonians tried to assimilate them into their culture by teaching them the language of the Chaldeans.
Moreover, the court official in charge of their training gave them Babylonian names.
The name given to Daniel referred to Bel, the main divinity of Babylon.
King Nebuchadnezzar likely wanted to impress Daniel with the idea that his God, Jehovah, had been subjected by Babylon’s god.
Although Daniel was offered food to eat from the king’s delicacies, he resolved in his heart that he would not defile himself.
Because he kept studying the sacred books in his mother tongue, he maintained his spiritual health while living in a foreign land.
Thus, some 70 years after his arrival in Babylon, he was still known by his Hebrew name.
Just like Jesus early followers, we meet together to learn and to be encouraged.
Even experienced servants of God need encouragement.
Consider Joshua.
He had served God faithfully for many years.
Yet, Jehovah told Moses to encourage him, saying: Commission Joshua and encourage him and strengthen him, because he is the one who will cross over before this people and he is the one who will cause them to inherit the land that you will see.
Joshua was about to take on the huge responsibility of leading the Israelites in the conquest of the Promised Land.
He would face setbacks and at least one military defeat.
No wonder Joshua needed to be encouraged and strengthened! So let us personally encourage elders, including circuit overseers, who work hard to care for the flock of God.
What methods did Jesus and his disciples use to preach the good news?
They went to the people wherever they could be found—in public areas and in private homes.
The preaching work included searching for deserving ones from house to house.
This systematic method showed impartiality.
What has been the record of Jehovah’s Witnesses?
They are the only ones who preach that Jesus has been ruling as King since 1914.
As Jesus instructed, they place a high priority on the preaching work.
The book Pillars of Faith—American Congregations and Their Partners notes: Jehovah’s Witnesses never forget that their primary task is delivering a spiritual message about the coming end of the world and the necessity for salvation.
Jehovah’s Witnesses continue to deliver that message, using methods that Jesus and his disciples used.
For some illnesses, there may be no known cure.
So it is wise to be cautious when it comes to treatments that feature stunning claims but that are promoted merely with hearsay testimonials.
Paul was inspired to write: Let your reasonableness become known to all men.
Reasonableness also holds us back from devoting so much time to health care that spiritual matters are forced into the background.
Were we to allow health care to become the main focus of our life, we would run the risk of becoming self-centered.
Spiritual matters are most important, and with regard to health, our expectations should remain reasonable.
On matters like health care, each of us should be willing to make a personal decision and accept the responsibility that comes with it.
Solomon’s bad associations undermined his wisdom and caused him to fall away from true worship.
What a warning that is for Christians who might think about marrying someone who does not love Jehovah! What if someone becomes a worshipper of God while married to an unbeliever?
The Bible says: You wives, be in subjection to your husbands, so that if any are not obedient to the word, they may be won without a word through the conduct of their wives.
Those words are addressed to Christian wives, but the same words apply to a husband who becomes a worshipper of Jehovah while married to an unbeliever.
The Bible’s counsel is clear: Be a good mate, and live up to God’s high standards for marriage.
Many unbelieving mates have accepted the truth because of observing a husband or a wife who changed after complying with God’s requirements.
Has your upbringing or environment exposed you to national or regional loyalties?
Do any such feelings still linger in your heart?
Christians should not allow nationalistic fervor to taint their view of others.
But what if you realize that you do have negative thoughts toward people of other nations, cultures, languages, or races?
Then it would certainly be profitable to meditate on how Jehovah views nationalism and prejudice.
Researching these and related topics may prove to be a worthwhile project.
Then petition Jehovah for help to embrace his point of view on these matters.
We should do this because sooner or later, all of Jehovah’s servants will find themselves in situations in which their conscience obliges them to stand out as different from those around them—whether colleagues, classmates, neighbors, relatives, or others.
What will happen after the destruction of false religious organizations?
It will be a time to reveal what is really in our heart.
The majority of mankind will seek refuge in human organizations that are likened to the rocks of the mountains.
Figuratively speaking, however, God’s people will flee to the refuge that Jehovah provides.
In the first century, the interval was not a time for a mass conversion of Jews to Christianity.
It was a time for action and obedience on the part of those who were already Christians.
Similarly, we cannot expect that the future interruption in the great tribulation will result in an influx of new believers.
Rather, it will be an opportunity for all true believers to prove their love for Jehovah and give their support to Christ’s brothers.
It will be a pleasure to be under Jehovah’s arrangements in the new world as we work toward beautifying the earth, teaching resurrected ones, and doing Jehovah’s will for mankind.
But what if we were directed to perform a particular aspect of the work that did not appeal to us?
Would we submit to that direction by doing our best to carry out and even enjoy our assignment?
Most of us would answer yes! Consistently, then, are we submitting to theocratic direction now?
If we are doing so, we are preparing for everlasting life under Jehovah’s rulership.
We can prepare for life in the new world not only by submitting to Jehovah’s present-day arrangements but also by working now to cultivate contentment and a spirit of cooperation.
If we cooperate with those taking the lead today, perhaps finding contentment and joy in new assignments of service, we are likely to have the same attitude in the new world.
Jehovah hears our pleas and understands us even when no one else does.
His response to our prayers is a beautiful expression of his enduring love for us.
We can learn much from prayers recorded in God’s Word.
At times, therefore, we may find it very beneficial to consider such prayers during family worship.
Reflecting on how Jehovah’s servants of the past expressed their deepest thoughts to God may help us to enrich our own prayers.
For instance, consider Jonah’s contrite prayer from the belly of a huge fish.
Review Solomon’s heartfelt prayer to Jehovah at the inauguration of the temple.
Meditate on the model prayer that Jesus offered for our benefit.
Above all, regularly let your petitions be made known to God.
As a result, the peace of God that surpasses all understanding will guard your hearts and your mental powers.
God’s power enabled Jesus Christ to perform a wide variety of astounding miracles.
He cured not only leprosy but also every sort of disease and every sort of infirmity among the people.
To perform such acts of compassion, Jesus needed no organ donors for transplants.
He healed the very organs or body parts that were afflicted! And he healed people instantly, sometimes even from a distance.
What do these amazing examples show?
That Jesus, now enthroned as heavenly King, has not only the power but also the desire to bring about permanent healing.
Learning about the way Jesus treated people gives us confidence that in the new world, the Bible prophecy will be fulfilled: He will have pity on the lowly and the poor.
Yes, Jesus will then act on his heart’s desire to help all afflicted ones.
Jehovah gives us his powerful holy spirit, which can strengthen us and help us to resist temptation.
God also forewarns us through his Word and the congregation about situations that we must avoid, such as spending excessive time, money, and energy on nonessential material things.
Former pioneers Espen and Janne have two children to care for.
We often pray to Jehovah, says Espen, that we may not fall into temptation now that we are unable to spend as much time as we previously did in theocratic activities.
We ask Jehovah to help us maintain our spirituality and zeal for the ministry.
Another temptation that has come to the fore in modern times is the viewing of pornography.
Some have given in to this temptation by allowing their minds to dwell on what is bad.
But we can resist, even as thousands of our brothers have done.
The universe truly is a marvel of organization.
Surely, then, we should expect that Jehovah wants his worshippers to be well-organized.
In fact, to that end God has provided the Bible for our guidance.
Living without the help of God’s organization and his standards would result in unhappiness and misery.
The people of ancient Israel were a model of organization.
Under the Mosaic Law, for example, there were women who were organized to serve at the entrance of the tent of meeting.
Later, King David organized the Levites and the priests into effective divisions.
The first-century Christian congregation was organized, and it benefited from the direction of the governing body, initially made up of the apostles.
Counsel and instructions were also provided by means of inspired letters.
How grateful we should be that Jehovah used his holy spirit to reveal the truth to us and to enable us to exercise faith in the good news! We should never cease thanking Jehovah for drawing us to himself through his Son, the Chief Agent and Perfecter of our faith.
To show our appreciation for such undeserved kindness, we should keep strengthening our faith through prayer and study of God’s Word.
We should keep exercising our faith in Jehovah’s promises.
We must do this in ways that are clearly evident to others.
For example, we keep on preaching about God’s Kingdom and sharing in the work of making disciples.
We also keep working what is good toward all, but especially toward those related to us in the faith.
And we work hard to strip off the old personality with its practices.
As the early Christian congregation grew, a situation that apparently involved discrimination arose.
Greek-speaking Jews complained that their widows were not being treated fairly.
To settle this issue, the apostles appointed seven men to make sure that nobody was neglected.
These men all had Greek names, which seems to indicate that the apostles wanted to ease any tensions over background that might have existed among the early Christians.
Whether we realize it or not, we are all deeply influenced by our culture.
Moreover, we likely hear neighbors, fellow workers, or schoolmates make derogatory remarks about those of another background, tribe, or skin color.
Paul had full confidence that he could win his internal battle by prayerfully relying on Jehovah and exercising faith in Jesus ransom sacrifice.
What about us?
As we struggle against giving in to our own fleshly weaknesses, we can succeed.
How?
By imitating Paul, by fully relying on Jehovah and not on our own strength, and by having faith in the ransom.
There are times when God may allow us to demonstrate the depth of our concern about a matter.
For instance, what if we or a family member were stricken by a serious illness or we were faced with some injustice?
We would show our full trust in Jehovah by supplicating him in prayer to give us the strength to keep faithful and not lose our joy and spiritual balance.
The experience of many, both in Paul’s day and in ours, proves that prayer can help us to renew our power and build up confidence to continue enduring.
Faithful ones mentioned in died before the promised offspring, Jesus Christ, opened the way to heavenly life.
Nevertheless, they will be resurrected to perfect human life in an earthly paradise.
says of some who lived in pre-Christian times: In faith all of these died, although they did not receive the fulfillment of the promises; but they saw them from a distance and welcomed them.
One of these was Abraham.
Did he keep clear in mind the happy hope of life under the promised offspring?
Jesus gave a clear answer to that question when he said to his opposers: Abraham your father rejoiced greatly at the prospect of seeing my day, and he saw it and rejoiced.
The same was true of Sarah, Isaac, Jacob, and many others who focused their hope on the future Kingdom, whose designer and builder is God.
Although Noah and his three sons each had only one wife, polygamy was practiced in patriarchal times.
In many cultures, sexual immorality became a way of life, even being incorporated into religious rites.
When Abram Abraham and his wife, Sarai Sarah, obeyed God and moved to Canaan, that land was filled with practices that made a mockery of marriage.
Jehovah therefore decreed that Sodom and Gomorrah be destroyed because inhabitants of those cities practiced or condoned gross sexual immorality.
Abraham took the proper lead in his family, and Sarah set a fine example by submitting to her husband’s headship.
Abraham made sure that his son Isaac married a worshipper of Jehovah.
Similar concern for true worship guided Isaac’s son Jacob, whose sons became the forefathers of the 12 tribes of Israel.
Jehovah in his undeserved kindness grants us the blessing of approaching his heavenly throne in prayer.
He has afforded us this privilege through his Son, by means of whom we have this freeness of speech and free access with confidence through our faith in him.
Free access to Jehovah in prayer is indeed a wonderful expression of his undeserved kindness.
Paul encouraged us to approach Jehovah freely in prayer, so that we may receive mercy and find undeserved kindness to help us at the right time.
At any time that we are plagued with trials or turmoil in our life, we can cry out to Jehovah for his merciful help.
Undeserving as we are, he answers our call, often through fellow Christians, so that we may be of good courage and say: Jehovah is my helper; I will not be afraid.
What can man do to me?
’—.
Notice that this is a personal request not purely for my bread for the day but for our bread for the day.
Victor, a circuit overseer in Africa, explains: I often sincerely thank Jehovah that my wife and I don’t have to be seriously concerned about where our next meal will come from, nor do we have to worry about who will pay the rent.
Our brothers kindly look after us every day.
But I do pray that those helping us will manage to handle the economic pressures they face.
If we have sufficient food for many days, we can think of brothers who live in poverty or who are affected by disasters.
We should not only pray for them but also act in harmony with our prayers.
For example, we can share what we have with fellow worshippers in need.
We can also regularly contribute to the worldwide work, knowing that such funds are used wisely.
Are you a young person who is considering baptism?
If so, what lies before you is the greatest privilege any human could have.
However, baptism is a serious step.
It symbolizes your dedication—a solemn promise you make to Jehovah that you will serve him forever by putting his will above everything else in your life.
Understandably, you should get baptized only when you are qualified to make that decision, you have a personal desire to do so, and you understand the meaning of dedication.
What if you are not sure that you are ready for baptism?
Or what if you want to get baptized but your parents feel that you should wait, perhaps until you gain more experience in Christian living?
In either case, do not be discouraged.
Instead, use this opportunity to make progress so that, before long, you can get baptized.
Some now serving God were married when they learned the truth, and their mate is not a Witness.
Still, applying Bible principles can contribute to harmony in the family.
That involves cooperating to the greatest extent possible without compromising.
This may be challenging, but think of the possible reward.
Also, in view of Satan’s attack on the family today, it is vital for all of God’s servants to maintain good cooperation in their marriage.
No matter how long you have been married, give thought to what you personally can say or do to strengthen your marriage.
Older ones can even assist younger members of the congregation in this regard.
You might on occasion invite a younger couple to your home to share in family worship with you and your mate.
While the younger ones are with you, they can observe that affection and harmony are important no matter how long one has been married.
Forward-looking elders share in a timely fashion with younger brothers the experience they have acquired during their years of faithful service.
Elders who train others are a blessing to the flock.
They strengthen the congregation’s defenses.
How?
The efforts of elders to train others result in more brothers who will be ready to help the congregation to stand firm and united, not only now but especially when turbulent times come during the great tribulation.
Therefore, dear elders, we appeal to you to make training a regular feature of your ministry today.
Of course, we understand that the time you spend on caring for important congregation activities may already make you feel stretched to the limit.
Hence, you may need to take some of that time and use it for training.
Doing so would be a wise investment.
Pride can disrupt the peace of a congregation.
Deep-seated feelings of animosity and superiority can affect our speech and actions, causing untold pain to others.
If we personally have a tendency to feel superior to others, we need to remember that everyone proud in heart is detestable to Jehovah.
We would also do well to examine our view of those who belong to another race, nationality, or culture.
If we harbor feelings of racial or national pride, we ignore the fact that God made out of one man every nation of men.
In that sense, there is just one race because all mankind has a common ancestor, Adam.
Therefore, how absurd it is to believe that some races are inherently superior or inferior.
Such thinking would suit Satan’s scheme to disrupt our Christian love and unity.
To fight Satan and win, we must resist all forms of improper pride.
There is no real or true God but Jehovah; no other god is like him.
Thus, Moses was reminding the Israelites that their worship of Jehovah must be exclusive.
They were not to follow the peoples around them, who worshipped various gods and goddesses.
Some of those false gods were viewed as ruling over certain parts of nature.
Others were separate forms of a particular deity.
For example, the Egyptians worshipped the sun-god Ra, the sky-goddess Nut, the earth-god Geb, the Nile-god Hapi, and numerous sacred animals.
Many of these false gods were dealt devastating blows by Jehovah through the Ten Plagues.
The prominent Canaanite god was Baal, the god of fertility, who also appeared as the god of the sky, rain, and storm.
In many places, Baal was the local patron deity as well.
The Israelites were to remember that their God, the true God, is one Jehovah.
By choosing to do God’s will and by working hard to do so, we show our depth of love for Jehovah and our desire to please him.
We also demonstrate our support of his sovereignty.
Satan has challenged the rightfulness of Jehovah’s sovereignty, so our voluntary and vigorous efforts to uphold it are undoubtedly of special value to our benevolent and appreciative heavenly Father.
However, if Jehovah completely relieved us of the need to exert ourselves to fight our imperfect tendencies so as to please him, any claim of loyalty and support of his sovereignty would be meaningless.
Thus, Jehovah tells us to put forth earnest effort in developing godly qualities.
He expects us to work hard to control our thoughts and feelings.
Having made a genuine effort in this regard, we feel all the more satisfied when we realize that the Bible is still changing our life.
Who really are preaching the good news of the Kingdom today?
With full confidence, we can say: Jehovah’s Witnesses! Why can we be so confident?
Because we are preaching the right message, the good news of the Kingdom.
By going to the people, we are also using the correct methods.
Our preaching work is being done with the right motive—love, not financial gain.
Our work has the greatest scope, reaching out to people of all nations and languages.
And we will continue to do this work without letup, year in and year out, until the end comes.
We truly marvel at what is being accomplished by God’s people in these exciting times in which we live.
But how is it possible for all of this to happen?
The apostle Paul answers in today’s text.
May all of us continue to be energized by our loving Father as we do our very best and fully accomplish our ministry.
At our meetings, our Grand Instructor directs us through the pages of his Word, the Bible.
Even unbelievers who attend our meetings may conclude: God is really among you.
Jehovah blesses meetings with his holy spirit and actively directs the Scriptural teaching program.
At our meetings, then, we are listening to Jehovah’s voice and sensing his loving care.
Consequently, we draw close to him.
Jesus said: Where there are two or three gathered together in my name, there I am in their midst.
As head of the congregation, Christ walks among the congregations of God’s people.
Think of it! Jehovah and Jesus are actively involved in strengthening us at Christian meetings.
The battle was grueling.
Israelite soldiers led by Judge Gideon had chased their enemies—the Midianite army and its allies—all night for a distance of some 20 miles 32 km! The Israelites knew that this was no time to give up.
So to eliminate the enemy, they kept up the pursuit and subdued Midian.
We too are fighting a relentless battle.
Our enemies include Satan, his world, and our own imperfections.
Some of us have battled for decades, and with Jehovah’s help, we gained victories.
At times, though, we may get tired of battling our enemies and of waiting for the end of this system of things.
Indeed, we have not yet won the complete victory.
Jesus warned that we who live in the last days would face severe trials and cruel mistreatment, but he also said that gaining the victory would depend on our endurance.
The word one suggests unity and oneness of purpose and activity.
Jehovah God is not divided or unpredictable.
Rather, he is always faithful, consistent, loyal, and true.
He promised Abraham that his descendants would inherit the Promised Land, and Jehovah performed mighty deeds to fulfill that promise.
The passing of 430 years did not diminish Jehovah’s determination to do so.
Centuries later, when identifying the Israelites as his witnesses, Jehovah told them: I am the same One.
Before me no God was formed, and after me there has been none.
Emphasizing his unchanging purpose, Jehovah added: I am always the same One.
What an extraordinary privilege for the Israelites—and for us—to be servants of Jehovah, the God who is consistent and loyal in all his ways!—.
Most nations today have watchmen in the form of border patrols and high-tech surveillance systems.
They watch for intrusions into their territory and for enemies who pose a threat to national security.
However, such watchmen can perceive only those threats that come from man-made governments or humans.
They are unaware of the existence and activities of God’s heavenly Kingdom government in the hands of Christ and the role it will play in the impending judgment on all the nations.
, ftn.
; ; On the other hand, by being alert and watchful spiritually, we will be ready whenever that day of judgment arrives.
The closer we get to the end of this system of things, the greater the challenge for us to stay awake.
Jonathan must have been astonished by the way young David faced the giant Goliath.
Now David stood before Jonathan’s father, King Saul of Israel, with the head of the Philistine in his hand.
Jonathan probably admired David for his courage.
It was clear that God was with David, and Jonathan and David became bound together in close friendship.
In fact, they made a covenant because Jonathan loved David as himself.
For the rest of his life, he was loyal to David.
Jonathan’s attachment to David endured, even though God had chosen David to be Israel’s next king.
Jonathan became concerned about David when Saul was seeking to kill him.
To encourage his friend, Jonathan traveled into the Judean wilderness at Horesh.
There, Jonathan helped David find strength in Jehovah, saying the words of today’s text.
One who is somewhat younger can realize what it means to do what is right and to be dedicated to his Creator.
Thus, baptism is an important and appropriate step for a young person who has manifested considerable maturity and has made a dedication to Jehovah.
What does it mean to be mature?
Maturity involves more than physical growth.
The Bible says that mature people have their powers of discernment trained to distinguish both right and wrong.
Thus, mature people know what is right in Jehovah’s eyes and are resolved in their heart to stick to it.
As a result, they are not easily swayed to do what is wrong; nor do they always have to be prodded to do what is right.
Really, it is only reasonable to expect that a young person who gets baptized will uphold God’s standards even when parents or other adults are not present.
Do you appreciate what Jehovah has done for you?
Then it would be fitting to dedicate your life to Jehovah and get baptized.
Remember, dedication involves a solemn promise to Jehovah to do his will forever, no matter what happens.
Should you be afraid to make such a commitment?
Not at all! Bear in mind that Jehovah has your best interests at heart, and he is the rewarder of those earnestly seeking him.
Dedicating yourself to Jehovah and getting baptized do not make your life worse.
On the contrary, serving Jehovah will make your life better.
How different Jehovah is from Satan, whose interest in you is only selfish! Satan offers no lasting reward to those who side with him.
At one time, he enjoyed a fine standing with Jehovah.
At some point, however, this spirit creature began to desire the worship of humans.
Rather than dismiss that improper desire, he nurtured it and let it grow until it gave birth to sin.
We know that creature as Satan, who did not stand fast in the truth.
He rebelled against Jehovah and became the father of the lie.
Since his rebellion, Satan has proved to be Jehovah’s greatest enemy, and he certainly has not been a friend of mankind.
The titles given to Satan reveal the depth of his corruption.
Satan means Resister, indicating that this wicked spirit creature does not support God’s sovereignty; rather, he hates it and aggressively fights it.
More than anything else, Satan wants to see the end of Jehovah’s sovereignty.
Studying the Scriptures does more than reveal areas in which we can improve spiritually.
It also deepens our appreciation for Jehovah’s endearing ways, causing us to love him even more.
And when our love for God grows, his love for us intensifies, thus strengthening our bond with him.
For us to draw close to Jehovah, however, it is essential that we study with the right objective.
says: This means everlasting life, their coming to know you, the only true God, and the one whom you sent, Jesus Christ.
Thus, our objective should be not merely to take in knowledge but to come to know Jehovah better as a Person.
As we come to know Jehovah more intimately, we will not be unduly disturbed if certain Bible accounts leave us wondering why he acted as he did.
Recently, a group of elders who are successful in helping brothers to grow spiritually were asked what approach they use when training others.
Though the circumstances of these brothers vary greatly, the advice they gave was strikingly similar.
What does this indicate?
That Bible-based training is applicable to learners everywhere in every congregation—just as it was in the apostle Paul’s day.
A teacher needs to create the right conditions for training.
Just as a gardener needs to cultivate, or loosen, the soil before sowing seeds, so a teacher needs to prepare, or encourage, the heart of a learner before teaching him new skills.
So how do teachers create the right conditions for training others?
By following an approach similar to that taken by Samuel when he was preparing Saul to lead Israel.
The clergy of Christendom are not preaching God’s Kingdom.
If they do speak about the Kingdom, many refer to it as a feeling or a condition in the heart of a Christian.
They do not help people to understand that God’s Kingdom is a heavenly government with Jesus Christ as Ruler, that it is the solution to all mankind’s problems, and that it will soon remove all wickedness from this earth.
Rather, they prefer to remember Jesus at Christmas and Easter.
They seem to have no idea of what Jesus will accomplish as earth’s new Ruler.
They have also lost sight of what should be the motive for preaching.
It should not be to collect money and construct elaborate buildings.
The Word of God should not be commercialized.
Those preaching the Kingdom message should not seek personal gain for the work that they do.
Adam lost his sonship when he rebelled against his Maker.
Nonetheless, throughout the generations a great cloud of Adam’s descendants have chosen to uphold God’s sovereignty.
By humbly submitting to their Creator, they have demonstrated that they wanted him, not Satan, to be their Father and Potter.
Their loyalty to God calls to mind the words of our day’s text.
Today, all who worship Jehovah in spirit and truth endeavor to reflect the same humble, submissive attitude.
They consider it an honor to address Jehovah as Father and to submit to him as their Potter.
Ask Jehovah for the wisdom to recognize and deal with situations that could cause you to violate your Christian neutrality.
If you are imprisoned or otherwise punished because of your resolute stand for true worship, pray for the strength to defend your faith with boldness and to endure whatever persecution may come.
Jehovah can strengthen you by means of his Word.
Meditate on verses that will help you maintain your neutrality under test.
Commit them to memory now, so that they can sustain you if you do not have access to a Bible later.
God’s Word can also reinforce your hope in future Kingdom blessings.
This hope is essential if we are to endure persecution.
Select passages that describe blessings that you especially hope to enjoy, and visualize yourself experiencing those blessings in Paradise.
Jehovah’s faithful servants on earth, his Witnesses, make up an organization that is indeed exceptional.
True, it is composed of humans who are imperfect and who have their faults.
Still, God’s holy spirit has been moving his global congregation to grow and prosper.
When the last days of the present system began back in 1914, God’s servants on earth were relatively few in number.
But Jehovah blessed their preaching work.
During the following decades, millions of new ones learned Bible truths and became Jehovah’s Witnesses.
Jehovah actually pointed forward to this outstanding growth, saying the words of today’s text and adding: I myself, Jehovah, will speed it up in its own time.
That prophetic statement has certainly come true in these last days.
Thus, the number of God’s people on earth is now greater than the entire population of many nations.
For Jesus, it was unthinkable that his heavenly Father would provide food for the birds but not take care of the same basic needs of humans.
He will not put the food in our mouths, but he may bless our efforts to grow the food we need or to earn the money to buy our daily provisions.
In cases of need, he may motivate others to share what they have.
Although Jesus did not mention providing shelter for the birds of heaven, Jehovah has provided them with the instincts, skills, and materials needed to make nests for themselves.
Jehovah can likewise help us find adequate housing for our families.
When saying the words found in today’s text, Jesus no doubt had in mind that he would soon give his life in behalf of mankind.
Compare .
Jesus did not die for the birds of heaven, but he did die for us so that we might enjoy unending life.
Creation proves that God is the incomparable Organizer.
Jehovah founded the earth in wisdom, says the Bible.
He solidly established the heavens in discernment.
We know only the fringes of God’s ways, and only a faint whisper has been heard of him.
Yet, the little we know about planets, stars, and galaxies moves us to acknowledge that these celestial bodies are superbly organized.
Galaxies consist of millions of stars, all moving in space in an orderly way.
Why, planets in our solar system travel in orbits around the sun as though they were humbly obeying traffic laws! Surely the mind-boggling order evident in the universe helps us to see that Jehovah, who skillfully made the heavens and the earth, deserves our praise, loyalty, and worship.
After serving in a foreign-language field for over three years, Serge and his wife, Muriel, noticed that their 17-year-old son lacked joy in theocratic activities.
When we realized that this situation had hindered our son from making spiritual advancement, explains Serge, we decided to move back to our former congregation.
What factors might influence parents to move back?
First, they should determine whether they really have enough time and resources to instill love for Jehovah in their children while at the same time teaching them a foreign tongue.
Second, they may notice in their children a lack of interest in spiritual activities or in the foreign-language field in which they are serving.
In such circumstances, Christian parents might consider moving back to a congregation that uses the language their children best understand until their children take a firm stand for the truth.
Without doubt, Noah’s neighbors must have asked him why he was building such a colossal structure.
Did Noah keep quiet or tell them to mind their own business?
By no means! His faith moved him to witness boldly and to warn his contemporaries of God’s coming judgment.
Quite likely, Noah repeated to the people the exact words that Jehovah had spoken to him: I have decided to put an end to all flesh, because the earth is full of violence on account of them I am going to bring floodwaters upon the earth to destroy from under the heavens all flesh that has the breath of life.
Everything on the earth will perish.
Also, Noah no doubt explained to the people the only means of escape, repeating God’s command: You must go into the ark.
Thus, Noah further exercised his faith by being a preacher of righteousness.
After serving God for years, a Christian could begin to set his or her mind on the things of the flesh.
That does not refer to a Christian who occasionally thinks about food, employment, recreation, or even romance.
Those are aspects of life for the average servant of God.
Jesus enjoyed food, and he fed others.
He saw the need for refreshment.
And Paul wrote about the proper place for passion or intimacy within marriage.
The Greek word that Paul used means to set one’s mind or heart upon something, to employ one’s faculty for thoughtful planning, with the emphasis upon the underlying disposition or attitude.
Those who live according to the flesh allow their life course to be determined basically by their sinful human nature.
One scholar says about that word at : They set their minds on—are most deeply interested in, constantly talk about, engage and glory in—the things pertaining to the flesh.
describes the time—from 1914 to early 1919—when the anointed sons of Levi would undergo a period of refinement.
During that time, Jehovah God, the true Lord, accompanied by Jesus Christ, the messenger of the covenant, came to the spiritual temple to inspect those serving there.
After receiving needed discipline, Jehovah’s cleansed people were ready to take up a further assignment of service.
In 1919, a faithful and discreet slave was appointed to provide spiritual food to the household of faith.
God’s people were now free of the influence of Babylon the Great.
Since that time, by Jehovah’s undeserved kindness, his people have constantly been growing in knowledge of God’s will and in love for their heavenly Father.
We love Jehovah because he first loved us.
As one expression of his tender love, Jehovah has taken the initiative to bless his loyal servants.
The more we love our God, the stronger our faith becomes, not only that he exists, but that he unfailingly rewards those whom he loves.
Being a rewarder is an integral part of who Jehovah is and what he does.
Our faith is not complete unless we are firmly convinced that God will reward those who earnestly seek him, for faith is the assured expectation of what is hoped for.
Yes, faith involves the certain expectation of God’s promised blessings.
As shown in today’s text, Jehovah invites us to reach out for his blessing.
We show our deep appreciation and gratitude when we accept Jehovah’s generous offer.
True contentment is based on our trust in Jehovah.
It allows us to have a balanced view of material possessions.
It helps us to realize that our relationship with Jehovah and our Christian brothers is far more important than anything that money can buy.
A contented person does not complain, grumble, or find fault; nor does he succumb to feelings of envy and greed—feelings that can stifle the development of brotherly love.
Rather, contentment promotes a generous spirit.
Also, our trust in Jehovah gives us courage, no matter what challenges we may face.
This courage, in turn, allows us to have a positive attitude and to build up and comfort our fellow believers.
Even when the world faces the great tribulation, we will be able to stand up straight and lift up our heads, knowing that our deliverance is near.
If we are ill, we can look to God for comfort, wisdom, and support, as did true worshippers in the past.
Still, we know that an individual living in David’s day who showed consideration to a lowly one did not keep living without end.
Hence, when David wrote the above, he could not have meant that such a considerate individual would be kept alive miraculously, thus gaining everlasting life.
We can take those inspired words to mean that God would help the loyal considerate one.
How?
David explained: Jehovah will sustain him on his sickbed; during his sickness you will completely change his bed.
Yes, an individual who showed consideration to a lowly one could be certain that God was aware of him and his faithful course.
And the recuperative power of his God-given body might help him to get better, to recover from his sickness.
In the past, the English New World Translation followed the pattern of some other English Bibles that use the Hebrew expression Sheol in verses such as .
That verse used to read: There is no work nor devising nor knowledge nor wisdom in Sheʹol, the place to which you are going.
Translators of many non-English editions faced this problem: The term Sheol is unknown to most of their readers, it is not found in their dictionaries, and it sounds like some geographic location.
Accordingly, for the 2013 revision, approval was given to make the meaning of Sheol and the corresponding Greek term Hades clear by translating them accurately as the Grave.
Obsolete English expressions were also replaced, and a concerted effort was put forth to make the text clear and easy to understand without sacrificing accuracy.
Applying what had been done in other languages sharpened the English text.
We need time to meditate as we prepare to conduct a Bible study.
With each student in mind, we might think of a viewpoint question or an illustration to help the student make progress.
Time spent in this way can be most refreshing, as pondering over these things strengthens our own faith and helps us to conduct our Bible studies with greater effectiveness and enthusiasm.
The same is true when we prepare our heart to go out in the field service.
Reading a chapter from the Bible book of Acts will stir up like a fire our enthusiasm for the ministry.
Meditating on Bible verses we intend to use that day and the publications we plan to offer will help us carry out our privilege of service.
Think about the people in the territory and what may arouse their interest.
All such preparation will move us to witness effectively with a demonstration of spirit and power from the Word of God.
It would reflect a serious lack of love and trust for us to make decisions without taking God’s will into consideration.
Once in the days of Samuel, Israel was badly defeated in battle by the Philistines.
God’s people were in dire need of help and protection.
What did they do?
Let us take the ark of Jehovah’s covenant with us from Shiloh, so that it may be with us and save us from the hand of our enemies, they decided.
The outcome?
The slaughter was very great; on Israel’s side, 30,000 foot soldiers fell.
Moreover, the Ark of God was captured.
It might have seemed that in taking the Ark with them, the Israelites were looking to Jehovah for help.
Really, though, they had not sought Jehovah’s direction; they were following their own ideas, and the result was disastrous.
What can you do to build and maintain strong faith?
Do not be satisfied with only what you learned up to the point of your baptism.
Take note of fulfilled prophecies in the Bible because these can provide you with powerful reasons for having faith.
You can also use God’s Word as a measuring rod to see if your faith matches the description of what is expected of those who have strong faith.
The apostle Paul told fellow Christians that they could have an interchange of encouragement by one another’s faith.
As we associate with fellow worshippers, we can build up one another’s faith, especially when we are with those who have already demonstrated the tested quality of their faith.
Bad associations destroy faith, but good associations build it.
That is one reason why we are counseled not to forsake our meeting together.
Servants of Jehovah want to train their conscience.
They want the proddings of their conscience to agree with the standards of right and wrong, good and bad, as reflected in God’s Word.
A properly trained conscience exercises a powerful influence for good in the Christian congregation.
However, training and using our Christian conscience is not just a mental activity.
The Bible links a good conscience to faith and love.
Paul wrote: The objective of this instruction is love out of a clean heart and out of a good conscience and out of faith without hypocrisy.
As we train our conscience and respond to it, our love for Jehovah will deepen and our faith will be strengthened.
In fact, the way we use our conscience reveals the depth of our spirituality, the quality of our heart, and the intensity of our desire to please Jehovah.
Indeed, this inner voice reflects what sort of person we truly are.
Jesus mentioned the sanctification of God’s name as the first request in his model prayer.
Since Jehovah is holy, all principles and laws that originate with him are holy.
In spite of this, in the garden of Eden, Satan slyly questioned God’s right to set standards for humans.
By lying about Jehovah, Satan slandered God’s sacred name.
Jesus, on the other hand, truly loved the name of Jehovah.
Jesus contributed to the sanctification of the divine name.
By his perfect life course on earth, Jesus proved that it is reasonable and righteous for Jehovah to set standards for his intelligent creatures.
By being loyal to his heavenly Father until death, Jesus proved that a perfect human could maintain perfect obedience to God’s righteous standards.
Although Hezekiah was the son of one of Judah’s worst kings, he grew up to be one of the very best.
Hezekiah set about righting the terrible wrongs that his father had committed.
He did so by cleansing the temple, atoning for the people’s sins, and destroying pagan idols in a vigorous and far-reaching campaign.
When he faced daunting challenges, such as the threat of attack on Jerusalem by the Assyrian king Sennacherib, Hezekiah showed profound courage and faith.
He relied on God for salvation and strengthened his people by word and example.
Later, when Hezekiah needed correction for showing a haughty attitude, he humbled himself and repented.
Clearly, Hezekiah did not let his past ruin his present or deprive him of a future.
Rather, he showed that he was Jehovah’s friend and a fine example to imitate.
Kindness can help you to deal with a conflict of loyalties.
For example, you may have definite knowledge that a certain fellow believer is guilty of serious misconduct.
You may feel loyal to him, especially if he is a close friend or a relative.
But if you were to cover up the wrongdoing, you would be disloyal to God.
Of course, your loyalty to Jehovah should come first.
Be kind yet firm.
Urge your friend or relative to seek the help of the elders.
If he or she does not do so within a reasonable period of time, loyalty to God should move you to report the matter to the elders.
In doing this, you are being loyal to Jehovah and kind to your friend or relative, for Christian elders will try to readjust such an individual with mildness.
What is the record of Jehovah’s Witnesses regarding collections?
Their work is supported by voluntary donations.
No collections are taken at their Kingdom Halls or conventions.
Yet, in 2015 alone, Jehovah’s Witnesses spent 1.
93 billion hours in preaching the good news and conducting free of charge over nine million Bible studies each month.
Amazingly, not only do they go unpaid for their work but they also gladly cover their own expenses.
When speaking of the work of Jehovah’s Witnesses, one researcher stated: The main goal is preaching and teaching.
There is no clergy, which cuts costs considerably.
What, then, is our motive for doing this work?
Put simply, we do this work of our own volition because we love Jehovah and we love our neighbor.
This willing spirit is in fulfillment of the prophecy found in today’s text.
The examples of faithful servants of Jehovah can give us the wisdom and strength we need to endure.
For instance, Shadrach, Meshach, and Abednego refused to worship an image representing the Babylonian State.
Reading about their determination has given Witnesses today the courage to refuse to worship the flag of the nation in which they live.
Also, Jesus stayed completely separate from the political and social conflicts of the world.
Noting the effect that his example would have on others, he urged his disciples to take courage.
Support also comes from the brothers and sisters in your congregation.
Members of the congregation will encourage you if they are aware of the challenges you are facing.
Ask them to pray in your behalf.
Of course, if we want our brothers to support us and pray for us, we should do the same for them.
Jehovah’s people have always treasured occasions to meet together.
Immediately after the Christian congregation was formed, followers of Jesus began devoting themselves to associating together.
You likely share their desire to attend congregation meetings regularly.
Nevertheless, all Christians face obstacles.
Secular work, a busy schedule, or fatigue because of our daily routine can make it difficult to attend meetings.
Appreciating the value of the meetings can motivate us to try to overcome these obstacles and maintain a healthy pattern of meeting attendance.
Granted, some of our fellow believers are unable to attend meetings regularly because of circumstances beyond their control, such as serious illness.
Elders may assist these infirm ones to benefit from spiritual programs, perhaps by helping them to tie in by telephone hookup or by recording the meetings for them.
Jephthah’s thorough grasp of Israel’s history gave him a clear picture of what was right and what was wrong in Jehovah’s eyes.
Godly principles that were embedded in the Mosaic Law molded Jephthah’s thinking as well as his heart.
He knew that Jehovah disapproved of holding grudges; rather, God required that His people love one another.
The Law also taught that a person must not ignore the needs of others, even of someone who hates him.
Examples of faithful ones like Joseph, who showed mercy to his brothers—even though they began to hate him—may also have influenced Jephthah’s response.
Meditating on such examples would have helped Jephthah to choose a course of action that was pleasing to Jehovah.
The conduct of his brothers no doubt hurt him deeply, but he would not hold back from serving Jehovah and His people.
God’s people have always used their ability to speak—to use language—to praise Jehovah and to make his will known to others.
In recent times, a significant way to promote pure worship by the use of language has been through Bible translation.
There are thousands of Bible translations, but they vary in how faithfully they convey the message from the original texts.
In the 1940’s, the New World Bible Translation Committee established principles of translation that have been followed in over 130 languages.
These are: 1 Sanctify God’s name by restoring it to its rightful place in the Scriptures.
2 Translate the original inspired message literally where possible, but convey the correct sense when a word-for-word rendering would distort the meaning.
3 Use easy-to-understand language that encourages reading.
Our efforts to serve God—through prayers, meeting attendance, field service, and other aspects of our worship—are in vain if we refuse to make peace with others.
We cannot be friends of God unless we are willing to forgive the shortcomings of others.
Every Christian needs to think carefully and honestly about being forgiving and having peaceful relations with others.
Do you forgive fellow believers freely?
Are you happy to fellowship with them?
Jehovah expects his servants to be forgiving.
If your conscience tells you that you have improvements to make in this regard, prayerfully seek Jehovah’s help in order to make them! Our heavenly Father will hear such humble prayers and answer them.
If it is not possible to know with certainty the names of all spiritual Israelites on earth today, how can members of the other sheep go with them?
Notice what the prophecy in Zechariah states concerning the figurative ten men.
These ones would take firm hold of the robe of a Jew, saying: We want to go with you, for we have heard that God is with you people.
Although only one Jew is mentioned here, in both instances the pronoun you refers to more than one person.
This spiritual Jew must, then, be a composite person, not just one individual! So it is not necessary to identify every spiritual Jew and then go with him or her.
Rather, we need to identify these ones as a group and then support them as such.
In no way do the Scriptures encourage us to follow an individual.
Jesus is our Leader.
From the cradle to the grave, our greatest need is love.
Humans do need and crave love—and not just the romantic kind.
We hunger for friendship and connection with others.
But there is one kind of love that we need more than any other—Jehovah’s love.
Many find it hard to imagine that humans could acquire a close, loving friendship with Almighty God.
Do we share such skepticism?
Far from it! The Bible shows that imperfect humans have become friends with God.
Their examples are worth contemplating, for building such a friendship is the most worthwhile goal we could pursue in life.
An outstanding example of a man who cultivated such a friendship was Abraham.
How did Abraham draw so close to Jehovah?
A key ingredient in that friendship was faith.
In fact, the Bible calls Abraham the father of all those having faith.
Humans were created with the need to love and be loved.
It is easy to become discouraged if this need is not satisfied because of unexpected events or disappointments, loss of health, financial setbacks, or a lack of success in the ministry.
If we begin to feel that Jehovah no longer loves us, we do well to remember that we are precious to him and that he is there, grasping our right hand and helping us.
He will never forget us if we are faithful to him.
Brigitte, who raised two children alone after her husband died, states: Raising children in Satan’s system is one of the most difficult challenges, especially for a single parent.
But I am convinced of Jehovah’s love because he has guided me through tears and heartache, and he never let me experience more than I could endure.
What a pleasure it is to offer practical, appealing, and attractive literature in the ministry! And when we use the latest technology to spread the truth, such as by means of the jw.
org website, we reflect Jehovah’s interest in providing people everywhere with the guidance most of them lack but so desperately need.
Not to be overlooked is the wisdom behind the adjustment that allowed us to have a Family Worship evening or more time for personal study.
We also appreciate advances made in assembly and convention programs.
We often say that they get better every year! And we certainly rejoice over the increased training being provided by our many theocratic schools.
In all these adjustments, Jehovah’s hand is clearly seen.
Jehovah is the God who supplies endurance and comfort.
He alone fully understands not only the problems we face but also the way our environment, emotions, and even our genetic makeup affect us.
He is thus the best one to equip us to endure.
How will God answer our prayers for strength to endure?
When we ask Jehovah to help us cope with trials, he will make the way out.
Does Jehovah maneuver matters to remove the trial?
Perhaps.
Often, however, he makes the way out so that we may be able to endure it.
Yes, Jehovah strengthens us so that we may endure fully with patience and joy.
And since he knows our physical, mental, and emotional limits so intimately, Jehovah will never allow a situation to develop to a point that we cannot remain faithful.
Most differences between Christians can and should be resolved privately by the individuals concerned.
However, Jesus noted that some situations might require congregation involvement.
What would be the outcome if an offender refused to listen to his brother, to witnesses, and to the congregation?
He should be treated just as a man of the nations and as a tax collector.
Today, we would say that he should be disfellowshipped.
The seriousness of this step indicates that the sin was not a small disagreement.
Rather, it was 1 a sin that could be settled between the individuals concerned but it was also 2 a sin serious enough to merit disfellowshipping if not settled.
Such sins might involve a measure of fraud or might include damaging a person’s reputation through slander.
The three steps Jesus outlined, as recorded at , are applicable only where these conditions exist.
No doubt all of us have our favorite portions of the Bible.
Some especially enjoy the Gospels, which paint a beautiful picture of Jehovah’s personality as reflected in his Son.
Others are fond of parts of the Bible containing prophecy—perhaps Revelation, with its preview of the things that must shortly take place.
And who among us has not found comfort in the Psalms or drawn practical lessons from the book of Proverbs?
The Bible truly is a book for everyone.
Because we love the Bible, we also love our Bible-based publications.
For instance, we appreciate the spiritual food we receive in the form of books, brochures, magazines, and other literature.
We know that these provisions from Jehovah help us to stay spiritually alert, well-fed, and healthy in faith.
This proved especially important in recent history when the nations engaged in deadly wars on a shocking scale.
For instance, some 55 million people were killed in World War II alone.
However, Jehovah’s Witnesses did not participate in that global slaughter.
This has helped them to remain clean from the blood of all men.
The progress of God’s people is taking place in a very hostile world, which the Bible says is controlled by Satan, the god of this system of things.
He manipulates the political elements of this world, as he does the world’s mass media.
But he cannot stop the preaching of the good news.
However, knowing that he has only a short time left, Satan tries to turn people away from true worship, and he uses various means to do so.
Throughout the earth, there are millions who worship Jehovah and bear witness to his name and purpose.
How should each worshipper of Jehovah view his fellow Witnesses?
The apostle Peter wrote: Now that you have purified yourselves by your obedience to the truth with unhypocritical brotherly affection as the result, love one another intensely from the heart.
Peter also told fellow believers: Above all things, have intense love for one another.
Because we have intense love for our fellow servants of Jehovah, we make up a unique worldwide organization.
Moreover, because we love Jehovah and obey his laws, he supports us with the most powerful force in the universe, his holy spirit, or active force.
This enables us to enjoy wonderful unity as a truly international brotherhood.
Our words may be just what our hearer truly needs, but unless we discern the best time to speak, their meaning could be lost.
For example, in March 2011 an earthquake and tsunami devastated parts of eastern Japan, wiping out entire cities.
More than 15,000 lost their lives.
Although Jehovah’s Witnesses in the area suffered along with their neighbors, they took advantage of every opportunity to use the Bible to comfort those who were mourning.
However, many of the local people have deep-rooted Buddhist beliefs and little or no knowledge of Bible teachings.
Our brothers discerned that immediately following the tsunami was not necessarily the best time to tell the grief-stricken victims about the resurrection hope.
Instead, they used their gift of speech to focus on giving emotional support and explaining from the Bible why such terrible things happen to innocent people.
God’s provisions to help us remain like soft clay include his Word, the Christian congregation, and the field ministry.
As water softens clay, daily Bible reading and meditation can help us be malleable in Jehovah’s hands.
Jehovah required that the kings of Israel write for themselves a copy of God’s Law and read it daily.
The apostles realized that reading the Scriptures and meditating on them was essential for their ministry.
They quoted from and referred to the Hebrew Scriptures hundreds of times in their writings and encouraged the people to whom they preached to do the same.
Today, we too see the importance of reading God’s Word daily and prayerfully meditating on it.
Doing so helps us to remain humble before Jehovah and be malleable in his hands.
The Gibeonites wisely recognized Israel’s backer to be the true God.
Rahab too perceived God’s hand in the events of her day.
After learning about how Jehovah rescued his people, she told two Israelite spies: I do know that Jehovah will give you the land.
Even though taking such a stand was fraught with danger, she expressed faith that Jehovah could deliver her and her family.
These and many other examples in the Bible help us to understand what it means to see God or to see his hand in matters.
As we come to know him, we too can see his hand because we perceive his qualities and actions with the eyes of our heart.
Surely we want to be like those past and present who have clearly seen Jehovah supporting his people.
By continuing to ponder over spiritual things, we will maintain our enthusiasm for the truth.
Thus we will be a source of refreshment to our brothers and to the interested ones we meet in the field service.
Meditating deeply on God’s greatest gift, the ransom sacrifice of Jesus, will help us to cherish the privilege of having a close relationship with our Holy Father, Jehovah.
Mark, a South African who spent three years in prison because of his Christian neutrality, said: Meditation can be compared to an exciting adventure.
The more we meditate on spiritual things, the more we discover new things about our God, Jehovah.
At times when I’m feeling a little discouraged or anxious about the future, I pick up the Bible and meditate on a passage of Scripture.
I feel that it really calms me down.
A young sister in France said: Teachers in my school are quite astonished that there are students who still believe in the Bible.
As a young servant of Jehovah or as someone learning about Him, do you feel under pressure to conform to popular beliefs, such as evolution, rather than believe in a Creator?
If so, there are steps you can take to strengthen your faith and keep it strong.
One step is for you to use your God-given thinking ability, which will keep watch over you.
It will protect you from secular philosophies that could destroy your faith.
Genuine faith is based on accurate knowledge about God.
So as you study God’s Word and our Christian publications, do not just skim over the material.
Use your thinking ability so that you get the sense of what you read.
Holy spirit is able to mold us in a number of ways.
For instance, it can help us to develop a Christlike personality, which is characterized by the fruitage of God’s spirit.
An aspect of that fruitage is love.
We love God and want to obey him and be molded by him, recognizing that his commandments are not burdensome.
Holy spirit can also give us the strength to resist the molding influence of the world and its bad spirit.
The apostle Paul, who as a young man was deeply influenced by the proud spirit of Jewish religious leaders, could later write: For all things I have the strength through the one who gives me power.
So let us, like Paul, keep on asking for holy spirit.
Jehovah will not ignore the sincere petitions of the meek.
The letter of James explains that true Christian faith is not just a matter of believing; action is involved.
Show me your faith without the works, wrote James, and I will show you my faith by my works.
James goes on to show the clear difference between mere belief and the exercising of one’s faith.
The demons believe that God exists, but they have no true faith.
Rather, they faithlessly work against the fulfillment of God’s purposes.
By contrast, referring to another ancient man of faith, James asks: Was not Abraham our father declared righteous by works after he offered up Isaac his son on the altar?
You see that his faith was active along with his works and his faith was perfected by his works.
Then to drive home the point that faith must be shown by works, James adds the words of today’s text.
Science has revealed much about the universe and our earthly home, and it has brought us advantages in various aspects of life.
But there are many questions science has not been able to answer.
For instance, astronomers cannot tell us exactly how the universe came into existence or why we are on planet Earth with its abundance of life.
Also, people in general cannot explain why mankind has a strong desire to live forever.
Why are there so many important but unanswered questions?
Partly because numerous scientists and others tend to promote godless thinking and endorse the theory of evolution.
But in his own Book, Jehovah answers questions weighing on the hearts of people everywhere.
We are dependent on the consistent and reliable laws of nature established by Jehovah.
Electricians, plumbers, engineers, pilots, surgeons—all of them depend on these laws in order to do their work.
Most imperfect humans are strongly influenced by the spirit of Satan’s world.
That is why people tend to idolize certain men or women rather than just show them appropriate honor and respect.
They place religious and political leaders, sports figures, entertainment stars, and other celebrities on pedestals, often considering them to be almost superhuman.
Hence, young and old alike look to them as role models, perhaps imitating their mannerisms, dress, or conduct.
True Christians refrain from such a distorted view of honoring humans.
Christ is the only human who ever lived whom we can consider a perfect role model.
God would not be pleased if we extended to humans more honor than they are due.
We need to bear in mind this basic truth: All have sinned and fall short of the glory of God.
Truly, no human warrants the kind of honor that borders on idolatry.
This reconciliation enables us to be at peace with Jehovah.
Paul links this privilege to Jehovah’s undeserved kindness, stating: Now that we Christ’s anointed brothers have been declared righteous as a result of faith, let us enjoy peace with God through our Lord Jesus Christ, through whom we also have obtained access by faith into this undeserved kindness in which we now stand.
What a blessing this is! All of us are unrighteous by nature.
But the prophet Daniel foretold that during the time of the end, those having insight, the anointed remnant, would be bringing the many to righteousness.
By their preaching and teaching work, they have brought millions of other sheep into a righteous standing before Jehovah.
However, this has been possible only through Jehovah’s undeserved kindness.
This unnatural union of materialized angels and women produced violent hybrids known as Nephilim.
Moreover, man’s wickedness was great on the earth.
Jehovah brought about the Flood of Noah’s day in order to destroy the wicked.
At that time, people were so occupied with the daily affairs of life, including marriage, that they did not take seriously what Noah, a preacher of righteousness, said about the impending destruction.
Jesus compared conditions then with what we would see in our day.
Today, most people refuse to listen to the good news of God’s Kingdom that is being preached throughout the earth for a witness to all the nations before this wicked system is brought to its end.
Let us take to heart the lesson that even family-matters, such as marriage and the raising of children, should not be allowed to crowd out our sense of urgency as to Jehovah’s day.
The need for shepherds in the Christian congregation is great, and those who will do such work in the future need ongoing training.
Paul told Timothy: The things you heard from me that were supported by many witnesses, these things entrust to faithful men, who, in turn, will be adequately qualified to teach others.
Timothy learned by serving alongside the apostle, an older man.
Then Timothy applied Paul’s methods in his own ministry and other aspects of sacred service.
Paul did not leave Timothy’s training to chance.
He had the young man accompany him.
Elders can imitate Paul’s example by taking qualified ministerial servants along on shepherding calls when appropriate.
Elders thus give such brothers an opportunity to observe firsthand the teaching, faith, patience, and love required of Christian overseers.
This procedure contributes to the training of future shepherds of the flock of God.
One circumstance that many have faced is the struggle to overcome a fleshly weakness.
Others have had to put forth determined effort to maintain a positive view of the ministry.
Or in your case, it may be the need to keep enduring, even though you have poor health or are lonely.
We should also not overlook the struggle some have to forgive someone who has offended them or has sinned against them.
No matter how long we have been serving Jehovah, all of us must fight against things that might hinder our service to God, who rewards the faithful.
If you realize that you have to some extent been affected in a negative way, by all means pray for holy spirit.
Prayer and holy spirit can give you energy to pursue the course that you know to be right and that Jehovah can bless.
Act on your prayers.
Try to read a portion of the Bible each day, and make time for personal study as well as regular Family Worship sessions.
Jehovah lovingly made provisions for the foreigners living in Israel, such as the right to glean food.
Rather than order the Israelites to respect foreigners, Jehovah appealed to their empathy.
They knew how it felt to be a foreigner.
Even before they were reduced to slavery, the Hebrews were likely shunned by the Egyptians because of racial pride or religious prejudice.
The Israelites had experienced a bitter life as foreign residents, but Jehovah expected them to treat the foreigner like a native among them.
No doubt, Jehovah is equally concerned about people from a foreign background who attend meetings in our congregations.
If we reflect on the challenges that they are facing, such as discrimination or the language barrier, we will look for ways to show them kindness and fellow feeling.
Most young children are eager to learn, and they tend to be humble.
Accordingly, wise parents can strive to inculcate knowledge of the truth and love for it in the minds and hearts of their little ones.
Of course, to succeed, the parents must first impress the truth on their own hearts, making the truth their way of life.
When parents do this, their children not only hear the truth but also experience it.
Moreover, they learn to view parental discipline as an expression of love that reflects Jehovah’s love.
When we humbly submit to Jehovah and make such submission our way of life, he will view us as very precious, just as he did the prophet Daniel.
What is more, Jehovah will continue to mold us by means of his Word, spirit, and organization.
Jehovah wants us to be concerned not only about our own spiritual welfare but also about that of others, including those who might have sinned against us.
Usually, such sins are minor and give us an opportunity to show that we truly love our brothers and are willing to forgive, as God has mercifully forgiven us.
Sadly, as imperfect humans, we may sometimes harbor a grudge against another.
If we talk about the matter, others may side with us, causing a division in the congregation.
If we allow such a situation to continue, it would show a lack of appreciation for God’s mercy and the ransom.
Our Father will cease to apply to us the value of his Son’s sacrifice if we display an unforgiving spirit.
Jesus elaborated on this immediately after giving the model prayer.
Finally, to benefit from God’s forgiveness, we must strive to avoid making a practice of serious sin.
It is an honor to be allowed by Jehovah to contribute to the beauty of our spiritual paradise.
We do that by zealously preaching the Kingdom good news and making more disciples.
Each time we help a person progress to Christian dedication, we have worked to extend the borders of the spiritual paradise.
We can also enhance the beauty of our spiritual paradise by steadily improving our own Christian personality.
In that way, we make this paradise more appealing to onlookers.
More than even Bible knowledge, it is often our chaste, peaceful conduct that initially draws people to the organization and in turn to God and to Christ.
How pleased Jehovah and Jesus must be when they observe our beautiful spiritual paradise today! The enjoyment we have now in working to enhance its beauty is but a foretaste of the joy we will have later in working to make the earth a physical paradise.
Whether married or single, we must strenuously resist all forms of sexual immorality.
Is the fight easy?
By no means! If you are a young person, for instance, you might hear your schoolmates boast about having casual sex or about sexting, a practice that in some places is viewed as being tantamount to distributing child pornography.
The Bible says: Whoever practices sexual immorality is sinning against his own body.
Both suffering and death have resulted from the spread of sexually transmitted diseases.
And the majority of unmarried youths who lose their virginity say that they regret what they did.
The reality of immoral sex is far different from what is portrayed by the entertainment media, which would have us believe that breaking God’s laws has no consequences.
Such thinking makes people fall victim to the deceptive power of sin.
Jesus imitated God’s kindness.
What helped Jesus to do so?
He treated people in a kind manner by anticipating how his words and actions might affect another individual’s feelings.
For example, a woman known to be a sinner approached him, weeping and wetting his feet with her tears.
Jesus discerned that she was repentant, and he knew how heartbroken she would be if he dismissed her unkindly.
Instead, he commended and forgave her.
When a Pharisee disapproved of what had happened, Jesus spoke to him kindly too.
How can we imitate God’s kindness?
The apostle Paul wrote: A slave of the Lord does not need to fight, but needs to be gentle or, tactful, ftn.
toward all.
By putting ourselves in the place of others and trying to anticipate how our words might affect them, we can discern how to speak and act in ways that imitate Jehovah’s kindness.
Jephthah had no other child; his daughter was his only hope for a descendant, someone to carry on his name and his inheritance in Israel.
Nevertheless, concludes with Jephthah saying: I have opened my mouth to Jehovah, and I am unable to turn back.
His faithfulness even at great personal cost brought him God’s approval and blessing.
Would you have made the same choice?
When we dedicated our lives to Jehovah, we vowed that we would do his will unreservedly.
We knew that living up to that promise would require self-sacrifice.
However, our willingness is especially put to the test when we are asked to do things that are not initially to our liking.
When we make such sacrifices and serve God in a way that takes us out of our comfort zone, we prove ourselves faithful.
The resulting blessings are always far greater than any sacrifices we may make, painful as they may be.
Jesus described the scope of the preaching work by saying that the good news would be preached in all the inhabited earth.
Disciples are to be made of people of all the nations.
That entails a global work.
To understand how Jehovah’s Witnesses have fulfilled Jesus prophecy with regard to the scope of the preaching work, let us consider some facts.
There are approximately 600,000 members of the clergy in the various denominations in the United States, where there are some 1,200,000 Witnesses of Jehovah.
Worldwide, the Roman Catholic Church has a little over 400,000 priests.
Now consider the number of Witnesses involved in the Bible-based Kingdom-preaching work.
Worldwide, some eight million volunteer ministers preach to people in 240 lands.
What an amazing work is being accomplished, all to Jehovah’s praise and glory!—.
Jesus leads the Christian congregation by means of holy spirit.
We need holy spirit to help us resist temptation, to embolden and equip us for the ministry, and to enable us to make sound decisions.
Should we not take advantage of every provision—including congregation meetings—to receive that spirit?
At many of our meetings, we review the fulfillment of Bible prophecy.
As a result, we reinforce our conviction that Jehovah’s promises for the future will likewise be fulfilled.
Of course, it is not just those who speak from the platform who encourage us.
Fellow Christians who offer comments and sing from the heart also build us up.
And when we converse with our brothers and sisters before and after the meetings, we feel a sense of belonging and enjoy true refreshment.
Faith enables us to do things that from a human standpoint may seem impossible.
For instance, many of us have changed our attitudes and practices so drastically that we are almost unrecognizable to those who knew us before.
Jehovah supported our efforts because we took these steps based on our faith in him.
Once our faith moved us to dedicate ourselves to Jehovah, we became his friends, something we could never have done in our own power.
Our faith continues to empower us.
In faith we are able to resist the attacks of our superhuman adversary, the Devil.
In addition, trust in Jehovah helps us to minimize our anxiety during challenging times.
Jehovah says that when our faith moves us to put Kingdom interests first, he will provide for our material needs.
More than that, because of our faith, we will receive a gift no human could ever obtain by his own efforts—everlasting life.
In what way has God first loved us?
The apostle Paul said: God recommends his own love to us in that, while we were yet sinners, Christ died for us.
Love is Jehovah’s dominant attribute, so we can understand why Jesus told one inquirer that the first commandment from God is: You must love Jehovah your God with your whole heart and with your whole soul and with your whole mind and with your whole strength.
From Jesus words, we learn that love for God involves, first of all, our heart.
Being halfhearted is displeasing to Jehovah.
However, we note that love for God also involves our whole soul, mind, and strength.
This means that genuine love for God is much more than just an emotional feeling of the heart.
In addition to being heartfelt, our love for God must involve all our spiritual and physical faculties.
According to the prophet Micah, that is what Jehovah wants from us.
What are some reasons why we may not clearly see God’s hand in our affairs?
Life’s challenges can overwhelm us.
When this happens, we may forget to keep focused on how Jehovah has already helped us.
When Queen Jezebel threatened the prophet Elijah’s life, even Elijah momentarily forgot how God had acted in his behalf.
Regarding Elijah, the Bible says: He asked that he might die.
What was the solution to Elijah’s problem?
He needed to look to Jehovah for encouragement.
Job also got so distracted by his own concerns that he neglected to see things from God’s viewpoint.
Like Job, we may need to put forth greater effort to see God.
How can we do that?
In the light of the Scriptures, we need to meditate on what is happening around us.
As we become aware of how Jehovah supports us, he will become more real to us.
At a critical moment, the apostles abandoned Jesus.
Peter had earlier stated that even if the others did that, he would not.
Nevertheless, when Jesus was being taken into custody, all the apostles—including Peter—abandoned him.
Peter repeatedly denied even knowing Jesus.
However, Peter showed remorse, and Jehovah continued to use him.
Had you been a disciple then, would Peter’s actions have affected your loyalty to Jehovah?
Today, will you recognize that Jehovah may allow time for repentance on the part of wrongdoers and that he will ultimately correct the wrongs and act in a just way?
On the other hand, sometimes those who have been guilty of serious sins reject Jehovah’s mercy and are unrepentant.
Jesus did not hesitate to tell his disciples that he loved them.
He also showed his love by closely and regularly associating with his disciples.
Similarly, tell your children that you love them, and regularly show them how much they mean to you.
Samuel, who lives in Australia, says: When I was very young, Dad used to read My Book of Bible Stories to me every evening.
He would answer my questions, hug me, and kiss me good-night.
What a surprise when I later discovered that Dad was not raised in a family where hugs and kisses were common! Yet, he made a real effort to express his love for me.
As a result, I developed a strong bond with him, and I felt contented and secure.
Help your children to feel that way by often telling them I love you.
Show your affection for your children.
Talk with them, eat with them, play with them.
We have the responsibility to make known to our fellow humans that they can come into a friendly relationship with their Creator.
Before humans exercise faith in Jesus sacrifice, God considers them to be his enemies.
The apostle John wrote: The one who exercises faith in the Son has everlasting life; the one who disobeys the Son will not see life, but the wrath of God remains upon him.
Happily, Christ’s sacrifice makes reconciliation with God possible.
We share in teaching people spiritual truth, helping them to develop a personal relationship with Jehovah.
This is an important part of our preaching work.
David was loved by Jehovah, who found him to be a man agreeable to his heart.
But David later committed adultery with Bath-sheba, and she became pregnant.
That occurred while her husband, Uriah, was away serving in the army.
When he came home temporarily, David tried to get him to have sexual relations with Bath-sheba so that it might appear that Uriah was the child’s father.
Uriah would not do what the king suggested, so David arranged to have him killed in battle.
David paid dearly for his crime—calamities came upon him and his household.
Yet, God showed mercy to this man who overall walked before Jehovah with integrity of heart.
What was the solution to such disruptive thinking?
Paul exhorted the Christians: I urge you, brothers, that you should all speak in agreement and that there should be no divisions among you, but that you may be completely united in the same mind and in the same line of thought.
Neither should there be divisions of any kind in the Christian congregation today.
Paul urged anointed Christians to focus on their heavenly citizenship rather than on earthly things.
They were to act as ambassadors substituting for Christ.
Ambassadors do not meddle in the affairs of the nations to which they are assigned.
Their loyalties lie elsewhere.
Christians with an earthly hope are also subjects of God’s Kingdom, so it is inappropriate for them to take sides in this world’s disputes.
The anxious wait is over.
Relieved to see her father returning safely from battle, the young woman races to greet him and rejoices over his astounding victory.
Instead of joining her in song and dance, he rips apart his battle-stained garments and cries out: Oh no, my daughter! You have broken my heart.
Then he utters the words that change her life forever, shattering her dreams and hopes of a normal life.
Yet, without hesitation, she encourages her father to follow through on what he promised Jehovah.
Her words reveal her great faith.
She trusts that whatever Jehovah asks is best for her.
Her father’s heart swells with pride because he knows that his daughter’s willingness to support his decision brings Jehovah’s smile of approval.
Jephthah and his daughter put their trust and confidence in Jehovah’s way of doing things, even when it was hard to do so.
They were convinced that gaining God’s approval was worth any sacrifice.
When Jehovah drew us into a relationship with him, he was aware of what sort of imperfect tendencies would be particularly troublesome for us.
And he knew that we would occasionally transgress.
Yet, this did not prevent Jehovah from wanting us as his friends.
Love moved God to offer us a precious gift—the ransom sacrifice of his beloved Son.
If on the basis of this priceless provision we repentantly seek Jehovah’s forgiveness when we err, we can have the confidence that our friendship with him is still intact even though we are in an imperfect state.
Isaiah foretold that this One would become a leader and commander.
And Daniel was inspired to write about the coming of Messiah the Leader.
Finally, Jesus Christ identified himself as the Leader of God’s people.
Jesus disciples followed him willingly, and they affirmed that he was Jehovah’s choice.
What convinced them?
At Jesus baptism, John the Baptizer saw the heavens being parted and, like a dove, the spirit coming down upon him.
For the rest of Jesus earthly ministry, God’s holy spirit empowered Jesus to perform miracles and to speak with divine authority.
In addition, holy spirit produced in Jesus perfect fruitage, including love, joy, and stalwart faith.
No other leader provided such convincing evidence.
Jesus was Jehovah’s choice.
Jephthah’s daughter sacrificed her natural desires for a husband and children in order to promote true worship.
How might we imitate her self-sacrificing attitude?
Thousands of young Christian men and women are willingly sacrificing marriage or are not having children—at least for now—in order to serve Jehovah to the full.
Older ones too may be sacrificing the time they could otherwise spend with their children and grandchildren in order to work on theocratic construction projects or to attend the School for Kingdom Evangelizers and to serve in areas where the need for Kingdom publishers is greater.
Others set aside personal matters to share in service campaigns.
Such wholehearted service brings deep joy to Jehovah, who will never forget their work and the love shown for him.
Recall what happened in King David’s case.
From the rooftop David saw a woman bathing.
He failed to look away and to direct his thoughts elsewhere.
That led him to desire a woman who was someone else’s wife and to take steps to commit adultery with her.
In order to combat immoral fantasies, we need to make a covenant with our eyes, as did faithful Job.
We must solemnly decide to control our eyes and not allow them to gaze with immoral lust at another person.
That would include averting our gaze from sexually charged images, be they on a computer screen, a billboard, a magazine cover, or anywhere else.
In your fight against wrong desires, take immediate action.
Willingly submit to the counsel of God’s Word, which can help you avoid wrongdoing and thus remain chaste.
Although we want to be kind even to those who do not follow God’s laws, we should not become their intimate associates or close friends.
It would therefore be wrong for one of Jehovah’s Witnesses who is a single person to date such an individual who is not dedicated and faithful to God and who does not respect His high standards.
Maintaining Christian integrity is far more important than becoming popular with people who do not live by Jehovah’s laws.
Our close associates should be those who do God’s will.
The disastrous results of bad associations were experienced by the Israelites.
Because they became unfaithful to God, Jesus later told them: Look! Your house is abandoned to you.
Jehovah cast off Israel, transferring his blessing to the newly formed Christian congregation.
By maintaining a humble attitude, Jehovah’s people obey an important principle given by Jesus.
In his Sermon on the Mount, he declared: You heard that it was said: You must love your neighbor and hate your enemy.
However, I say to you: Continue to love your enemies and to pray for those who persecute you, so that you may prove yourselves sons of your Father who is in the heavens, since he makes his sun rise on both the wicked and the good and makes it rain on both the righteous and the unrighteous.
Yes, as God’s servants, we must learn to love our enemies, regardless of their attitude toward us.
In all areas of life, Jehovah’s people must show by their attitude and actions that they love Jehovah and their neighbor.
For instance, even if some do not respond favorably to the Kingdom message, we show neighbor love when they are in need.
Other aspects of the fruitage of the spirit—such as mildness, self-control, and patience—are important too.
They can help a mature Christian to handle difficult situations without becoming irritated and to endure heartbreaking disappointments without losing hope.
In his program of personal study, he continually searches for Scriptural principles that can help him to distinguish right from wrong.
Thereafter, when he makes decisions, he gives evidence of spiritual maturity.
For instance, he listens to his Bible-trained conscience.
The mature Christian shows humility in that he recognizes that Jehovah’s ways and standards are always better than his own.
He zealously preaches the good news and contributes to the unity of the congregation.
Certainly, one of a loving father’s priorities is that of protecting and safeguarding his family against any possible harm or serious danger.
Jehovah, our heavenly Father, does no less.
Consider an example.
How precious your eyes are to you! That is how Jehovah feels about his people.
How precious God’s people are to him! Jehovah has on occasion allowed enemies to take the life of a faithful one, such as Stephen.
Yet, God protects his people overall by providing timely warnings against Satan’s crafty acts.
Through his Word and Bible-based publications from his organization, we are helped to see the truth about deceptive riches, immoral and violent entertainment, misuse of the Internet, and so on.
Clearly, as a loving Father, Jehovah looks after the safety and well-being of his people.
A Kingdom Hall is the center of pure worship for the local community.
Among the provisions that Jehovah makes for our spiritual nourishment are the weekly meetings at the Kingdom Hall.
It is here that we receive vital spiritual refreshment and direction through his organization.
Even though we have a standing invitation to eat at the table of Jehovah, we must never take that invitation for granted.
Jehovah considers such occasions for worship and mutual encouragement so important that he inspired the apostle Paul to urge us not to forsake our meeting together.
Would we be showing respect for Jehovah if we missed Christian meetings for unnecessary reasons?
Indeed, we can show how much we appreciate Jehovah and his provisions by preparing for and wholeheartedly participating in these meetings.
Many in Christendom believe, according to this teaching, that Christians will be bodily caught up from the earth.
Then, they expect that Jesus will visibly return to rule the earth.
However, the Bible clearly shows that the sign of the Son of man will appear in heaven and that Jesus will come on the clouds of heaven.
Both of these expressions imply invisibility.
Additionally, flesh and blood cannot inherit God’s Kingdom.
So those who will be taken to heaven will first need to be changed, in a moment, in the blink of an eye, during the last trumpet.
Therefore, while we do not use the term rapture here because of its wrong connotation, the remaining faithful anointed will be gathered together in an instant of time.
In the new world, we will derive the greatest pleasure from having our spiritual need filled.
Spiritual activities will be our highest priority, and we will demonstrate that we are finding exquisite delight in Jehovah.
By giving spiritual things priority now, we are preparing for the real life in the future.
How can we increase our joy in theocratic activities?
One way is by setting spiritual goals.
If you are young and are giving serious consideration to a career in Jehovah’s service, why not review some of the material that has been published about various avenues of the full-time ministry and set one of these as a goal?
You might talk with some who have spent many years in the full-time service.
By making the ministry your career, you are preparing for continued service to God in the new world, where your theocratic training and experience will be of great value.
Manoah and his wife were going to have a son! No doubt, Manoah was happy, but he was also aware of the great responsibility that rested on his shoulders.
In a nation filled with badness, how could he and his wife successfully raise their son to serve God?
Manoah pleaded with Jehovah, saying: Please let the man of the true God the angel whom you just sent come again to instruct us about what we should do with the child who will be born.
If you are a parent, you can likely relate to Manoah’s earnest plea.
You too bear the weighty responsibility of helping your child to come to know and love Jehovah.
To that end, Christian parents arrange for a meaningful and progressive Family Worship program.
Of course, to impress Bible truths on a child’s mind, you need to do more than conduct a weekly family study.
There is a danger in making too much use of what the world has to offer.
A Christian can easily waste an excessive amount of time on things that are not wrong in themselves, such as hobbies, recreational reading, TV watching, sightseeing, window shopping, and seeking out the latest electronic gadgets or luxuries.
Social networking, texting, circulating e-mails, and frequently checking the latest news and sports events can also waste our time and can even become an obsession.
If we do not limit the amount of time we spend on nonessential things, we may find ourselves neglecting the most important activity of all—our worship of Jehovah.
Satan has designed his world to attract and distract us.
That was true in the first century, and it is even more so today.
Thus, we need to heed the counsel of today’s text.
We are living in what the Bible calls the last days, and straight ahead is a tribulation like nothing that has occurred before.
Furthermore, Satan and his demons have been cast out of heaven and are confined to the vicinity of the earth, resulting in intense woe for earth’s inhabitants.
We have been commissioned to carry out a historic and unprecedented preaching campaign that is reaching peoples and language groups as never before! To keep receiving God’s blessing, we need to pay attention to all the directions provided through the Christian congregation.
Having an obedient spirit now will help us to follow directions during the great tribulation, which will eliminate Satan’s entire evil system.
Thereafter, we will need new directions for new world living.
Mary was to conceive, give birth to, and raise the only-begotten Son of God! It is easy to think only of Mary’s wonderful privilege and fail to consider some of the practical concerns that might have seemed daunting.
God’s angel Gabriel told her that she would become pregnant miraculously—without having relations with a man.
Gabriel did not offer to go to Mary’s family and neighbors to explain the cause of her pregnancy.
What would they think?
Mary must have been concerned about her fiancé, Joseph.
How could she convince him that, although she was pregnant, she had remained faithful to him?
Moreover, what a responsibility it would be to raise, care for, and train the only-begotten Son of the Most High! We cannot know all the concerns that may have raced through Mary’s mind when Gabriel spoke to her.
However, we do know that she answered with the words of today’s text.
Not every pastime is beneficial, relaxing, or refreshing; nor is it good to engage in recreation too much or too often.
How can our conscience help us to enjoy upbuilding recreation and benefit from it?
The Scriptures warn against certain behavior identified as the works of the flesh.
These works include sexual immorality, uncleanness, brazen conduct, idolatry, spiritism, hostility, strife, jealousy, fits of anger, dissensions, divisions, sects, envy, drunkenness, wild parties, and things like these.
Paul wrote that those who practice such things will not inherit God’s Kingdom.
The expression our Father, not my Father, reminds us that we belong to an association of brothers who truly love one another.
What a precious privilege that is! Anointed Christians, who have been begotten as God’s sons with heavenly life in view, rightly address Jehovah as Father in the fullest sense.
Christians whose hope is to live forever on earth can also address Jehovah as Father.
He is their Life-Giver, and he lovingly provides for the needs of all true worshippers.
Those with this earthly hope will in the fullest sense become God’s children after they have reached perfection and have proved their loyalty in the final test.
Parents give their children a fine gift when they teach them to pray and help them to view Jehovah as a caring heavenly Father.
Parents can give their children no greater gift than that of helping them to develop a warm, close relationship with Jehovah.
To live in harmony with the request deliver us from the wicked one, we must strive to be no part of Satan’s world.
We must not love either Satan’s world or the things in the world.
Doing so is an ongoing struggle.
What a relief it will be when Jehovah answers this request by removing Satan and causing his wicked world to pass away! We must remember, though, that when Satan was hurled out of heaven, he knew that his time was short.
Enraged, he does all he can to make us break our integrity.
So we must keep praying for deliverance from him.
Do you desire such a happy outcome?
Then continue to pray for God’s Kingdom to sanctify God’s name and cause his will to be done on earth.
Look to Jehovah to supply your spiritual and physical needs.
Yes, be determined to live in harmony with the model prayer.
Uncontrolled anxious thoughts can cause us physical and spiritual harm.
Let us trust in Jehovah and remember the words of today’s text.
Good words of encouragement from someone who understands us can make our heart rejoice.
Confiding in our parents, our spouse, or a trusted friend who views things from God’s standpoint may help to relieve our anxiety.
No one understands our anxiety better than Jehovah does.
Do not be anxious over anything, wrote Paul, but in everything by prayer and supplication along with thanksgiving, let your petitions be made known to God; and the peace of God that surpasses all understanding will guard your hearts and your mental powers by means of Christ Jesus.
Think about those who are helping to protect us from spiritual harm—fellow believers, elders, the faithful slave, angels, Jesus, and Jehovah himself.
The privilege of living under Kingdom rule is well worth any effort we make to cooperate with Jehovah’s organization and care for theocratic assignments.
Of course, our circumstances may change.
For instance, some members of the Bethel family in the United States have been reassigned to the field and are now enjoying abundant blessings in other forms of the full-time ministry.
Because of advancing age or other factors, others who were in the traveling work have now received special pioneer assignments.
If we cultivate contentment, pray for God’s help, and do all we can in his service, we will experience joy and will receive many blessings even in these critical last days.
What about our future prospects?
We may have ideas about where we would like to live in the new world, but we may be asked to move to a different area.
Regardless of where we will then serve and what we will do, we can be sure that we will be grateful and contented, brimming with joy.
We should not be surprised if the world hates us for our neutral stand; Jesus warned us that it would.
Most opposers do not appreciate the importance of the issues involved in Christian neutrality.
For us, though, these are matters of utmost importance.
Loyalty to Jehovah requires that we be steadfast in the face of threats.
Fear of man can affect people of all ages, but young people may find it especially difficult to go against the flow, so to speak.
If your children are facing such issues as the flag salute or nationalistic celebrations, do not hesitate to assist them.
Use Family Worship sessions to help your children understand the issues involved so that they can meet those challenges courageously.
Help them to express their personal convictions clearly and respectfully.
Take the initiative to speak with their teachers about these matters if necessary.
What are presumptuous acts?
By definition, when someone rashly or impertinently does something that he is not authorized to do, he is acting presumptuously.
Because of inherited sin, we all act presumptuously at times.
But as King Saul’s example illustrates, if we develop a pattern of pushing ahead, sooner or later we will find ourselves in serious trouble with God.
says of Jehovah: You rebuke the presumptuous.
Why is that?
Presumptuous acts are more serious than innocent mistakes.
First, when we act immodestly, we fail to honor Jehovah as our rightful Sovereign.
Second, if we act beyond the scope of our authority, we are likely to get into conflict with others.
And third, when it becomes clear that we have acted presumptuously, we may be embarrassed or even humiliated.
Presumptuous acts do not turn out well.
As the Scriptures show, modesty is always the right course.
No longer perfect, Adam could not reflect God’s qualities perfectly.
He not only lost a marvelous future for himself but also handed down to his children imperfection, sin, and death.
He deprived his offspring of the prospect of life without end.
Furthermore, Adam and Eve could no longer have a perfect child; neither could any of their children have a perfect child.
After turning Adam and Eve away from God, Satan the Devil has continued to mislead mankind until today.
God’s love for humans, however, endures.
Despite Adam and Eve’s rebellion, Jehovah wants mankind to enjoy a good relationship with him.
He does not desire any to die.
So right after the rebellion, God made arrangements to enable humans to restore their friendship with him while he at the same time maintained his own righteous standards.
Appreciation for our role in Jehovah’s service will grow as we, in imitation of our God, look for the good in others.
Instead of seeking the spotlight or always stepping in to take over, we will more often find ourselves modestly seeking the advice of others and yielding to their suggestions.
We will rejoice with them when they receive privileges.
And we will praise Jehovah as we see how he blesses the entire association of our brothers in the world.
Also, we will develop good judgment by modestly learning to see things from Jehovah’s viewpoint.
Through regular study, prayer, and application of what we learn, we can gradually strengthen our conscience.
We learn to put others first.
If we do our part, Jehovah promises that he will finish our training, helping us to develop modesty and other godly qualities.
Those related to us in the faith certainly merit honor and respect.
This is especially true of the elders who are taking the lead.
We honor these brothers regardless of their nationality, education, social standing, or financial status.
The Bible refers to them as gifts in men, and they are a key part of God’s arrangement to care for the needs of his people.
Think of congregation elders, circuit overseers, Branch Committee members, and the members of the Governing Body.
Our brothers and sisters in the first century had high regard for those appointed to take the lead, and we feel similarly today.
We do not idolize well-known representatives of the Christian congregation or react in their presence as if angels were standing nearby.
Still, we do respect and honor such brothers for their hard work and humility.
The Bible Students understood that it was not enough for them to inform relatives, close friends, and church members of their stand on false religion.
The whole world needed to see Babylon the Great for what it is—a religious prostitute! Accordingly, between December 1917 and early 1918, the few thousand Bible Students zealously distributed 10,000,000 copies of a tract featuring the subject The Fall of Babylon—a hard-hitting indictment of Christendom.
As you can imagine, the clergy were furious; but undeterred, the Bible Students kept right on with this important work.
They were determined to obey God as ruler rather than men.
What can we conclude?
That far from becoming enslaved to Babylon the Great during the war, these Christian men and women were breaking free from its influence and were helping others to do so.
Some might imagine that this is a contrast between those who are not in the truth and those who are, between those who are not Christians and those who are.
However, Paul was writing to those who are in Rome as God’s beloved ones, called to be holy ones.
Thus, Paul was contrasting Christians who walked according to the flesh with Christians who walked according to the spirit.
He linked living according to the flesh with the sinful passions that were then at work in their bodies.
So when speaking of those who set their minds on the things of the flesh, Paul was referring to people who are ruled by or focused on their desires and leanings as imperfect humans.
In the main, these are ones who follow their cravings, impulses, and passions, whether sexual or otherwise.
Some anxiety may be caused by a person’s past actions or failings.
At times, King David felt that his errors loomed over his head.
He admitted: My anguished heart makes me groan aloud.
In that situation, what was the wise thing for David to do?
What did he do?
He trusted in Jehovah’s mercy and forgiveness.
At other times, you may become anxious about the present.
For instance, when David wrote , he feared for his life.
Nevertheless, he did not allow anxiety to destroy his confidence in Jehovah.
David made his problems a subject of fervent prayer, but he also understood the value of taking practical steps to deal with the cause of the anxiety.
Learn a lesson from David.
Instead of allowing anxiety to overwhelm you, take what steps you can to deal with the situation and then confidently leave matters in Jehovah’s hands.
David accepted correction from Jehovah’s representative, the prophet Nathan.
David also prayed to Jehovah, confessing his sins and expressing a sincere desire to be restored to Jehovah’s favor.
Instead of being paralyzed by guilt, David learned from his mistakes.
Indeed, he never repeated those serious sins.
Years later, he died faithful, his record of integrity firmly sealed in Jehovah’s memory.
What can we learn from David’s example?
If we fall into serious sin, we need to repent sincerely and seek Jehovah’s forgiveness.
We must confess our sins to him.
We also need to approach the elders, who can offer us spiritual help.
By availing ourselves of Jehovah’s arrangements, we show that we trust in his promise to heal and forgive us.
Thereafter, we do well to learn from our mistakes, move forward in our service to Jehovah, and look to the future with confidence.
Jehovah’s people have turned their back on the fruit that they used to produce before they came to know, love, and serve God.
Their past way of life may have included things of which they are now ashamed and that would have merited death.
Then they changed.
That was true of many in Corinth to whom Paul wrote.
Some had been idolaters, adulterers, homosexuals, thieves, drunkards, and the like.
Yet, they were washed clean and sanctified.
That was likely also true of some in the Roman congregation.
Paul was inspired to write to them: Neither go on presenting your bodies to sin as weapons of unrighteousness, but present yourselves to God as those alive from the dead, also your bodies to God as weapons of righteousness.
Paul was sure that they could remain spiritually clean and thus continue to benefit from God’s undeserved kindness.
Sometime during King Jeroboam’s reign, Jehovah sent a certain prophet from Judah to deliver a scathing judgment message to that apostate king of Israel.
The humble prophet faithfully delivered God’s message, and Jehovah protected his servant from Jeroboam’s violent wrath.
On his way home, the prophet unexpectedly met up with an old man from nearby Bethel.
The man claimed to be a prophet of Jehovah.
He deceived the younger man into disobeying Jehovah’s strict instructions not to eat bread or drink water in Israel and not to return by the way that he came.
Jehovah was not pleased.
Later, on his way home, a lion came across Jehovah’s prophet on the road and killed him.
Why did the once modest prophet presumptuously go along with that deceitful older man?
The Bible does not say.
But it could be that he completely forgot that he was supposed to be walking modestly with God.
The faithful slave has exercised outstanding faith by zealously promoting and spreading the Kingdom good news.
Are you one of the other sheep who supports the anointed in this vital work?
How happy you will feel when your Leader, Jesus, says: To the extent that you did it to one of the least of these my brothers, you did it to me.
When Jesus returned to heaven, he did not abandon his followers.
He knew firsthand how much the holy spirit, the angels, and God’s Word helped him to take the lead when he was on earth.
Therefore, he has supplied the faithful slave today with the same assistance.
As anointed Christians, the members of that slave keep following the Lamb no matter where he goes.
As we follow their direction, therefore, we follow our Leader, Jesus.
Soon, he will lead us to everlasting life.
Paul set a fine example of respecting his brothers right of free will to make decisions.
Today, when giving counsel on matters involving personal choice, the elders should follow that pattern.
They are happy to share Bible-based information with others in the flock.
Still, the elders are careful to allow individual brothers and sisters to make their own decisions.
That is logical because those individuals will bear the responsibility for the results.
Here is an important lesson: We can show helpful interest in others and call attention to Scriptural principles or counsel.
Still, others have a right and responsibility to make their own decisions.
When they do this wisely, they benefit.
Clearly, we should avoid any tendency to think that we are authorized to make decisions for other brothers and sisters.
Sharing in the preaching work is an excellent way to demonstrate our faith.
Why is that?
This work requires that we have faith in God’s timing of the coming end of this system of things, believing that it will not be late! One way to measure our faith is to look at the extent to which we are willing to expend ourselves in the ministry.
Are we doing all we can, perhaps even seeking ways to expand our share in the work?
Yes, making public declaration for salvation is a powerful way to show that we have faith in our heart.
We can also show faith as we grapple with the challenges of daily life.
Whether we face illness, discouragement, depression, poverty, or other trying problems, we have confidence that Jehovah and his Son will help us at the right time.
We show such confidence by praying for help that is not limited to our spiritual needs.
Jesus was a loving and loyal friend.
In Bible times, a master did not normally share his private thoughts and feelings with his slaves.
However, Jesus proved to be both master and friend to his faithful apostles.
He spent time with them, shared his feelings with them, and carefully listened when they poured out their hearts to him.
Such loving communication created a warm bond between Jesus and his apostles and prepared them for future responsibilities in God’s service.
Jesus wanted his beloved disciples and friends to experience the joy that comes from a busy life in Jehovah’s service.
Therefore, he desired that they zealously participate in spiritual activities.
Indeed, Jesus wanted them to be ardent disciple-makers! And he lovingly assured his disciples that he would help them to succeed.
Love is Jehovah God’s dominant quality.
His first creation was Jesus, who existed with him in heaven for many aeons and learned God’s loving ways.
By his entire course, including his life on earth, Jesus showed that he fully understands what a loving God Jehovah is, and he imitates that love.
Thus, we can be confident that the rulership exercised by Jehovah and Jesus will forever be guided by the quality of love.
When asked which was the greatest commandment in the Law, Jesus stated: You must love Jehovah your God with your whole heart and with your whole soul and with your whole mind.
This is the greatest and first commandment.
The second, like it, is this: You must love your neighbor as yourself.
Notice that Jesus placed love of neighbor second only to love of Jehovah.
This shows how important it is to display love in all our relationships.
God did not restrict his communication with humans to Hebrew.
After the Babylonian exile, Aramaic became the everyday language of some of God’s people.
Perhaps to indicate what was to come, Jehovah inspired the prophets Daniel and Jeremiah and the priest Ezra to record portions of their Bible books in Aramaic.
Alexander the Great later conquered much of the ancient world, and common, or Koine, Greek became an international language.
Many Jews began to speak that language, leading to the translation of the Hebrew Scriptures into Greek.
This translation, thought to have been done by 72 translators, became known as the Septuagint.
It was the first translation of the Bible and one of the most important.
The work of so many translators resulted in varied translation styles, from literal to rather free.
Nevertheless, the Septuagint was viewed as God’s Word by Greek-speaking Jews and later by Christians.
The point of James illustration is made clear in verse 6.
The tongue is also a fire.
The tongue represents our ability to speak.
Like fire, our speech has the potential for causing great harm.
The Bible even says that death and life are in the power of the tongue.
Of course, we do not stop talking just out of concern that we might say something harmful, any more than we refuse to use fire because we fear the damage it might cause.
The key is control.
If we control fire, we can use it to cook our food, warm our bodies, and light up a dark night.
If we tame our tongue, we can use its power to honor God and to benefit others.
Whether we use sounds from our mouth or signs with our hands, the ability to communicate our thoughts and feelings is a marvelous gift from God.
This gift, however, should be used to build up, not tear down.
It is reasonable to believe that Luke gave Paul medical advice and rendered medical services to him and to others in his missionary group.
Why would Luke need to do that?
Because even Paul got sick while traveling.
Luke could provide medical help that was in line with what Jesus had said: Those who are healthy do not need a physician, but those who are ill do.
The Bible does not indicate where or when Luke received his medical training.
It has been suggested that Paul mentioned to Christians in Colossae the role of Luke as a physician because they knew him.
Interestingly, there was a medical school in nearby Laodicea.
In any event, Luke was not some untrained layman spouting health recommendations; he was a physician.
That is evident both from the specific medical language that Luke used in his Gospel and in the book of Acts and from the way he focused on Jesus healings of others.
Adam was the one man through whom sin and death entered into the world.
Thus by the trespass of the one man death ruled as king.
Paul added that the abundance of God’s undeserved kindness came about through the one person, Jesus Christ.
And that undeserved kindness has resulted in good for all mankind.
Through the obedience of the one person Jesus many will be made righteous.
Actually, God’s undeserved kindness can lead to everlasting life through Jesus Christ.
Jehovah was not obliged to have his Son come to earth to provide the ransom.
Moreover, imperfect, sinful humans did not of themselves merit, or deserve, what God and Jesus did in providing a ransom by which forgiveness was possible.
So our being forgiven and offered the prospect of living forever is truly a kindness that is undeserved.
We should highly value the gift of God’s undeserved kindness and let it affect our life daily.
Self-examination is important.
Why?
Paul wrote: Setting the mind on the flesh means death.
That is serious—spiritual death now and physical death in the future.
Still, Paul did not mean that if someone began to set the mind on the flesh his end unavoidably would be death.
Change is possible.
Think of the immoral man in Corinth who went after the flesh and had to be disfellowshipped.
Yet, he could and did change.
He ceased to walk after the flesh and returned to a straight path.
If it was possible for that person to change, it is possible for a Christian today to change, especially one who has not gone after the flesh as far as the man in Corinth had.
How comforting it is for us to throw our burden on Jehovah, knowing that he will sustain us’! We can have full confidence that God can do more than superabundantly beyond all the things we ask or conceive.
Imagine that—not just abundantly and not superabundantly but more than superabundantly! To receive the reward, we need to exercise full faith in Jehovah and be obedient to his directions.
Moses told the nation of Israel: Jehovah will surely bless you in the land that Jehovah your God is giving you to possess as an inheritance, but only if you strictly obey the voice of Jehovah your God and carefully observe all this commandment that I am giving you today.
For Jehovah your God will bless you just as he has promised you.
Do you have full confidence that Jehovah will bless you if you continue to serve him faithfully?
You certainly have good reason for such confidence.
Our changing circumstances can expand or limit our sphere of operation.
Are you young or up in years?
Is your health good or fragile?
Jehovah always considers how each of us might best be used in his service.
He only expects from us what is reasonable, and he greatly appreciates whatever we do.
Jesus found joy in every one of his assignments, and we can find joy in ours.
A modest person does not feel cramped by his current assignments or responsibilities in the congregation.
He does not worry about gaining future privileges or about what others are achieving.
Instead, he focuses his energies on finding purpose and enjoyment in his present role because he views it as coming from Jehovah.
At the same time, he sincerely respects the role or place that Jehovah has given to others.
Modesty helps us to enjoy giving others due honor and support.
Some younger ones may now be coordinating activities that include older brothers.
Though such younger ones have a changed role, they would do well to benefit from the wisdom and experience of older ones before making decisions.
Timothy, a younger man, worked alongside the apostle Paul for many years.
Paul had written to the Corinthians: I am sending Timothy to you, because he is my beloved and faithful child in the Lord.
He will remind you of my methods in connection with Christ Jesus.
This brief statement points to the close cooperation between Paul and Timothy.
Paul had taken time to teach Timothy his methods.
Timothy learned well and had won Paul’s affection, and Paul was confident that Timothy could care for the spiritual needs of those in Corinth.
Jehovah wants people to live, not die.
As the Source of life, he becomes the Father of everyone who is resurrected.
How appropriate, therefore, that Jesus taught us to pray: Our Father in the heavens.
Jehovah has given Jesus an important share in resurrecting the dead.
In Paradise, Jesus will fulfill his role as the resurrection and the life.
Jehovah’s generosity is not limited to a few privileged people, for Jesus said: Whoever does the will of God, this one is my brother and sister and mother.
It is God’s will that a numberless great crowd from all nations and tribes and tongues become his worshippers.
Those who exercise faith in Christ’s ransom and who do the will of God can be among those who shout: Salvation we owe to our God, who is seated on the throne, and to the Lamb.
To disseminate Bible truth in various languages, Zion’s Watch Tower Tract Society was legally incorporated in 1884, with Charles Taze Russell as president.
He was an outstanding student of the Bible, and he fearlessly exposed as false such doctrines as the Trinity and the immortality of the soul.
He discerned that Christ would return invisibly and that the appointed times of the nations would end in 1914.
Brother Russell devoted his time, energy, and money unsparingly to share these truths with others.
Clearly, at that pivotal time, Brother Russell was used by Jehovah and the head of the congregation.
Brother Russell did not seek glory from humans.
In 1896, he wrote: We want no homage, no reverence, for ourselves or our writings; nor do we wish to be called Reverend or Rabbi.
Nor do we wish that any should be called by our name.
He later stated: This is not man’s work.
We all have choices and decisions to make.
Not every one of our decisions is a life-and-death matter.
However, many of our decisions, the choices we make, can have a profound effect on us.
Hence, the ability to make good decisions can help us to live a relatively smooth, peaceful life rather than one that is full of chaos, controversy, and disappointment.
What will help us to make wise decisions?
We certainly need faith in God, not doubting his willingness and ability to help us to be wise.
We also need faith in Jehovah’s Word and in his way of doing things, trusting God’s inspired counsel.
As we draw close to him and grow in love for his Word, we come to trust his judgment.
Accordingly, we develop the habit of consulting God’s Word before making decisions.
When we are faced with serious decisions, it is vital to draw on the Bible as the best source of advice and to seek Jehovah’s guidance in prayer.
Jehovah can give us the qualities we need to make decisions that are in harmony with his will.
Make it a practice to ask: Will this decision give evidence of my love for Jehovah?
Will it bring joy and peace to my family?
And will it show that I am patient and kind?
Jehovah does not coerce us into loving him and serving him.
In line with the free will that he grants us, he respects our responsibility and right to choose for ourselves whether we will serve him.
But he expects us to follow through on other decisions that we make based on his guidance.
With faith in Jehovah’s way of doing things and the principles that he has kindly provided, we can make wise decisions and prove ourselves steady in all our ways.
Jehovah’s Witnesses continue to rejoice in their hope despite intense and ongoing persecution.
For example, many of our brothers and sisters are imprisoned in Eritrea, Singapore, and South Korea, in most cases because of acting in harmony with Jesus words not to take up the sword.
Most of Jehovah’s people have not had to endure severe persecution.
Their tests of faith have been different.
Many have had to endure poverty or have suffered during civil wars or natural disasters.
Others are like Moses and the patriarchs in that they have given up a life of worldly ease or fame.
They fight hard to resist being tempted to live a materialistic, self-centered lifestyle.
What is it that enables them to do this?
Their love for Jehovah and their strong faith in the promise that he will correct all injustices and reward his faithful servants with everlasting life in a new world of righteousness.
Thousands of Jehovah’s Witnesses today are taking an active part in the fulfillment of the vision to declare the good news to every nation and tribe and tongue and people.
Are you among those who are learning another language?
Are you perhaps serving as a missionary or a need-greater in a foreign land, or have you begun attending meetings in a foreign-language congregation in your homeland?
As God’s servants, all of us need to give priority to our spiritual health and that of our family.
At times, though, we may find it difficult to engage in meaningful personal study because of our busy routine.
But those serving in a foreign field face yet other challenges.
In addition to learning a new tongue, those serving in a foreign field also need to make sure that they regularly feed their heart with solid spiritual food.
Jesus was not afraid to ask his followers what they believed.
Imitate his example.
It is best, in a relaxed setting, to invite your children to express their feelings.
If a child is unsure about some teaching, try not to react too strongly or to respond as if you were on the defensive.
Patiently help him to reason on the matter.
It is helpful to view your child’s sincere questions as an indication that he cares and wants to understand.
Even at 12 years of age, Jesus asked serious questions.
Get to know your children well—their thinking, their feelings, their concerns.
Never assume that they have faith simply because they attend Christian meetings and share in the field service with you.
Include spiritual discussions in your daily activities.
Pray with and for your children.
Try to be aware of any tests to their faith, and help them to deal with these.
Declaring the good news of the Kingdom was Jesus primary assignment.
However, he took time to train others to be shepherds and teachers.
Although Philip was busy as an evangelizer, he no doubt helped his four daughters to become effective in sharing Scriptural truths with others.
How important is such training today?
Worldwide, the number of people accepting the good news is growing.
New ones who are not yet baptized need to grasp the importance of personal Bible study.
They must also be taught to preach the good news to others and to teach them the truth.
In our congregations, brothers need to be encouraged to work hard in order to qualify for appointment as ministerial servants and elders.
By means of good instruction, mature Christians can help new ones to make spiritual progress.
When Jeremiah was afraid and discouraged, Jehovah built up that faithful prophet’s confidence.
And just imagine how encouraged the elderly prophet Daniel was when God sent an angel to strengthen him.
That angel called Daniel a very precious, or highly esteemed, man! ; ftn.
Could you similarly encourage publishers, pioneers, and older brothers and sisters whose strength is failing?
God did not feel that because he and his dear Son had worked together for ages, there was no need to commend and encourage Jesus when he was on earth.
Instead, on two occasions Jesus heard his Father speak from heaven and say: This is my Son, the beloved, whom I have approved.
God thus commended Jesus and assured him that he was doing well.
Jehovah also sent an angel to strengthen Jesus when he was in anguish on the night before his death.
A good conscience does much more than warn us against wrongdoing.
It moves us to do good works.
Foremost among these good works is our participation in the ministry from house to house and our taking advantage of opportunities to witness informally.
Paul’s conscience moved him to do so.
He wrote: Necessity is laid upon me.
Really, woe to me if I do not declare the good news! As we imitate him, our conscience speaks to us, assuring us that we are doing the right thing.
And by preaching the good news, we appeal to the conscience of those to whom we speak.
Yes, the conscience can be an invaluable tool.
By regularly immersing ourselves in God’s Word, meditating on what we find, and striving to put it into practice, we train our conscience.
For the first few centuries of our Common Era, many people could read the Bible in either Greek or Latin.
They were thus in a position to compare the teachings of God’s Word with the dogmas of the church.
On the basis of what they read in the Bible, some among them rejected the unscriptural creeds of the church, but it was dangerous—even fatal—to express such opinions openly.
In time, Bible languages fell into disuse by the masses, and the church opposed efforts to translate God’s Word into the common tongues.
Any dissent from what the church taught was severely punished.
Faithful anointed servants of God had to meet together in discreet groups—if they could meet at all.
The anointed royal priesthood could not function in an organized way.
When you are confronted by situations that cause uneasiness, apprehension, or anxiety, pour out your heart to your loving heavenly Father.
After you have done all you can to solve a problem, heartfelt prayer will certainly accomplish more than worry.
As shown at , Jehovah can respond to our earnest, heartfelt, and persistent supplications.
How?
By giving us inner calm that can free our mind and heart of disturbing emotions.
Many can testify to this, based on their own experience.
In place of anxiety, a distressing sense of foreboding, God helped them to gain a profound sense of peace and tranquillity that actually surpassed human understanding.
That can be your experience too.
Thus the peace of God can triumph over any challenge you may face.
You can fully trust Jehovah’s compassionate promise: Do not be anxious, for I am your God.
I will fortify you, yes, I will help you.
Jehovah expects us to put to good use the abilities with which he has endowed us.
Why?
Because he loves us, and he knows that it brings us satisfaction when we employ these gifts.
At the same time, Jehovah knows that humans have limitations.
On our own, we can never eliminate imperfection, sin, and death; neither can we control other people, for all have free will.
And no matter how much knowledge or experience we gain, we will always be like children in comparison with Jehovah.
In all circumstances, we need to lean on Jehovah for guidance, trusting in him to support us and do for us what we cannot do for ourselves.
At the same time, we should do what we can, taking appropriate action to solve problems and help others.
In short, we need both to trust in Jehovah and to do what is good’; we need to act with faithfulness.
Barzillai declined the offer.
Why?
Because of his advanced age, he told David that he did not want to become a burden to the king.
So Barzillai recommended that Chimham, presumably one of his sons, take his place.
Modesty helped Barzillai to make a reasonable decision.
He did not turn down David’s invitation because he felt inadequate to shoulder responsibility or because he wanted to enjoy a quiet life in retirement.
He simply recognized and accepted his changing circumstances and his limitations.
He did not want to take on more than he reasonably could.
If we focus on position, prominence, or recognition, it only provides a breeding ground for egotism, competition, and eventual disappointment.
Modesty, however, helps all to focus their collective abilities and efforts on bringing glory to God and doing what is best to help others.
Jehovah is an awe-inspiring Creator.
Everything he creates meets the highest standards.
As is evident in creation, Jehovah lovingly set boundaries.
He made both natural laws and moral laws to ensure that everything functions harmoniously.
Hence, all things in the universe have an assigned place and function according to their role in God’s purpose.
Jehovah sets the standard for how his creation should work together.
Thus, the law of gravity holds the atmosphere close to the earth, regulates tides and oceans, and contributes to the physical order essential to life on earth.
All creation, including humans, moves and functions within these boundaries.
Clearly, the order in creation testifies that God has a purpose for earth and mankind.
In our ministry, can we draw attention to the Cause of this impressive order?
Consider the courage and honesty of the men who wrote the Bible.
Many ancient writers flattered their leaders and glorified their kingdoms.
Jehovah’s prophets, however, always spoke the truth.
They were willing to point out the shortcomings of their own people, even their kings.
And they made plain their own failings and those of other servants of God.
Because of the guiding principles found in the Bible, many are convinced that it was inspired by God.
Bible principles protect us from sharing in false worship and from superstitions that enslave many people.
Such teachings as evolution tend to make nature into a sort of god, giving it powers that belong only to Jehovah.
Those who say that there is no God claim that our future is entirely in our own hands.
They, however, offer no sure hope for a better future.
God’s Law to the Israelites showed Jehovah’s strong feelings against clothing that does not make clear the distinction between male and female—what has been described in our day as unisex fashion.
From God’s stated direction about clothing, we clearly see that God is not pleased with styles of dress that feminize men, that make women look like men, or that make it hard to see the difference between men and women.
God’s Word contains principles that help Christians make good decisions about how to dress.
That is so no matter where they live, what their culture is, or what the climate is.
We do not need detailed lists saying which styles of dress are acceptable and which are objectionable.
Rather, we are guided by Scriptural principles that allow room for personal preferences.
Young people have the strength needed to accomplish much in Jehovah’s service.
Some young brothers in Bethel service have a part in printing and binding Bibles and Bible literature.
Many young brothers and sisters share in the work of building and maintaining Kingdom Halls.
When natural disasters strike, young people join more experienced Witnesses in carrying through with relief efforts.
And many young pioneers help to take the good news to indigenous and foreign-language communities.
The psalmist sang: Those seeking Jehovah will lack nothing good.
Indeed, Jehovah never disappoints those who zealously serve him.
We personally taste and see that Jehovah is good as we do all we can in his service.
And when we give God whole-souled worship, we experience happiness that has no equal.
A legal divorce not based on sexual immorality would not free one to remarry.
Of course, a person might choose to forgive an adulterous but repentant mate, even as the prophet Hosea apparently forgave his immoral wife, Gomer.
Similarly, Jehovah extended mercy to repentant Israel after that nation’s spiritual adultery.
It might be added that if a person knows that his or her mate committed adultery and chooses to resume sexual relations with the guilty mate, such an action constitutes forgiveness and removes a Scriptural basis for divorce.
After saying the words of today’s text, Jesus spoke of those who have the gift of living a single life.
He added: Let the one who can make room for it make room for it.
Many have chosen to remain single in order to serve Jehovah with an undivided mind.
For doing so, they are to be commended.
While undeserved kindness from Jehovah provides us with many blessings, we should not presumptuously think that he condones all conduct.
Among the early Christians, there were some who attempted to turn the undeserved kindness of God into an excuse for brazen conduct.
These unfaithful Christians apparently thought that they could sin and then count on Jehovah to forgive them.
Worse still, they endeavored to entice their brothers to join them in their contemptuous ways.
Even today, anyone doing that has outraged the spirit of undeserved kindness.
Today, Satan has misled some Christians into thinking that they can presume on God’s mercy and commit sins with impunity.
But while Jehovah is willing to forgive repentant sinners, he expects us to put up a strong fight against our sinful tendencies.
Deeds of godly devotion include your activities in the congregation, such as your meeting attendance and participation in the ministry.
Also included are spiritual activities that others do not see, such as your private prayers and your personal study.
A person who has dedicated his life to Jehovah will not consider these deeds to be chores.
Rather, he will reflect the attitude of King David, who said: To do your will, O my God, is my delight, and your law is deep within me.
Remember, as a dedicated and baptized Christian, you will stand before Jehovah on your own.
Your service to him should not depend on others—not even your parents.
Your holy acts of conduct and deeds of godly devotion give evidence that you have made the truth your own and that you are progressing toward baptism.
In our present day, Jehovah’s people have been exercising their faith in God’s established Kingdom.
This has resulted in the development of a worldwide spiritual paradise that has over eight million inhabitants.
It is a place that abounds with the fruitage of God’s spirit.
What a powerful demonstration of true Christian faith and love! No human can take credit for this.
It has been accomplished by our God.
This wonderful work is bringing fame to Jehovah, an everlasting sign that will never perish.
Our spiritual paradise will continue to grow and to flourish until the whole earth is filled with perfect, righteous, and happy humans to the eternal praise of Jehovah’s name.
Millions of modern-day worshippers of God are following the example of Jesus by keeping their hope in clear focus and not allowing trials to weaken their faith.
Consider the example of Rudolf Graichen, who was born in Germany in 1925.
He recalled pictures of Bible scenes that hung on the walls of his home.
One picture, he wrote, showed the wolf and the lamb, the kid and the leopard, the calf and the lion—all in peace, being led by a little boy.
Such pictures made a lasting impression on me.
Despite many years of cruel persecution, first by the Nazi Gestapo and later by the Communist Stasi of East Germany, Rudolf maintained his strong faith in an earthly paradise.
Other severe trials faced by Rudolf were the loss of his beloved mother, who died of typhus in the Ravensbrück concentration camp, and seeing his father weaken in faith and renounce being one of Jehovah’s Witnesses.
God’s people work hard to apply the Bible’s admonition: Deaden, therefore, your body members that are on the earth as respects sexual immorality, uncleanness, uncontrolled sexual passion.
We would not want to make it difficult for fellow believers to heed that counsel.
Brothers and sisters who have given up a sexually loose lifestyle may still be fighting sinful leanings.
We would not want to make their fight harder, would we?
When we are around our spiritual brothers and sisters, our manner of dress should help to make the congregation a haven of moral chastity.
We have the freedom to choose what to wear.
Still, all of us have a responsibility to wear clothes that make it easier for others to remain chaste and to maintain God’s standards of holiness in thought, word, and conduct.
This arrangement does not make a wife inferior to her husband.
It actually helps her to fulfill the role God had in mind for a wife when he said: It is not good for the man Adam to continue to be alone.
I am going to make a helper for him, as a complement of him.
Just as Christ, the head of the congregation, displays love, a Christian husband is to exercise loving headship.
When he does so, his wife feels secure and finds satisfaction in being respectful, supportive, and submissive.
Imitating Jesus example requires that his followers love one another just as he loved them.
Marital love shown by Christians should therefore be so strong that either mate would be willing, if necessary, to die for the other.
Your positive words can deeply affect others.
You can thus help them to serve Jehovah more fully.
And at the meetings, never overlook the powerful effect you can have on others by raising your hand and offering upbuilding comments.
With Jehovah’s backing, Nehemiah and those with him strengthened their hands for the work.
They then completed Jerusalem’s walls in just 52 days! , ftn.
; Nehemiah did not simply oversee the work.
He was personally involved in rebuilding Jerusalem’s walls.
Similarly, many loving elders have been able to imitate Nehemiah by assisting on theocratic construction projects or by cleaning and maintaining their local Kingdom Hall.
By working along with fellow publishers in the ministry and by making shepherding visits, they also strengthen the weak hands of those who are anxious at heart.
Those words surely express the sentiments of all loyal Witnesses of Jehovah.
But what if illness or advanced age somewhat limits your ministry?
Always remember that as you share the good news with caregivers and others, your sacred service glorifies our wonderful God.
If you are imprisoned because of your faith, you likely speak about the truth as circumstances permit, and that makes Jehovah’s heart rejoice.
The same is true if you are in a religiously divided household but stick to your spiritual routine.
Even under adverse circumstances, you can praise Jehovah and make spiritual progress.
Jehovah will certainly bless you as you share God’s precious truth with those who are in need of hope.
Jehovah’s servants highly esteem God’s own holy book, the Bible.
Being imperfect, we all receive Scriptural counsel at times.
How will we respond to it?
Consider the first-century Christians Euodia and Syntyche.
Serious problems arose between these anointed women.
The problems that existed between Euodia and Syntyche could have disrupted the peace of the whole congregation.
The Bible does not tell us the outcome, but these sisters may have responded well to the apostle Paul’s loving counsel.
Similar situations sometimes cause difficulties in congregations of Jehovah’s people today.
However, such problems can be solved or even avoided if we apply the counsel found in God’s Word, the Bible.
And if we highly esteem Jehovah’s own Book, we will live by its instructions.
All of us need encouragement.
That is especially true when we are growing up.
Children need encouragement like plants need water, explains educator Timothy Evans.
With encouragement, a child feels worthwhile and appreciated.
But we live in critical times.
People are selfish, there is little natural affection, and encouragement is scarce.
Satan the Devil wants to discourage us because he knows that discouragement can make us weak spiritually and in other ways.
Satan used a combination of calamities and accusations in an effort to discourage righteous Job, but that cruel scheme failed.
We can fight the works of the Devil by encouraging members of our family and of the congregation.
This will help to make our home and the Kingdom Hall places where we feel happy and secure.
Jehovah’s great love has been displayed in many ways.
For example, note the magnificence of the universe.
There are billions of galaxies, each containing many billions of stars and planets.
In our own Milky Way galaxy, one of those stars is our sun, without which the multitude of life forms on earth would not exist.
All these creations give evidence of Jehovah’s Godship and of his qualities, such as his power, wisdom, and love.
On earth, Jehovah created everything for the benefit of his creatures designed for earthly life.
For humans, he made a beautiful paradise garden and gave them perfect minds and bodies capable of living forever.
Moreover, he gives food to every living thing, for his loyal love endures forever.
Over the years our King has given us tools to use to help prepare the hearts of millions to receive the Kingdom message.
Some tools were useful for perhaps a decade or so, while others have proved to be of timeless value.
But all these tools have allowed us to develop our skills as evangelizers in some way.
One tool that helped many get started in the ministry was the testimony card, which Kingdom publishers began using in 1933.
The card contained a brief Bible message.
The testimony card was helpful in more ways than one.
Although having a strong desire to share in the preaching work, some publishers were shy and did not know what to say.
Others would tell the householder everything they knew in just a few minutes, but their presentation was not always tactful! In contrast, in a few concise, well-chosen words, the testimony card did the talking for the publisher.
Today, we are blessed with much knowledge of Jehovah’s works of creation and the outworking of his purpose.
The world promotes higher education and advanced learning.
Yet, the experience of many shows that pursuing such things often leads to loss of faith and loss of love for God.
The Bible, however, urges us not only to love knowledge but also to acquire wisdom and understanding.
That means to learn how to use the knowledge that God has given us so that we can benefit ourselves and others.
God’s will is that all sorts of people should be saved and come to an accurate knowledge of truth.
We demonstrate our love for Jehovah when we put our heart into telling everyone the Kingdom good news and helping people to understand God’s grand purpose for mankind.
Man’s linguistic abilities are a miraculous gift designed by God.
Our God-given brain is unique in another important respect.
Unlike animals, humans were created in God’s image.
They have free will and can choose to use their linguistic skills to glorify God.
To all who desire to honor the Creator of language, God has given a wonderful gift, the Bible.
It is available in whole or in part in over 2,800 languages.
When you absorb these holy writings, you are filling your mind with the thoughts of God.
Thus you can enjoy meditating on things that are able to make you wise for salvation.
To meditate means to focus your thoughts and to reflect on or ponder over something, be it good or bad.
The two best subjects for meditation are Jehovah God and his Son, Jesus Christ.
In choosing close friends, Jesus was selective.
Jesus chose such friends from among those who loyally followed him and served Jehovah wholeheartedly.
Do you similarly select your close friends from among those who serve Jehovah unreservedly?
Why is this important?
The warmth of our brotherhood can help you to progress to maturity.
Perhaps you are a young person who is trying to decide what course you will pursue in life.
How wise you are if you associate with fellow believers who have considerable experience in serving Jehovah and in contributing to the unity of the congregation! Over the years, they may have had some ups and downs in life and may even have faced challenges in serving God.
Such ones can help you to choose the best way of life.
Warm, upbuilding association with such brothers and sisters can help you to make your own wise decisions and to press on to maturity.
By both word and deed, Jesus built up the faith of his disciples.
We should follow his example because helping others build up their faith also strengthens our own.
In your preaching and teaching, highlight the proof that God exists, that he cares about us, and that the Bible is his inspired Word.
Help your brothers and sisters bolster their faith as well.
If any show signs of doubt, perhaps by starting to grumble against appointed brothers, do not quickly shun them.
Instead, tactfully come to their aid, helping them take steps to restore their faith.
If you are in school and the theory of evolution is discussed, boldly defend your faith in creation—you might be surprised at the effect your words have on others.
Jehovah helps all of us to stand firm in the faith.
The effort we put into building our faith is well worth it, for the rewards of faith are incomparable.
Samuel was so reluctant to do what the people demanded that Jehovah three times saw the need to tell him to listen to them.
Even so, Samuel did not allow bitterness or resentment against the man who would replace him to take root in his heart.
When Jehovah told him to anoint Saul, the prophet obeyed, not reluctantly out of mere duty, but willingly out of love.
Like Samuel, experienced elders today show a kind disposition toward those whom they train.
Such elders do not hold back from training others for fear of having to relinquish certain congregation privileges to the learners.
Bighearted teachers view willing learners, not as competitors, but as fellow workers—as precious gifts to the congregation.
And what satisfaction such unselfish teachers experience as they observe how the learners use their abilities to benefit the congregation!—.
As King of God’s Kingdom, Jesus will crush the serpent’s head and erase from the universe all traces of Satan’s rebellion.
While on earth, Jesus helped his disciples to see the importance of God’s Kingdom.
Immediately after his baptism, Jesus proclaimed the good news of the Kingdom of God far and wide.
In his last words to his disciples before he returned to heaven, Jesus instructed them to be witnesses of him to the most distant part of the earth.
By means of the Kingdom-preaching work, people throughout the earth would have an opportunity to learn about the ransom and become subjects of God’s Kingdom.
Today, we show our support for the Kingdom by assisting Christ’s brothers on earth in carrying out the commission to preach the good news of the Kingdom worldwide.
You might think that this was a simple choice because it is always wise and beneficial to serve Jehovah.
In fact, no reasonable person should be attracted to or attached to Baal.
Still, those Israelites were limping between two different opinions.
Wisely, Elijah urged them to choose the superior way of worship—the worship of Jehovah.
Why might it have been so difficult for those Israelites to make a wise decision?
First, they had basically lost faith in Jehovah and refused to listen to his voice.
They had not built a foundation of accurate knowledge or godly wisdom; nor did they trust in Jehovah.
Acting in accord with accurate knowledge would have helped them to make wise decisions.
Moreover, the people in the land who were not worshippers of Jehovah influenced the Israelites thinking, moving them to follow that pagan crowd.
Jehovah had long before warned that such a thing could happen.
Meditating on spiritual things will help a person grow to Christian maturity.
A person who spends little time thinking about Jehovah and Jesus will not maintain strong faith.
Such a person is in danger of drifting away or drawing away from the truth.
Jesus warned that if we do not hear, or accept, God’s Word with a fine and good heart, we will not retain it.
Instead, we could easily be carried away by anxieties, riches, and pleasures of this life, and bring nothing to maturity.
Therefore, let us continue to ponder over God’s Word.
This will motivate us to reflect Jehovah’s glory, qualities, and personality as revealed in the Bible.
What more could we ask for?
Growing in the knowledge of God and being allowed to reflect his glory are wonderful privileges, a never-ending process as we continue to learn how to imitate our loving heavenly Father.
We must never doubt that if we follow God’s direction, it will turn out for our good.
It is vital that we put faith in the One who can really help.
Paul reminds us that God is the one who can, according to his power that is operating in us, do more than superabundantly beyond all the things we ask or conceive.
Jehovah’s servants do all they can to carry out the will of God, but knowing their limitations, they trust in Jehovah to bless the outcome.
Are we not glad that our God is with us?
Can we expect our requests for more faith to be answered?
The Bible assures us that we can when we ask according to God’s will.
Clearly, Jehovah is pleased with those who put their complete trust in him.
Jehovah will answer our request for more faith, and our faith will grow exceedingly, leading to our being counted worthy of the Kingdom of God.
Speech is part of our daily life, but we do not need to talk all the time.
In fact, the Bible says that there is a time to be silent.
Maintaining silence when others are speaking can be a mark of respect.
Controlling our tongue to keep quiet about a confidential matter gives evidence of discretion and discernment.
Restraining our tongue when we are provoked is the course of wisdom.
On the other hand, the Bible also says that there is a time to speak.
If a friend gave you a beautiful present, you would probably not store it out of sight.
Rather, you would show your appreciation by putting it to good use.
We show our gratitude for Jehovah’s gift of speech by using it wisely.
That might include expressing our feelings, communicating our needs, sharing words of encouragement, and giving God praise.
Because of the headship principle that exists throughout God’s arrangement of things, love is especially important.
But headship is not to be exercised in a domineering way.
Although a husband is the head of his wife, the Bible instructs him to assign her honor.
One way husbands can honor their wives is by taking into consideration their needs and giving them first choice in some matters.
Indeed, God’s Word states: Husbands, continue loving your wives, just as the Christ also loved the congregation and gave himself up for it.
Yes, Jesus even gave his life for his followers.
When a husband imitates the loving way in which Jesus exercises headship, it is much easier for a wife to love and respect him and be in subjection to him.
As parents, you want your teenage children to remain spiritually healthy.
And God wants you to bring your children up in the discipline and admonition of Jehovah.
So use your God-given responsibility to establish and maintain a spiritual routine.
To illustrate: You insist that your children be educated because their education is important and you hope to instill in them a love for learning.
Loving parents likewise insist that their children benefit from the admonition of Jehovah at congregation meetings and through other spiritual programs.
Because divine education is vital, you try to instill in your children love for spiritual things and appreciation for wisdom.
As Jesus helped his disciples, you seek to help your teenage children to succeed in the ministry by developing in them a love of teaching God’s Word and by helping them stick to a good field service routine.
We do not live at a time when a fellow Christian can use gifts of healing to cure us.
But some well-intentioned brothers give unsolicited health recommendations.
Granted, someone might simply offer general, practical suggestions.
Paul did so when Timothy was experiencing stomach problems, perhaps because the local water was polluted.
That, however, is quite different from trying to persuade a fellow Witness to use some herb, remedy, or diet that may not be effective or in some cases may even be harmful.
At times, some have tried to persuade others with an explanation: My relative had a similar disease, and he took Then he got well.
No matter how sincere the suggestion, we do well to keep in mind that there may be risks even with widely used medications and treatments.
As Christians, we can benefit from the guidelines that were given in the Law to the nation of Israel.
How so?
We can stop and look at the underlying principles of the Law.
Even though we are not under those laws, we can view many of them as trustworthy guides in our daily lives and our worship of our holy God, Jehovah.
He had those laws recorded in the Bible so that we could learn from them, be guided by the principles, and appreciate the higher moral standards for Christians.
Listen to what Jesus said: You heard that it was said: You must not commit adultery.
But I say to you that everyone who keeps on looking at a woman so as to have a passion for her has already committed adultery with her in his heart.
Thus, we need to avoid not only the act of adultery but also the sexual craving to share in immorality.
We are all born imperfect.
So at times some in the congregation may hurt us by what they say or do.
This can test our love for Jehovah and for his people.
What will we do on such occasions?
For example, High Priest Eli had two sons who did not uphold Jehovah’s laws.
We read: The sons of Eli were wicked men; they had no regard for Jehovah.
Though their father played a key role in promoting true worship, his two sons committed very serious sins.
Eli knew about this and should have disciplined them, but he was lax in that regard.
As a result, God adversely judged the household of Eli.
In time, his descendants would not be allowed to serve as high priests.
When you examine ripe fruit at the market, you see that not all the pieces are identical.
Yet, they do share some characteristics that identify them as being ripe.
Similarly, mature Christians may be of different nationality, background, health, age, and experience.
There are even differences in personality or culture.
Still, all who grow spiritually develop qualities that identify them as being mature.
How so?
A mature servant of Jehovah builds his life around the example of Jesus, who left a model for us to follow his steps closely.
What did Jesus highlight as being very important?
Loving Jehovah with all one’s heart, soul, and mind, and loving one’s neighbor as oneself.
A mature Christian strives to live in harmony with that counsel.
He has established a life pattern that shows that he gives priority to his relationship with Jehovah and he displays self-sacrificing love for others.
Before Jesus ascended to heaven, his apostles asked the above.
Jesus answer showed that it was not the time for them to know when God’s Kingdom would start ruling.
He told his disciples to focus on the important witnessing work that they needed to do.
Nevertheless, Jesus taught his followers to look forward to the coming of God’s Kingdom.
So Christians since the days of the apostles have been praying for it to come.
When the time approached for God’s Kingdom in the hands of Jesus to start ruling from heaven, Jehovah helped his people to understand the timing of events.
In 1876, an article written by Charles Taze Russell was published in the magazine Bible Examiner.
That article, Gentile Times: When Do They End?
, pointed to 1914 as a significant year.
The article linked the seven times of Daniel’s prophecy with the appointed times of the nations spoken of by Jesus.
Jesus heart was touched by the pain of others.
Deeply moved by others reaction to the death of his friend Lazarus, Jesus groaned and became troubled.
He felt that way even though he knew that he would shortly bring Lazarus back to life.
Jesus was not ashamed to manifest strong emotions.
Onlookers could see the affection Jesus felt for Lazarus and his family.
What compassion Jesus showed by using his God-given power to bring his friend back to life! The Bible describes Jesus as the exact representation of the Creator’s very being.
Thus, by his miracles, Jesus proved that he and his Father have the desire to undo the pain of sickness and death.
This desire extends far beyond the few resurrections recorded in the Bible.
Jesus stated: The hour is coming in which all those in the memorial tombs will come out.
Our faith in Jehovah’s ability to read hearts and to draw to himself those whom he chooses should prevent us from judging others, both in our territory and in our congregation.
Accepting Jehovah as our Potter can affect our attitude toward fellow believers.
Do you see your brothers and sisters as God does—not as a finished product, but as a work in progress?
He can see the inner person as well as the kind of person one can become in his capable hands.
Hence, Jehovah takes a positive view of people and does not focus on temporary imperfections.
We can imitate him by seeing his servants in a positive light.
In fact, we can work along with our Potter by supporting our brothers and sisters as they strive to make spiritual advancement.
As gifts in men, the elders ought to take the lead in this regard.
Sharing the good news with others can help us to cultivate humility and various aspects of the fruitage of God’s spirit.
What is more, as we display the Christlike personality, we adorn our message, which may affect the attitude of some householders.
For example, two Witnesses in Australia listened respectfully to a householder who spoke very unkindly to them.
Later, however, she regretted her manner and wrote to the branch office.
In part, she said: To those two very patient and humble individuals, I would like to convey my apology for my most self-righteous and condescending behaviour.
I am a fool to stand before two people spreading God’s Word and attempt to steer them away like that.
Would the householder have written that if the publishers had shown even a hint of anger?
Probably not.
What a privilege it is for us not only to know God’s personal name but also to bear it as a people for his name.
We implore our heavenly Father: Let your name be sanctified.
Your making such a request may move you to ask Jehovah to help you to avoid doing or saying anything that would dishonor his holy name.
We do not want to be like some in the first century who did not practice what they preached, as mentioned in today’s text.
What is needed for God’s name to be completely sanctified and cleared of all reproach?
For that to happen, Jehovah must act to remove all who willfully reject his sovereignty.
Mankind will gradually be brought to perfection.
How we long for the time when all intelligent creation will treat Jehovah’s name as holy! Then, at last, our loving heavenly Father will be all things to everyone.
Realizing that it was his Father, Jehovah, who had healed the woman, Jesus treated her kindly, saying: Daughter, your faith has made you well.
Go in peace, and be healed from your grievous sickness.
How kind Jesus is! We see that he has a warm place in his heart for those who suffer from illnesses.
Satan wants to convince us that we are unloved and worthless.
By his miracles, Jesus clearly proved that he truly cares about us and our problems.
What a sympathetic King and High Priest! It may not be easy for us to understand the feelings of those who suffer from a chronic illness, especially if we have never experienced such.
We can bear in mind that Jesus empathized with the sick even though he himself was never sick.
May Jesus example move us to do the same, to the best of our ability.
Besides referring to the earth, the term footstool is also employed figuratively in the Hebrew Scriptures to describe the ancient temple used by the Israelites.
Located on the earth, the temple served as the center of true worship.
For that reason, it was truly beautiful in Jehovah’s eyes and its very existence glorified the place for Jehovah’s feet.
Today the center of true worship is no longer a literal temple on earth.
There is, however, a spiritual temple, which glorifies Jehovah far more than any building.
This is an arrangement that makes reconciliation with God possible by means of the priesthood and sacrifice of Jesus Christ.
It came into existence in 29 C.
at Jesus baptism when Jesus was anointed as High Priest of Jehovah’s great spiritual temple.
There are many ways to express our love for Jehovah.
For example, we show love for God and neighbor by having a zealous share in the Kingdom-preaching work.
We show that we truly love Jehovah by enduring tests of faith as integrity keepers.
If our trials become severe, we can be sure that God is aware of our suffering and will help us, for we are precious to him.
Our love for Jehovah moves us to meditate on his creative works and other marvelous deeds.
We show that we love God and highly value his Word by diligently studying the Bible.
Love for Jehovah draws us ever closer to him in prayer.
And our love for God grows deeper as we reflect on the ransom sacrifice he provided for our sins.
These are just some of the many reasons we have for loving Jehovah in response to his enduring love for us.
The apostle Paul wrote of the need for Christians in Ephesus to grow spiritually.
He encouraged them to reach out to attain to the oneness of the faith and of the accurate knowledge of the Son of God, to being a full-grown man, attaining the measure of stature that belongs to the fullness of the Christ.
When Paul wrote his letter, the congregation in Ephesus had already existed for some years.
Many disciples there had reached a high level of spiritual development.
Some, however, still needed to press on to maturity.
The situation among Jehovah’s Witnesses today is much the same.
Many brothers and sisters have long served God and have advanced to spiritual maturity.
But obviously not all are at that point.
For example, thousands of new ones are baptized each year, so some still need to strive for maturity.
What about you?
In the new world, there may be times when we will need to exercise patience.
For example, we may hear of individuals who, to the delight of their relatives and friends, have been raised from the dead.
However, we ourselves may have to wait for the resurrection of our loved ones.
If that is the case, will we rejoice with others and be patient?
Learning to wait patiently for the fulfillment of Jehovah’s promises now will help us to exercise patience then.
We can also prepare for life in the new world by exercising patience regarding revealed truth.
Are we studious and patient as our understanding of Bible truth is progressively clarified today?
If so, we will likely have no difficulty showing patience in the new world as Jehovah makes known his requirements for mankind.
